Homer
ODYSSEY

Translated by
Stanley Lombardo

Introduced by
Sheila Murnaghan
 








FOR
Zen Master Seung Sahn &
IN MEMORIAM
Emmett Bienvenu, S.J.
 
CONTENTS
 
The Palace of Odysseus Illustration	5
Introduction	6
A Tale of Homecoming	7
The Mêtis of Odysseus	14
The Man of Pain	22
Olympian Friends and Enemies	27
Fathers and Sons, Master and Slaves	36
The Fame of Penelope	46
The Limits of Heroism	55
History and the Poetic Tradition	62
Note on the Text	82
ODYSSEY	83
Book 1	83
Book 2	102
Book 3	120
Book 4	141
Book 5	176
Book 6	196
Book 7	209
Book 8	223
Book 9	248
Book 10	269
Book 11	292
Book 12	318
Book 13	336
Book 14	354
Book 15	376
Book 16	400
Book 17	421
Book 18	448
Book 19	467
Book 20	493
Book 21	511
Book 22	529
Book 23	551
Book 24	567
Translator's Postscript	590
Glossary of Names	595
Index of Speeches	623
Suggestions for Further Reading	643
 
THE PALACE OF ODYSSEUS ILLUSTRATION

 
INTRODUCTION

INTRODUCTION

The Odyssey is an epic account of survival and homecoming. The poem tells of the return (or in Greek, nostos) of Odysseus from the Greek victory at Troy to Ithaca, the small, rocky island from which he set out twenty years before. It was a central theme of the Trojan legend that getting home again was at least as great a challenge for the Greeks as winning the war. Many heroes lost their homecomings by dying at Troy, including Achilles, the greatest warrior of the Greeks, whose decision to fight in the full knowledge that he would not survive to go home again is told in the Iliad, the other epic attributed to Homer. Others were lost at sea or met disaster when they finally arrived home. The story of the returns of the major Greek heroes was a favorite subject of heroic song. Within the Odyssey, a bard is portrayed as singing "the tale / Of the hard journeys home that Pallas Athena / Ordained for the Greeks on their way back from Troy" (1.343- 45), and we know of an actual epic, no longer surviving, that was entitled the Nostoi or "Returns" of the Greeks. The Odyssey is also a version of this story, and it contains accounts of the homecomings of all the major heroes who went to Troy. But it gives that story a distinctive emphasis through its focus on Odysseus, who is presented as the hero best suited to the arduous task of homecoming and the one whose return is both the most difficult and protracted and the most joyful and glorious.
In telling this story, the poet has also given the greatest weight, not to the perilous, exotic sea journey from Troy, on the
 
INTRODUCTION
west coast of Asia Minor (present-day Turkey), to the shore of Ithaca, off the west coast of Greece, but to the final phase of the hero's return, his reentry into his household and recovery of his former position at its center. As a result, the Odyssey is, perhaps surprisingly, an epic poem that foregrounds its hero's experiences in his home and with his family, presenting his success in picking up the threads of his previous life as his greatest exploit. The Odyssey charges the domestic world to which its hero returns with the same danger and enchantment found in the larger, wilder realm of warfare and seafaring. Seen from the perspective of his wanderings, Odysseus' home becomes at once more precious and more precarious. As he struggles to reestablish himself in a place that has been changed by his twenty-year absence, we are made to reconsider, along with him, the value of the familiar and the danger of taking it for granted.


A TALE OF HOMECOMING

The Odyssey makes skillful use of the craft of storytelling to create this emphasis on the final phase of Odysseus' homecoming. Throughout the poem, Odysseus' story is set against that of another great hero of Troy, Agamemnon, whose own return failed just at the point when he reached his home. As the leader of the Greek expedition, Agamemnon seemed poised to enjoy the greatest triumph, and he was able to make the sea journey back to the shores of his kingdom without much trouble. But in his absence his wife, Clytemnestra, had taken a lover,
 
Aegisthus, who plotted to kill Agamemnon on his return, cutting him down just when he thought he could relax his guard and rejoice in his achievement. This story has the status in the Odyssey of a kind of norm or model for what might be expected to happen, and it is brought up at strategic moments to serve as a warning to Odysseus and his supporters, a repeated reminder that simply arriving home does not mean the end of peril and risk.
The importance of this final phase is also conveyed by the intricate structure of the Odyssey's plot, which places stress on Ithaca and on Odysseus' experiences there through the manipulation of chronology and changes of scene. The action of the Odyssey begins, not with the fall of Troy as one might expect, but just a few weeks before Odysseus' arrival at Ithaca ten years later. The poem opens with a divine council, in which the gods recognize that the fated time for Odysseus' return has finally arrived and take steps to set it in motion. In the human realm, the urgency of this moment is more acute on Ithaca, where events are moving swiftly in a dangerous direction, than on Ogygia, the remote island where Odysseus is trapped with a goddess, Calypso, in a suspended state of inactivity and nostalgia that has been going on for seven years and could continue indefinitely. The plan the gods come up with has two parts: Athena will go to Ithaca to prompt Odysseus' son, Telemachus, to useful action, and Hermes will go to Calypso and command her to release Odysseus; the poet chooses to narrate the Ithacan part first, giving priority to the situation and characters there. Thus, before we see Odysseus in action, we are introduced to Odysseus' household in his absence, where his long years away have created a difficult situation that is now heading toward a crisis.
 
All the young men of Ithaca and the surrounding region are trying to take over Odysseus' vacant position, staking their claims by setting themselves up as suitors to Odysseus' wife, Penelope. In this role, they spend their days feasting and reveling in Odysseus' house, steadily consuming the resources of his large estate. Unable to send them packing, Penelope has cleverly held them at bay for three years, but they have discovered her ruses and their patience is running out. Meanwhile, Telemachus is just reaching manhood. Until now, he has been too young to do anything about the suitors, but he too is getting impatient with the unresolved nature of the situation and the constant depletion of his inheritance. Athena's strategy is to spur him on to a full assumption of his adult role. She appears to him disguised as a traveling friend of his father's, Mentes, the king of the Taphians, and urges him to make a journey to the mainland, where he can consult two of the heroes who have returned from Troy, Nestor and Menelaus, in the hopes of finding out what has happened to Odysseus.
The aim of Telemachus' voyage is, specifically, information that might help to clarify and resolve the situation on Ithaca but, more broadly, education, the initiation into the ways of a proper heroic household that Telemachus is unable to find in his own fatherless, suitor-besieged home and an opportunity for him to discover and display his own inherent nobility. With the subtle guidance of Athena, who accompanies him, now in the disguise of Mentor, an Ithacan supporter of Odysseus, Telemachus first visits Nestor in Pylos and then Menelaus and his wife, Helen, in Sparta. From Menelaus, he receives the inconclusive news that Odysseus, when last heard of, was stranded with Calypso. But he
 
also learns from both of his hosts about the homeward journeys of all the major Greek heroes, and hears reminiscences about the father he has never met. He gains a companion in Nestor's son Peisistratus and has the experience of being spontaneously recognized as Odysseus' son.
Thus the initial section of the Odyssey, which occupies the first four of its twenty-four books, is what is known as the "Telemachy," the story of Telemachus. It is only in the fifth book that we encounter Odysseus in person, as the poem begins again at the beginning, now offering an account of what has been happening to Odysseus during the same time. The scene returns to Olympus, and the other part of the divine plan is put into action. Hermes is sent to free Odysseus from Calypso, and a new eight-book section focused on Odysseus begins. This is a new beginning for Odysseus as well as for the poem: in the episodes that follow, Odysseus has to create himself anew, acquiring again all the signs of identity and status that were once his. With Calypso's reluctant blessing, he builds a raft and sets off across the sea, only to be hit with a storm by his great divine enemy, the sea-god Poseidon. He narrowly avoids drowning and manages to reach the shore of Schería, a lush, isolated island inhabited by a race of magical seafarers, the Phaeacians. At this point, he is in a state of naked homelessness, just barely holding on to life, a condition described in an extended comparison, or simile, as he burrows into a nest of olive leaves and falls into an exhausted sleep.

A solitary man Who lives on the edge of the wilderness
 
And has no neighbors, will hide a charred log Deep in the black embers and so keep alive The fire's seed and not have to rekindle it From who knows where.
 

495
 

 

Himself in the leaves.
 
So Odysseus buried (5.493-500)
 
Through his encounters with the Phaeacians, Odysseus gradually recovers his former status. He gains the help of the Phaeacian princess, Nausicaa, who provides him with clothes and directions, and he makes his way to the court of their king, Alcinous, where he is welcomed and promised transportation back to Ithaca. At a great feast at Alcinous' court, he is finally ready to identify himself, and he gives an account of his adventures since leaving Troy. Thus the earliest part of the Odyssey's story is actually narrated in the middle of the poem, in a long first-person flashback that occupies Books 8 through 12.
The experiences that Odysseus recounts are strange and fascinating: his visit to the land of the Lotus-Eaters; his risky confrontation of the one-eyed, man-eating giant, the Cyclops Polyphemus; his battle of wits with the enchantress Circe, who turns men into pigs with a stroke of her magic wand; his visit to the Underworld where he meets his mother, his comrades from Troy, and the prophet Tiresias, who tells him about a last mysterious journey before his life is over; his success in hearing the beautiful, but usually deadly, singing of the Sirens; the difficult passage between two horrific monsters, Scylla and
 
Charybdis; and the ordeal of being marooned on the island of the Sun God, where his starving crew make the fatal mistake of eating the god's cattle. These famous stories have many parallels in widely disseminated folktales, with which they share an element of magic and an ability to convert basic human situations and concerns into marvelous plots. They are so well told that they enchant Odysseus' Phaeacian listeners, and they have come to dominate the later reputation of Odysseus, so that it is often a surprise to readers who encounter or re-encounter the Odyssey itself that those adventures actually occupy a relatively small portion of the poem.
The second half of the poem begins with Odysseus' passage from Schería to Ithaca in a swift Phaeacian ship. Again, the moment of transition is marked by sleep:

So lifted the keel of that ship, and in her wake An indigo wave hissed and roiled
As she ran straight ahead. Not even a falcon, Lord of the skies, could have matched her pace,
So light her course as she cut through the waves,	90
Bearing a man with a mind like the gods', A man who had suffered deep in his heart, Enduring men's wars and the bitter sea— But now he slept, his sorrows forgotten.
(13.86-94)

As on the shore of Schería, Odysseus' sleep is the prelude to a new phase of action, and the rest of the poem is concerned with the process by which, having made it to Ithaca, he reclaims his
 
position there and restores the conditions that existed when he left. Because of the danger posed by the suitors, who have already been plotting to murder Telemachus, this process has to be slow, careful, and indirect. Soon after he reaches the Ithacan shore at the beginning of Book 13, Odysseus adopts a disguise: with the aid of Athena, he is transformed into an old, derelict beggar. Before approaching his house, he goes for help and information to the hut of his loyal swineherd, Eumaeus, and there he is joined by Telemachus, as he returns from his journey to the mainland. At this point the two parallel strands of the plot merge, and the poem maintains from then on a consistent forward momentum toward the conclusion of the plot, in contrast to the more complicated structure of the first half. Odysseus reveals himself to Telemachus, and together they plot a strategy that will allow them to overcome the suitors, despite the suitors' reckless arrogance and superior numbers. Infiltrating his house in his beggar's disguise, Odysseus is able to exploit Penelope's decision that she will set a contest to decide whom she will marry, a contest that involves stringing a bow that Odysseus left behind when he went to Troy and shooting an arrow through a series of axe heads. Insisting on a turn when all the suitors have failed, Odysseus gains the weapon he needs to defeat his enemies. With the help of a small band of supporters, he takes on the suitors, and the house of Odysseus becomes the scene of a battle that is as glorious and bloody as those at Troy. With the skill and courage of a great warrior, Odysseus takes back his wife and his home, bringing his journey to a triumphant conclusion at last.
 
THE MÊTIS OF ODYSSEUS

Odysseus' triumph is possible only because of his exceptional nature, marked by a distinctive form of heroism. Like the other heroes who fought at Troy, Odysseus is physically powerful and adept at the arts of war, but what really distinguishes him is a quality of mind. In Greek, this quality is designated by the term mêtis, which denotes intelligence, cunning, versatility, and a facility with words. Odysseus is a master at assessing situations, devising plans, using language for his own ends, and manipulating the relations of appearance and reality. His skills extend far beyond those of the typical warrior to include, for example, craftsmanship, as when he builds his own raft with which to leave Calypso. His most characteristic and successful tactic is his use of disguises, which depends on a rare willingness to efface his own identity and a cool-headed capacity to say one thing while thinking another. Odysseus disguises himself at every stage of the Odyssey's plot. In his early and defining encounter with the monstrous Cyclops, Odysseus overcomes his physical disadvantage through the brilliant trick of telling the Cyclops that his name is "no man" (a word that has several forms in Greek, one of which happens to be mêtis). After Odysseus succeeds in blinding the Cyclops and escaping from his cave, he would still be at the mercy of the Cyclops' neighbors if the Cyclops were not crying out to them that "No man is hurting me." When he washes up, dispossessed and shipwrecked among the Phaeacians, Odysseus shrewdly suppresses his identity until he can demonstrate his civility and distinction and win his hosts' support. And on Ithaca his success depends on his extended
 
impersonation of an old, broken-down beggar. In pretending to be a beggar on Ithaca, Odysseus is repeating an old tactic, as we learn when Helen tells Telemachus how Odysseus once sneaked into Troy in a similar disguise.
Odysseus' use of disguise demands not only constant alertness and wit but a particular form of discipline, for the heroes of Homeric epic are animated by a constant drive to self- assertion. Their names are not just names to them but claims to high status and reputation based on their aristocratic heritage and their own impressive actions, and their relations with each other revolve around the giving and getting of recognition. It is clear from the Iliad that these heroes find any questioning or suspension of their identity intolerable. Warriors are stung to action if a peer questions their courage or compares them unfavorably to an ancestor. Living up to an illustrious name and the privileges that go with it is, for them, paramount. They risk their lives in the hopes of achieving something memorable enough to turn the honor they enjoy in their lifetimes into everlasting fame, or kleos. The plot of the Iliad turns on a quarrel between Agamemnon and Achilles, the best fighter in the army, when Agamemnon loses one of the war prizes—in this case a captive woman—through which status is expressed. When he tries to compensate for that loss by taking a prize of Achilles', the result is a bitter and deadly conflict that reveals how impossible each of them finds it to do without such markers of heroic identity.
For Odysseus to voluntarily suppress his famous name, to actively embrace the identity of "no man," and to adopt the persona of such a social nonentity as a homeless beggar involves
 
a form of self-denial that most heroes could not tolerate. And he, of course, only does tolerate it as a means to ultimate self- disclosure and recognition, which are as important to him as to any other hero. When he has succeeded in outwitting the Cyclops and is sailing away from his island, Odysseus must have the satisfaction of shouting out his real name to him. This irresistible self-assertion has terrible and far-reaching consequences, since the Cyclops is then able to call on his father, Poseidon, to punish Odysseus:

 
Grant that Odysseus, son of Laertes, May never reach his home on Ithaca. But if he is fated to see his family again,
And return to his home and own native land, May he come late, having lost all companions, In another's ship, and find trouble at home.
(9.524-29)

When Odysseus is with the Phaeacians, his prolonged exercise of discretion and reserve only serves to heighten the moment of dramatic revelation when, secure in their high regard and assured of their gifts and transport home, he begins his long narrative with a ringing self-introduction:

I am Odysseus, great Laertes' son,
Known for my cunning throughout the world, And my fame reaches even to heaven.
(9.21-23)
 



525
 
And his impersonation of a dishonored beggar on Ithaca is a strategy that makes possible the stunning moment when he surprises the suitors with the truth of his real identity, throwing aside his rags as he shoots his bow, no longer through the axe heads but now—to their stupefied horror—at them. It is one of many paradoxes about Odysseus that he embraces obscurity and dishonor in order to claim the greatest possible glory.
In this way, the Odyssey's hero embodies one of its central themes, which is that the capacity to defer satisfaction and endure suffering is as necessary for success as the ability to perform brilliant feats. The rewards Odysseus enjoys are bound up with hardship and delay, as is clear from the opening lines of the poem, where he is identified as "the wanderer, blown off course time and again," and where a main subject of the poem is defined as "the suffering deep in his heart at sea." As vital to Odysseus' defeat of the suitors as his dazzling archery is his ability to accept the verbal and physical abuse they subject him to in his beggar's disguise, and he must repeatedly resist the impulse to react before he is in a position to crush them. His ability to resist provocation is matched by an ability to resist pleasure as well, to defer the gratifications of food, sex, and beautiful music. Many of the stories that make up his adventures are concerned with such temptations, and, in the end, Odysseus' self-control allows him to survive when none of his companions do. This is shown definitively in the final adventure, which involves the cattle of the sun. Warned by Circe and Tiresias that eating those cattle would be fatal, Odysseus instructs his men to leave them alone, but when they find themselves stranded and facing starvation, they give in to their hunger and are lost at sea as a punishment.
 
This distinction between Odysseus and his companions is expressed in many ways throughout the adventures. In one episode, Odysseus has to drag a contingent of them away from the land of the Lotus-Eaters, where "Whoever ate that sweet fruit / Lost the will to report back, preferring instead / To stay there, munching lotus, oblivious of home" (9.94-96). The obliviousness brought by the delicious lotus makes clear the link between this quality of self-control and memory, specifically the memory of home. Odysseus succeeds where others fail because he never forgets his goal and never loses sight of his desire for it, even in the face of the greatest temptations.
The contrast between Odysseus and his men plays out somewhat differently in the episode involving the seductive enchantress Circe. When Circe tries to overcome him with her magical potion, Odysseus retains his self-possession and forces her to swear she will not harm him; just before that, however, she easily transforms his companions into pigs. Here, in a typical Homeric situation in which divine favor marks and enhances a human's intrinsic superiority, Odysseus' ability to withstand Circe's designs stems from a protective magic plant, the moly, which he has been given by Hermes. In this episode we can also see the way in which Odysseus' superiority allows him, at times, to get away with the enjoyment of dangerous pleasures that might be the undoing of ordinary mortals. Having assured himself of Circe's good will, Odysseus climbs into bed with her, and he stays with her for a year, feasting and recuperating from his travels until—in a somewhat inconsistent reversal—his men recall him to his purpose: "Good god, man, at long last remember your home" (10.493).
 
Another adventure in which Odysseus is able to taste pleasure without succumbing to it is that of the Sirens, in which his companions are again his saviors as well as his inferiors, and in which the danger comes not from sex or food but from poetry. The Sirens are female monsters who lure seafarers to shipwreck and death with their exquisite singing. Following a plan supplied by Circe, Odysseus blocks his men's ears with wax and has them tie him to the mast of his ship, charging them not to untie him however urgently he pleads. In this way he survives a temptation that no one else could handle, hearing the Sirens' song but also leaving it behind, continuing on his journey thanks to the strenuous rowing of his crew. From the brief, teasing few lines of the Sirens' song that we hear, it seems that its attraction includes the pleasure of learning the events of the past: "For we know everything / that the Greeks and Trojans / Suffered in wide Troy / by the will of the gods" (12.197-98). Odysseus must withstand not only the beauty of the song but the impulse it inspires to linger in the past, to take pleasure in a story, the story of the Trojan War, that he still needs to bring to conclusion.
After the adventures have been weathered and the companions have been lost, a similar contrast is drawn between Odysseus and his Phaeacian hosts. The land of the Phaeacians is a site of otherworldly pleasure—an opulent, hyper-civilized community whose inhabitants have no experience of strife or hardship. Life with the Phaeacians also represents a temptation for Odysseus, as Alcinous encourages him to marry Nausicaa and settle down among them. But he keeps his sights set on Ithaca and on Penelope, insisting politely but determinedly that the Phaeacians keep their promise to take him home. While the
 
Phaeacians are not lost in the way the companions are for their enjoyment of all the pleasures that lie before them, that is because they are not trying to get anywhere, and they are cut off from life in the world to which Odysseus belongs. As in the episode of the Sirens, this contrast is developed in relation to the enjoyment of poetry. Song is one of the chief pleasures of the Phaeacians' life, the perfect complement to their elegant feasts, and their bard, Demodocus, sings several songs during Odysseus' visit in what may be an internal representation of the kind of occasion on which poems like the Odyssey itself were performed. Launching into his own story during a banquet at which Demodocus has already sung, Odysseus begins with an encomium of song as the sweetest of pleasures.

My Lord Alcinous, what could be finer Than listening to a singer of tales
Such as Demodocus, with a voice like a god's?
Nothing we do is sweeter than this—	5
A cheerful gathering of all the people Sitting side by side throughout the halls, Feasting and listening to a singer of tales. . .
(9.2-8)
And yet Odysseus is unable to join his hosts in their detached delight at the songs Demodocus sings about the great events of the Trojan War: while they relax and rejoice, he weeps. His own, still unconcluded involvement in the events being told keeps him from enjoying what song has to offer, just as it keeps him from taking Alcinous up on his offer to stay. For him song does not yet
 
serve the function that Homeric poetry claims for itself of converting suffering into a source of pleasure and offering, through the memories of the past, forgetfulness of the cares of the present. Odysseus is in an extraordinary position in that, unlike most Homeric heroes, he has survived his own exploits to the point at which he can hear them sung about in song, experiencing the fame that others die for but never actually taste. But he cannot yet enjoy that experience of fame; pleasure in the recounting of his achievements must wait until his reunion with Penelope, when husband and wife are able to spend a long night exchanging stories.
Odysseus' grief at what delights the Phaeacians is described most pointedly in a simile that occurs just after Demodocus recounts, at Odysseus' own request, Odysseus' greatest exploit, his taking of Troy through the trick of the wooden horse. The response of this hero who is still caught up in the struggle to survive the war is compared to the pain of war's most wretched survivor.
 

And Odysseus wept. Tears Welled up in his eyes and flowed down his cheeks.

A woman wails as she throws herself upon Her husband's body. He has fallen in battle Before the town walls, fighting to the last To defend his city and protect his children.
As she sees him dying and gasping for breath She clings to him and shrieks, while behind her
Soldiers prod their spears into her shoulders and back,
 





565










570
 
And as they lead her away into slavery Her tear-drenched face is a mask of pain.

 
So too Odysseus, pitiful in his grief.
(8.564-575)

The victor of Troy is more like his own most piteous victim than like his carefree hosts; the simile identifies Odysseus with pain, defining this moment in his journey as one at which his struggles are still far from finished and, at the same time, pointing to an essential feature of his makeup.


THE MAN OF PAIN

Between the end of his adventures and his arrival on the Phaeacian shore, Odysseus meets a greater temptation than any of those that distract his companions: the temptation of immortality. The storm that drowns his companions lands him with the beautiful nymph Calypso, who feeds and cares for him, takes him as her lover, and offers to make him immortal if he will stay with her. Calypso's island cave dwelling is a paradise of ease and beauty, lovely enough to delight even a god, as we see from Hermes' appreciative appraisal when he arrives to deliver his message. And yet our first view of Odysseus is of him "sitting where the breakers rolled in. / His eyes were perpetually wet with tears now, / His life draining away in homesickness" (5.150-52). Odysseus gives voice to his rejection of Calypso's offer when she
 

575
 
comes to tell him that she will let him leave. She makes one last pitch by suggesting that if he only knew the trouble ahead he would surely stay with her; and she adds that, as a goddess, she undoubtedly outshines his mortal wife, Penelope. He answers:

 
Goddess and mistress, don't be angry with me. I know very well that Penelope,
For all her virtues, would pale beside you. She's only human, and you are a goddess, Eternally young. Still, I want to go back.
My heart aches for the day I return to my home. If some god hits me hard as I sail the dark purple, I'll weather it like the sea-bitten veteran I am.
God knows I've suffered and had my share of sorrows In war and at sea. I can take more if I have to.
(5.215-24)

Odysseus does not just endure the sufferings that come his way, he actively accepts them as the cost of his homecoming. And he does not just long for his home on Ithaca, he prizes it above even the paradise of Calypso's island. Odysseus' speech suggests the characteristically human motive behind this seemingly perverse choice: the love that people have for what is their own simply because it is theirs. Here that love is associated with Penelope, but at other points in their respective journeys both Odysseus and Telemachus express a similar devotion to Ithaca itself, despite the fact that it is a small and stony island, not particularly good for pasturing horses and cattle. Or, as Odysseus puts it simply in his great speech at Alcinous' court,
 

215








220
 
recalling his resistance to both Circe and Calypso:

But they could not persuade me or touch my heart. Nothing is sweeter than your own country
And your own parents, not even living in a rich house— Not if it's far from family and home.
(9.36-39)

An additional reason for Odysseus' choice is encoded in Calypso's name, which in Greek means "concealer." The life that Odysseus has with Calypso is endless and carefree, but it is entirely cut off from the world of mortals, where his fate is unknown and he is in danger of being forgotten. Escape from the trials of mortal life would also mean the death of his aspirations to eternal fame among the human generations to come. As a mortal, Odysseus is not only consigned to human suffering but also committed to human goals, to pursuing the consolations that human beings find for the brevity and difficulty of their lives in their relations with one another and in the prospect of glory.
In the Odyssey, death is not experienced only as looming prospect, as an inevitable finality shadowing every life. Among Odysseus' adventures is an actual visit to the realm of death, a journey to the edge of the Underworld involving a series of encounters with the dead that gives him—and us—a concrete sense of what death is like. The Homeric afterlife is a place of relentless dreariness and gloom in which people continue on and on as lifeless ghosts, endlessly trapped in old worries and old grudges, cut off from any sense of purpose or any knowledge of what has happened since they died. The awfulness of this state is
 
famously expressed by the ghost of Achilles, when Odysseus tries to cheer him up by pointing out how much honor he has among the dead.

 
Don't try to sell me on death, Odysseus. I'd rather be a hired hand back up on earth, Slaving away for some poor dirt farmer, Than lord it over all these withered dead.
(11.510-13)

Briefly animated by their encounter with Odysseus, the ghosts that he meets tell him their stories, but cannot really make contact with him, as is most evident when Odysseus unexpectedly finds his mother among the dead, sent there by grief at his long absence from Ithaca.

Three times I rushed forward to hug her, And three times she drifted out of my arms Like a shadow or a dream. The pain
That pierced my heart grew ever sharper, And my words rose to my mother on wings:

'Mother, why do you slip away when I try
To embrace you? Even though we are in Hades, Why can't we throw our arms around each other And console ourselves with chill lamentation?. . .'
(11.206-14)

Odysseus' journey to the Underworld reinforces the joy of
 

510




























210
 
survival, the pleasure of returning to the familiar world of action and light, but his meetings there also deepen his experience of the particular bind of the survivor, of the way in which the satisfaction of living on is accompanied by sorrow and guilt at outliving so many beloved relatives and friends. His homecoming, as it turns out, will not be a return to both of his "own parents."
Like Calypso's, Odysseus' name is significant, and its meaning points to his association with pain. The name Odysseus is connected (in the poetic tradition, if not in actual linguistic history) to a Greek verb, odussomai, which means "to suffer pain." Several times in the Odyssey that connection is exploited to create puns on Odysseus' name; these puns give pointed expression to his identity as a hero who both has to endure and can endure an exceptional measure of suffering—and they also provide a special challenge to the translator. Thus Athena, in the initial council on Olympus, trying to get Zeus to do something about Odysseus' stalled homecoming, asks him why he causes Odysseus so much trouble: "Why is Odysseus so odious, Zeus?" But, as scholars who have studied this wordplay have pointed out, the verb odussomai can mean to inflict pain as well as to suffer it, and Odysseus' name describes an active as well as a passive relationship to suffering. He is given his name by his grandfather Autolycus, whose own name means something like "the wolf himself," and who connects his grandson's name to his own tough and tricky nature:

 
I come here as one who is odious, yes, Hateful to many for the pain I have caused
 

445
 
All over the land. Let this child, therefore, Go by the name of Odysseus.
(19.445-48)

The determination and self-control that allow Odysseus to survive when others are lost are linked to a readiness to cause pain when necessary. Odysseus does not shrink from violence, as when he plunges a sharpened olive stake into the Cyclops' only eye, or from taking advantage of others, as when he manipulates the Phaeacian princess, Nausicaa, into helping him by playing on her thoughts of marriage. Once on Ithaca, he is brusque with his son and his old nurse when their many questions delay his plans and, encountering his wife and old father while in disguise, he is capable of observing the grief they experience in his absence without letting on that he is home. His revenge against the suitors is bloody and thorough; he does not give in to special pleas and is not interested in making fine judgments of relative guilt. The Odyssey does not conceal the ruthlessness that is a necessary element in the success of its cool-headed and resourceful hero.


OLYMPIAN FRIENDS AND ENEMIES

Extraordinary as Odysseus may be in his versatility and self- reliance, he can by no means achieve his homecoming alone. He relies on a range of helpers, both divine and human, whose relations with him help to define who he is and to articulate the central values of the poem. Of these, the most powerful is his
 
divine patron, the goddess Athena. Not only is Athena Odysseus' ardent champion, but she actively supervises and directs the action of the Odyssey, which is, in a sense, her personal project. The action begins when she intervenes on Olympus to turn her father Zeus' attention away from the family of Agamemnon to the plight of Odysseus. Athena gets things moving on Ithaca by stirring up Telemachus, and she accompanies him on his actual journey disguised as Mentor. When Odysseus himself arrives on Ithaca, the final, most intense phase of the action begins with an encounter between Odysseus and Athena, in which she appears to him openly, assures him of her support, and gives him his disguise. Just as she opens the action of the poem, Athena also shuts it down. Having slaughtered the suitors, Odysseus has to contend with their relatives, who swarm his estate in a vengeful crowd. Warfare is just beginning between this group and Odysseus and his supporters, when Athena, with Zeus' blessing, intervenes to insist that they make peace. In the final lines of the poem, Athena swears both sides to binding oaths that will assure amity and prosperity among the Ithacans.
Athena's support tells us a lot about Odysseus and the meaning of his nostos. Its very intensity marks him out as unlike other heroes, who could not achieve what they do without divine help, but whose access to it is never so open or so steady. Athena's partiality is related to the other qualities that set Odysseus apart, especially his mêtis. She says as much herself when they meet on the Ithacan shore and the goddess and her mortal favorite act out the qualities that underlie their partnership. This meeting is their first face-to-face encounter since Troy, and it signals that the final phase of Odysseus' return
 
has begun. Athena approaches Odysseus as gods normally approach mortals, through devices that put them at a disadvantage. She covers his familiar home with a mist, so that he imagines his Phaeacian hosts have betrayed him and he has landed once more on unfamiliar terrain, and she appears to him in a disguise, in this case the disguise of a young shepherd. But Odysseus is instinctively wary, even when the supposed shepherd tells him that he is on Ithaca, and he responds to her with a deception of his own, spinning a misleading tale of his origins and history, the first of many such false tales that he will tell on Ithaca. Athena is delighted and rewards him with an open epiphany, transforming herself into her truest form, a tall, beautiful, and skillful woman, and laying out the basis of her devotion.

 
Only a master thief, a real con artist, Could match your tricks—even a god Might come up short. You wily bastard, You cunning, elusive, habitual liar!
Even in your own land you weren't about To give up the stories and sly deceits That are so much a part of you.
Never mind about that though. Here we are, The two shrewdest minds in the universe, You far and away the best man on earth
In plotting strategies, and I famed among gods For my clever schemes.
(13.299-310)
 



300








305








310
 
Athena is Odysseus' divine counterpart, a figure who similarly represents a combination of martial abilities and intelligence. She is the daughter of Zeus and of the goddess Mêtis, the personification of cunning. Born from Zeus' head after he swallowed Mêtis, Athena is Zeus' ever-loyal daughter, a perpetual virgin who never leaves her father, and she stands for both military power and cleverness as they are subordinated to Zeus' authority and regulation of the universe. She is a military goddess who is associated especially with just causes and civilization, and a crafty goddess whose intelligence inspires expert craftsmanship—the metalworking and shipbuilding of gifted men and the fine weaving of gifted women—as well as clever plans. Her sponsorship of Odysseus, with the carefully sought blessing of Zeus, indicates that his cause is seen among the gods as just, and Odysseus is unusual among Homeric characters for the gods' clear endorsement of his cause, as well as for the steadiness of their support. Zeus' favor is clear from the divine council with which the poem opens. Although he seems to have forgotten about Odysseus at that point and has to be reminded by Athena, his mind is on the terrible crime and just punishment of Aegisthus, the figure in the Agamemnon story who provides a parallel to Penelope's suitors. Before the suitors are even mentioned, then, they are cast by analogy into the role of villains and Odysseus into the role of divinely sanctioned avenger.
The point at which the Odyssey starts is, in fact, the moment in Odysseus' story at which Athena can first hope to get Zeus to grant Odysseus his full attention and support. Their conversation takes place at a time when the sea-god Poseidon is away from
 
Olympus, feasting with the far-off Ethiopians. Poseidon, as the poet tells us, is the only god who does not pity Odysseus, and throughout his adventures Poseidon is opposed to Athena as Odysseus' bitter adversary. The immediate cause of his enmity is anger on behalf of the Cyclops, who is Poseidon's son, and who calls on Poseidon to avenge him after he has been blinded by Odysseus. More generally, as the god of the treacherous and uncertain sea, Poseidon represents all the challenges of the wild realm between Troy and Ithaca that Odysseus must first negotiate before he can face the problems that await him on land. Further, behind the particular story of Odysseus lie the perennial divine struggles that determine the nature of the cosmos. In cosmic history, Poseidon is Zeus' brother, who has received the sea as his not-quite-equal portion in a division of the universe in which Zeus gained the superior portion of the sky and a third brother, Hades, the Underworld. As a consequence, Poseidon is constantly jealous of his prerogatives and sensitive to any diminution of his honor, and he is in a recurrent state of opposition to Zeus' favorite, Athena, an opposition that in part symbolizes a conflict between untamed wildness and civilization. The best known expression of this opposition is their competition to be the patron deity of the city of Athens. This competition is won by Athena when she produces an olive tree—the plant sacred to her—and it is judged to be more useful to civilization than a spring of salt water produced by Poseidon.
Odysseus' success in surviving his adventures at sea and reaching Ithaca, where he restores the civilized conditions that have been eroded in his absence, represents another version of Athena's victory, but it cannot occur until Poseidon has had his
 
due. Odysseus has had to endure all the perils of the sea, its adverse winds, raging storms, sudden rocks, and engulfing whirlpools, and he has had to contend with its island settlements, places where the strangeness of the sea extends to its inhabitants and the normal rules of ordinary human civilization do not apply. In the Cyclops Odysseus meets a monster who scorns the rules by which humans live and, as he gobbles down Odysseus' men, thumbs his nose at the rules of hospitality that Odysseus expects him to follow. While Odysseus contends that his punishment of the Cyclops is just revenge for the Cyclops' monstrous incivility, he is nonetheless made to suffer for it through the Cyclops' curse, which activates the enmity of Poseidon. It is Poseidon's anger, along with that of the Sun God whose cattle are eaten, that causes the death of Odysseus' companions. And even though Poseidon's absence among the Ethiopians allows Athena to set Odysseus' return in motion, Poseidon's anger still remains an important element in the story. As he returns to Olympus, Poseidon sees Odysseus on his raft and blasts him with the terrible storm that he barely survives to wash up on the Phaeacian shore. And when the Phaeacians transport Odysseus back to Ithaca, Poseidon is so outraged that he declares he will end their role of conveying men across the sea, smashing their ship and hemming their city in with a mountain. Zeus soothes his wounded pride and suggests he simply turn the ship into a rock; he does, and it is left uncertain whether or not he encloses the city.
Only when Odysseus has reached the dry land of Ithaca and a society with familiar rules is Poseidon no longer an obstacle to Odysseus' return, and this is signaled by the way Athena's support, which is muted and indirect even while he is among the
 
Phaeacians, now becomes open and assured. But even then Odysseus' need to come to terms with Poseidon has not ended, and he remains affected by his dealings with a wilder world even as he settles back into his peaceful and orderly home. One of the most important things he learns from Tiresias in the Underworld is that even after he regains Ithaca, he will still need to take one last journey.

 
. . . when you have slain The suitors in your hall, by ruse or by sword,
Then you must go off again, carrying a broad-bladed oar, Until you come to men who know nothing of the sea, Who eat their food unsalted, and have never seen
Red-prowed ships or oars that wing them along.
And I will tell you a sure sign that you have found them, One you cannot miss. When you meet another traveler Who thinks you are carrying a winnowing fan,
Then you must fix your oar in the earth And offer sacrifice to Lord Poseidon, A ram, a bull, and a boar in its prime. Then return to your home and offer Perfect sacrifice to the immortal gods Who hold high heaven, to each in turn. And death will come to you off the sea, A death so gentle, and carry you off
When you are worn out in sleek old age, Your people prosperous all around you.
(11.117-35)
 







120








125








130








135
 
Much about this prophecy is mysterious, but it seems that Odysseus must undertake a final mission in service of Poseidon, extending Poseidon's worship into a place where he is unknown, and that the result may be reconciliation between them. Assuming that the proper conditions are successfully fulfilled—a question that Tiresias leaves open—Poseidon's element, the sea, will become no longer the harsh force against which Odysseus must contend but the medium of a gentle death, the best end a mortal can hope for.
The support that Odysseus has from Athena and especially from Zeus is not based solely on favoritism, but also on his association with justice. In overcoming the suitors' challenge, Odysseus is not only seeking personal vindication; he is also punishing their assaults on the most highly valued and sacred principles of his culture, the rights and obligations surrounding hospitality. The need to turn to strangers for shelter, food, and help with the next stage of a journey is a constant feature of life in the Odyssey, experienced alike by those who are temporarily away from home, like the fully credentialed prince Telemachus, and by those who have no home, like the roving exiles of Odysseus' false tales or the down-and-out beggar of his disguise. Among highly placed aristocrats like Odysseus and the heroes Telemachus visits on his journey, reciprocal hospitality is a way of forming and maintaining important political alliances, which are cemented by the guest-gifts that hosts present to their visitors. In extending hospitality, a host mitigates a stranger's foreignness, incorporating him for a time into his own household; he expresses a sense of universal human kinship based on a common subjection to fortune, which can drive anyone from
 
home, and on common needs, above all the relentless demands of the belly, which override and banish all other concerns. As Odysseus puts it to Alcinous when he first appears at his court in a condition of utter neediness,

 
I could tell you much more, a long tale,
Of the suffering I've had by the will of the gods, But all I want now is to be allowed to eat,
Despite my grief. There is nothing more shameless Than this belly of ours, which forces a man
To pay attention to it, no matter how many Troubles he has, how much pain in his heart.
(7.226-32)

In the Odyssey upright characters show their virtue by honoring their obligation to provide hospitality, a point which is stressed in the extended portrayal of the courteous treatment that Odysseus as the beggar receives from the humble swineherd Eumaeus and in the dismay of Telemachus when the conditions of his household prevent him from being a proper host to Theoclymenus, a wandering prophet who joins him at the end of his journey. The suitors, by contrast, reaffirm their lawlessness through their repeated rudeness to the disguised Odysseus.
In dishonoring the beggar among them, the suitors are recapitulating their original offense against the rules of hospitality in the form of their unwanted trespass in Odysseus' house. If hosts have obligations, so do guests, who must not abuse the generosity that is owed to them. Above all, guests must remember that they are not at home and cannot treat their host's
 








230
 
possessions as their own. In this way, the rules of hospitality dovetail with the strong sense of a householder's rights to his own property that is also a fundamental principle of Homeric society. The Trojan War itself has its origin in a guest's abuse of hospitality, when the Trojan prince, Paris, visits Menelaus and steals his wife, Helen. Paris' crime is echoed in the transgression that troubles Zeus at the opening of the Odyssey, Aegisthus' seduction of Clytemnestra, which leads to his murder of Agamemnon and seizure of Agamemnon's house. As Zeus' concern here indicates, the gods of the Odyssey back up the rules of human society and take note of violations against them; they support human beings in their efforts to soften the sufferings that the gods themselves impose. Zeus is evoked throughout the poem as the special protector of strangers and beggars, and in his exasperation with Aegisthus, he makes it clear that transgressions against the rights and obligations of the household meet with divine punishment. As he puts it, by ignoring the common rules of human culture, humans bring on themselves "more [troubles] than they were destined for" (1.39), an extra measure of suffering beyond that which the gods impose on everyone.


FATHERS AND SONS, MASTER AND SLAVES

In the world of the Homeric epics, the help of the gods is not a randomly bestowed benefit, but an advantage that expresses and reinforces a mortal's inherent qualities and his or her ability to command the help of other mortals. For all the divine favor he
 
enjoys, Odysseus must also rely on key mortal supporters in order to achieve his aims. In particular, he must rely on the members of his household, who create and preserve the position at its center that he hopes to reclaim. The success of his return depends on the reconstitution of a series of relationships that define both his own identity and the social order in which it is meaningful. In the second half of the poem, those relationships are mapped out in a sequence of reunions that punctuate the narrative of Odysseus' homecoming: with Telemachus in Book 16, with his old nurse Eurycleia in Book 19, with Eumaeus and another loyal servant, the herdsman Philoetius, in Book 21, with Penelope in Book 23, and finally with his father, Laertes, in Book 24.
The device of disguise, which provides an index to Odysseus' character and a strategy for his defeat of the suitors, also creates opportunities for episodes of recognition in which Odysseus' identity as father, son, master, and husband is declared and accepted. Each encounter renews a mutually beneficial bond, to which both parties make significant contributions, and each encounter involves recognition on both sides. Odysseus acknowledges the identity and loyalty of his supporters as they acknowledge his identity and continued right to the privileges and possessions that are bound up with it. As he sheds his disguise of old age and low status to reveal that he is home, his supporters respond by shedding similarly constraining states of weakness and despair brought about by Odysseus' absence, and each is restored to a state of flourishing strength by the presence of the other.
This mutuality is reflected in the tokens Odysseus uses to
 
prove his identity, which express the nature of the characters to whom they are displayed as well as Odysseus' own nature. His nurse, Eurycleia, knows who he is when she notices a scar on his thigh. This scar was received in a fight with a boar that was Odysseus' first adult exploit, a defining rite of passage. That fight was undertaken as part of his relationship with his grandfather Autolycus, the master trickster who gave Odysseus his significant name. But, as the poet pauses to fill in the history of the scar, he also elaborates on Eurycleia's role in Odysseus' naming, noting that she was the one who asked Autolycus to name the baby and thus identifying her as a kind of surrogate mother for Odysseus. Odysseus convinces his father, Laertes, by identifying a series of trees on the family estate; in the process, he recalls the time when Laertes gave those trees to him, evoking his father's role in passing on their ancestral possessions. What convinces Penelope is Odysseus' knowledge of a secret built into their marriage bed, something that is meaningful as a token only if it is shared between them.
Odysseus' first reunion is with his son, Telemachus, who becomes his most trusted ally, and this, along with the prominence given to Telemachus in the opening sequence of the narrative, shows how vital to Odysseus' success is the presence of his son. In the aristocratic world of the Homeric hero, the legacy of power and prestige passed on through the male line is an essential element of selfhood. Heroes are constantly identified by patronymics, as sons of their fathers, and they become who they are by living up to their paternal heritage. And their own accomplishments are fully satisfying only if that heritage can be passed on to a son who will preserve and extend it. The
 
individual hero's life is only fulfilled if he has reason to hope that, after his death, he will be replaced by a son of equal stature and ability, that he will live on in his lineage as well as in his reputation.
When Odysseus makes his extraordinary journey to the Underworld, he is not only able to gain knowledge for himself that mortals normally have no access to, but he also brings with him knowledge of which the dead are normally deprived. He is able to offer Achilles some cheer by reporting to him about the achievements of his son Neoptolemus. Sadly, Odysseus is unable to bring a similar joy to Agamemnon, although Agamemnon's son, Orestes, has in fact distinguished himself as an ideal son, avenging his father's murder and restoring his father's lost honor by killing Aegisthus and Clytemnestra. While Orestes' action is still unknown to Odysseus, it is famous among the Achaeans in Greece, and Orestes with his exemplary loyalty and initiative comes up a number of times as a possible model for Telemachus.
The first such mention of Orestes comes in Book 1, when Athena visits Telemachus and prompts him to take his own journey, in part by urging him to be more like Orestes. Telemachus' journey has the effect of bringing him to a state of self-fulfillment in which he is identified by himself and others as a worthy successor to Odysseus. Part of this process involves literal identification, both in the sense that he is seen doing some of the same things his father does and in the sense that he is identified as Odysseus' son. When he visits the court of Menelaus and Helen he behaves in a way that anticipates his father's behavior among the Phaeacians. Because the rules of hospitality prohibit asking a guest's identity until his essential needs have
 
been taken care of, both father and son are entertained by their hosts while remaining unknown. In parallel episodes, Telemachus and Odysseus give signs of their unusual identities when they react differently from the rest of the company to a story that is being told: in Telemachus' case, Menelaus' reminiscences of the Trojan War and especially of Odysseus; in Odysseus' case, the formal song of the Phaeacian bard, which also concerns the Trojan War. Both father and son respond to these songs with weeping, which they try to hide with a cloak. In the case of Telemachus, this curious weeping leads to the striking moment when Helen breaks out with her spontaneous suggestion that he must be the son of Odysseus:

 
I have never seen Such a resemblance between any two people, Man or woman, as between this man
And Odysseus' son—as I imagine him now— Telemachus. . .
(4.146-50)

When Telemachus returns to Ithaca, he has entered fully into his role as Odysseus' son and the continuer of Odysseus' heritage. But, by the time he does so, Odysseus has managed to return himself and Telemachus does not actually need to play that role. Unlike his Trojan comrades, Odysseus has evaded death and need not gain satisfaction only from the thought of his son carrying on without him. There is a certain tension between the two strands of the Odyssey's plot that corresponds to the psychological tension experienced by fathers and sons as they
 








150
 
manage the tricky but inevitable process by which the son replaces the father. This tension is expressed at certain moments of the narrative but is also resolved as the Telemachus plot is folded into the Odysseus plot and Telemachus is enlisted in his father's cause as his indispensable but subordinate lieutenant. One manifestation of this tension is Odysseus' rather harsh manner during their recognition scene in Book 16. Because Odysseus left Ithaca when Telemachus was still a baby, the two have a relationship that is not based in common experience and there is no token by which they might recall a shared past as with Odysseus' other supporters. Instead, Odysseus establishes his identity through the assurance with which he asserts his paternal authority. Since Odysseus discloses himself through a sudden transformation out of his beggar's disguise, effected by Athena, Telemachus is understandably wary and thinks Odysseus must be himself a god. Odysseus' response is impatient and somewhat belittling.

 
Telemachus, it does not become you to be so amazed That your father is here in this house. You can be sure That no other Odysseus will ever come.
But I am here, just as you see, home at last After twenty years of suffering and wandering.
(16.215-19)

A role is created for Telemachus as Odysseus' equal and future heir but not yet quite his replacement, and this is dramatized most explicitly in the climactic episode of the contest with the bow. Before the suitors have their turn, Telemachus
 

215
 
himself makes an attempt. He is on the verge of succeeding, of doing what otherwise only Odysseus himself can do, when Odysseus gives him a significant nod and he withdraws. This willing withdrawal accomplishes Telemachus' smooth relegation to second place for the time being, and it is in a sense justified in the ensuing battle in which, skillfully as he fights, Telemachus does make a strategic error, leaving open the door to a storeroom where weapons are kept, which allows the suitors to arm themselves. Smoothly as this is accomplished, however, there is a sense beneath the surface of the plot that Telemachus' own growth is hampered by his father's return, his story foreshortened by that of Odysseus' unexpected return. This is manifested in part in Telemachus' somewhat tense relations with Penelope, whose determination to hold out for Odysseus' return makes it harder for Telemachus, now that he is grown, to resolve the situation and take charge of his inheritance. There are even moments in the poem at which Telemachus' interests and those of the suitors seem to be more congruent than opposed.
One of several ways in which Odysseus' return occurs just in the nick of time is that he is able to reassume his position at a point in his life when his son is just mature enough to guarantee the future but is not yet able to eclipse him. At the same time, Odysseus' replacement of his own father is complete, as can be seen from Laertes' somewhat peripheral role in the plot. Laertes has assumed a literally marginal position, leaving the main house for a farm at the edge of their holdings and a state of deathlike destitution. Odysseus only makes contact with him at the end of the story, after his defeat of the suitors, in an episode that seems so much like an afterthought that some have believed that it was
 
not originally part of the Odyssey. The lateness of this reunion can be understood as telling us more about the independence and self-reliance that Odysseus enjoys in the prime of life than about the history of the poem's composition: Laertes' legacy may be essential to Odysseus' success in his greatest trial, but his actual presence is not. At the same time, it is significant that once Odysseus has recovered his house, he does need to reconnect with his father and his base of power in the land before he can deal with the suitors' relatives. Reanimated by Odysseus' return, Laertes becomes once again the warrior he was in his youth and fights with equal vigor beside Odysseus and Telemachus, picking off an enemy leader before Athena calls a halt to the hostilities.
As three generations of the same house form together a victorious fighting force, the poem ends with a kind of pageant of the aristocratic family, in which power and prestige are transmitted in an unbroken succession through the male line. Just before the fighting begins, there is a brief, revealing bit of dialogue among the three. Odysseus warns Telemachus not to shame his ancestors; Telemachus assures him, just a bit testily, that he certainly will not; and Laertes rejoices: "What a day, dear gods! My son and grandson / Going head to head to see who is best" (24.534-35). The rivalries among the generations have been finessed, subsumed into useful competition as the family presents a united front against the outside world.
The three successive heads of Odysseus' family are supported at this point by a small band of loyal servants: the swineherd Eumaeus, the cowherd Philoetius, Dolius, a loyal servant attached to the farm, and Dolius' sons. In describing the loyalty of these figures, the Odyssey takes on and attempts to resolve
 
other tensions within the aristocratic household, those that involve figures who are in a condition of servitude or even actually slaves. In order to maintain the wealth of his household, the master has to depend on the labor of those who are in a position of inequality, a situation that raises difficult questions both about whether they can really be counted on to view their master's interests as their own and about whether their radical inequality is really justified. In its exploration and celebration of the extended household, the Odyssey exemplifies several of the somewhat tangled and contradictory ways of dealing with those questions that run through ancient Greek culture. Ancient discussions of slavery tend to turn on the issue of whether slavery is a natural state—the proper position in the social hierarchy of the naturally inferior—or an accidental one—a stroke of bad fortune—and both views were supported by the actual conditions of the ancient world, in which some people were born into slavery and some became slaves through capture in war. The Odyssey approaches this issue through its own central organizing principle, the rightness of Odysseus' claims to his household. The slaves in the household are divided into good ones and bad ones depending on their loyalty to his cause. The bad ones are those who serve the suitors willingly, especially those female slaves who sleep with the suitors, exemplified in particular by Melantho, who is the lover of their ringleader, and whose evil nature is expressed in her nasty jibes at Odysseus when he is in the role of a beggar. These disloyal slaves display the moral inferiority that later theorists would invoke as a justification for slavery, and they receive harsh punishment for their disloyalty: after the suitors have been killed, the maids are forced to clean up the mess and then Telemachus takes them to the courtyard and
 
subjects them to a painful death by hanging.
The surprising violence of this punishment testifies to the unease created by the need to depend on slaves, especially if they are viewed as inherently depraved. A contrasting solution to that problem is offered though the portrayal of the good slaves of the household, the ones who remain loyal to Odysseus, most prominently Eumaeus and Eurycleia. Eumaeus, in particular, is given a large role in the plot as he welcomes and entertains Odysseus in his hut. During the several conversations between Eumaeus and the disguised Odysseus, Eumaeus displays his inherent virtue through characteristics that are understood to be related: his courteous observation of the laws of hospitality, even when his guest is a broken-down nonentity, and his unwavering loyalty to Odysseus and his family. Eumaeus is an ideal slave, then, in the sense that he adopts his master's interests as his own, but he does not easily fit the image personified by Melantho of slaves as naturally inferior and untrustworthy. The Odyssey manages this contradiction by portraying Eumaeus as not really being a slave. When he and the beggar exchange life stories, it turns out that he is actually an aristocrat by birth, the son of a king who was kidnapped and sold into slavery by a faithless female slave. And his relations with his owners are made to seem more like family relations as he describes how he was raised by Odysseus' mother along with Odysseus' sister.
In general, the Odyssey presents the good slaves of the household— never as actual family members—but as somehow comparable to family members. As mentioned already, Eurycleia functions as a kind of surrogate for Odysseus' mother, Anticleia. Eumaeus stands in a relation to Telemachus like that of a
 
surrogate father, as is suggested by a simile expressing his joy on Telemachus' return from his journey.

And as a loving father embraces his own son
Come back from a distant land after ten long years,	20
His only son, greatly beloved and much sorrowed for—

So did the noble swineherd clasp Telemachus And kiss him all over—
(16.19-23)

When, just before the bow contest, Odysseus reveals himself to Eumaeus and Philoetius, he acknowledges their fidelity by promising them a status that, again, resembles incorporation into the family: "I will give you each a wife, property, / And a house built near mine. You two shall be / Friends to me and brothers to Telemachus" (21.221-23).


THE FAME OF PENELOPE

But the most important relationship through which Odysseus establishes and maintains his identity is with his wife, Penelope. One of the most impressive features of the Odyssey is that, despite its portrayal of a male-dominated world and its allegiance to its male hero, Penelope turns out to be fully as important and interesting a character as Odysseus—a feature of the poem that is
 
apparent in recent criticism, which has been intensely concerned with Penelope and the interpretive issues raised by her role. The poem's domestic focus gives prominence to the figure of the wife, whose activities are confined to the household, and to forms of heroism other than the physical strength and courage required on the battlefield or on the high seas, qualities of mind that a woman could possess as much as a man. Penelope is Odysseus' match in the virtues that the Odyssey portrays as most important: cleverness, self-possession, and patient endurance. Her mêtis is revealed in the famous trick with which she keeps the suitors at bay for several years leading up to the time of the Odyssey's action. Telling them that she cannot marry any of them until she has woven a shroud for her father-in-law, Laertes, she weaves by day and secretly unweaves at night. This trick, which works until she is betrayed by those disloyal female slaves, is a brilliant use of the resources available to her in a world in which women's activities are severely restricted and closely watched. She uses both the woman's traditional activity of weaving and the woman's traditional role of serving the men of her family to her advantage.
The marriage of Odysseus and Penelope is based, then, in like- mindedness, a quality designated in Greek by the term homophrosynê, which suggests both a similar cast of mind, in this case a similar wiliness, and a congruence of interests, in this case a similar dedication to the cause of Odysseus' return. Odysseus celebrates homophrosynê in one of his most eloquent speeches, when he meets the Phaeacian princess, Nausicaa, on the shore of Schería and approaches her with flattering words. He concludes by wishing her a successful marriage:
 

 
And for yourself, may the gods grant you Your heart's desire, a husband and a home, And the blessing of a harmonious life.
For nothing is greater or finer than this, When a man and woman live together With one heart and mind, bringing joy To their friends and grief to their foes.
(6.183-89)

The Odyssey celebrates this vision but also shows how hard it is to fulfill. For Nausicaa, it will not come true with the alluring stranger who describes it, however much both she and her father may be struck by Odysseus' suitability as a husband for her. Odysseus' heart is set on returning to Penelope, but re-creating the harmonious life he has shared with her is a far from straightforward undertaking. The very cautiousness that unites Odysseus and Penelope makes them unusually wary of one another, keeping them at a distance during much of the Odyssey's narrative. Odysseus brings to his treatment of Penelope a suspicion of women in general that transcends her particular and highly virtuous character and reflects a hero's unsettling dependence on his wife. A hero's honor is affected not only by his own actions but by what he can less easily control, his wife's fidelity. The Trojan War itself is undertaken to defend the honor of a Greek leader, Menelaus, whose honor is compromised when his wife, Helen, goes off with the Trojan prince, Paris. The ambitions of those who follow him not only to win glory in the war there but to return home as well depend on the cooperation of a wife who will maintain that home, seeing to their affairs and
 





185
 
keeping open a place for her husband to return to. The importance of this is expressed in the terrible counter-example of Clytemnestra, Helen's sister, whose infidelity has led to Aegisthus' murder of Agamemnon and usurpation of his kingdom.
The male heroes of the Odyssey view Clytemnestra's behavior as an expected norm and a reason to mistrust all women, as Agamemnon makes clear when he sees Odysseus in the Underworld and warns him not to fall into the same trap. And, however faithful she may be, Penelope does expose Odysseus to danger through the attraction she holds for the suitors, the opportunity she provides for his rivals to take control of his house. This pervasive anxiety about women is fully expressed in the more fantastic realm of Odysseus' adventures. There he has to combat a range of female monsters: the huge, voracious queen of the cannibal Laestrygonians; the deadly, disgusting alternatives of Scylla and Charybdis; the devious Sirens, who lure sailors to death with beautiful songs. And he has to overcome the seduction of female figures who threaten to deflect him from his course, such as Circe, Calypso, and the Phaeacian princess, Nausicaa. Yet one of Odysseus' many gifts is his rapport with women, and he succeeds because he is able to convert potentially destructive female figures into his helpers, often with the help of Athena, a figure who herself represents female power used to uphold male endeavors.
Despite Penelope's virtue, Odysseus approaches her with great caution, disguising himself from her as carefully as from the suitors. The result is an extended stretch of narrative in which husband and wife deal with each other indirectly, each testing the
 
other in conversations that are tailored to his ostensible identity as a wandering beggar, especially in a meeting by the fire late in the evening before the contest. A strong sympathy develops between them, as he recounts a meeting he supposedly once had with Odysseus and she describes the difficulties of her situation, tells him of a dream that seemingly foretells the defeat of the suitors, and confides her intention of setting the contest of the bow. Throughout this episode it remains unclear how we should understand Penelope's state of mind as she responds to the stranger with increasing openness and makes the crucial decision that allows him to succeed. A number of critics, bearing in mind Penelope's own intelligence and the many hints Odysseus gives, have concluded that she must realize, or at least suspect, who he really is. Others see her as finally bowing to the pressures around her at just the moment when the husband she has been waiting for is finally home.
The question of whether or not Penelope recognizes Odysseus before he reveals himself cannot be conclusively answered, and that in itself is significant: the poem replicates for its audience the sense of uncertainty about what a woman is really thinking that was, for the male heroes of the Homeric world, a constant source of anxiety. And the interactions between Odysseus and Penelope while he is still in disguise are revealing about both of them. For Odysseus, maintaining his disguise in the face of Penelope's anguish and uncertainty is the greatest test of his self-control and the clearest demonstration of his protective hardness of heart. Moved by the supposed beggar's false tale of having seen Odysseus, Penelope breaks down in tears, but Odysseus stays in his role.
 

 
So her lovely cheeks coursed with tears as she wept For her husband, who was sitting before her.
Odysseus pitied her tears in his heart,
But his eyes were as steady between their lids As if they were made of horn or iron
As he concealed his own tears through guile.
(19.224-29)

As she weeps at the thought of her absent husband and gives voice to her feelings, we gain a deeper understanding of what Penelope has had to contend with. In particular, she reveals a wrenching conflict between her roles as wife of Odysseus and mother of Telemachus. As long as Telemachus was small, those roles were congruent, but now that he has grown, his interests are no longer supported by her determination to hold out against a new marriage. She describes this sense of conflict through a simile that is also an allusion to a surprisingly violent myth: the myth of the nightingale, who killed her own son.

. . . at night, when sleep takes hold of others, I lie in bed, smothered by my own anxiety, Mourning restlessly, my heart racing.
Just as the daughter of Pandareus, The pale nightingale, sings sweetly
In the greening of spring, perched in the leaves, And trills out her song of lament for her son, Her beloved Itylus, whom she killed unwittingly, Itylus, the son of Zethus her lord—
 



225







































540
 
So too my heart is torn with dismay. Should I stay here with my son
And keep everything safe and just as it is, My goods, my slaves, my high-gabled house,
Honoring my husband's bed and public opinion— Or should I go with whoever is best
Of all my suitors, and gives me gifts past counting? And then there's my son. While he was young
And not yet mature, he kept me from leaving My husband's house and marrying another.
But now that he's grown and come into manhood, He begs me to leave, worried because
These Achaean men are devouring his goods.
(19.563-84)

Odysseus' refusal to end her uncertainty is certainly cruel, and perhaps needlessly so, but it does allow the poem to show how much Penelope has suffered at home during Odysseus' long years away. Penelope's experience, too, supports the Odyssey's claim that the rewards of a happy ending are deepened by the many trials that must be endured before it can come true.
In the end, Penelope proves even more cautious than Odysseus about embracing those rewards—and certainly more cautious than Odysseus himself expects her to be. The Odyssey's plot takes an unexpected turn when Odysseus, having dispatched the suitors, announces his presence to Penelope and she refuses to recognize him, claiming she is unsure that he is really Odysseus. For a hero who has so carefully planned and controlled the scenario of his return, this is a startling and
 

545








550








555
 
frustrating development. By withholding her acknowledgment, Penelope shows that she is as self-con- trolled as Odysseus and exercises her control over Odysseus' homecoming just at the point when he thought it was assured, in a response that reminds us how much his success has depended on her all along. And she only grants that acknowledgment after she has provoked him into losing his own self-control, devising a brilliant test of his identity that brings their long-suspended marriage back to life.
When Odysseus has finally given up hope and asks for a bed to be made up so he can get some sleep at last, Penelope seizes this opportunity, slyly commanding Eurycleia to move their marriage bed out into the hall. At this, Odysseus breaks down. It turns out that he built that bed himself when he built his house and used a rooted olive tree as one of the bedposts. For it to be moved would have involved not only Penelope letting someone else into the bedroom but a feat of superhuman strength from a successful rival: the suggestion is a devastating threat to his honor and his identity. As he bursts out with an account of how he made the bed, he confirms that identity, through his knowledge of the secret, through his account of himself as an expert craftsman who has shaped both his physical surroundings and his fate, and through the passion of his reaction. By using the bed as her test, Penelope also reveals her own fidelity, for it would be useless as proof if she had let any one else in on the secret. The marriage bed then becomes the symbol and the means of restoring a marriage that is equally constructed by a powerful husband and a powerful wife. The rooted nature of the bed expresses not only the permanence of the marriage despite their long separation but also the continuity of the property which they
 
both share and she has helped to protect.
The shared love behind the equally important but different roles of Odysseus and Penelope in keeping their marriage alive is expressed in a simile that marks the moment when Penelope finally lets down her guard and accepts Odysseus' return.

And as he wept he clung to his beloved wife.

 
Land is a welcome sight to men swimming
For their lives, after Poseidon has smashed their ship In heavy seas. Only a few of them escape
And make it to shore. They come out
Of the grey water crusted with brine, glad To be alive and set foot on dry land.

So welcome a sight was her husband to her.
(23.239-46)

The trials that Penelope has weathered at home are identified with Odysseus' adventures at sea.
The importance of Penelope's role is confirmed again in the last book of the Odyssey. There the scene shifts once more to the Underworld, where the ghosts of the dead suitors arrive with the news of Odysseus' triumph. Agamemnon, who has played the role of Odysseus' foil throughout the poem, offers a final comment on how differently Odysseus' story has turned out, and he attributes this—not to Odysseus' extraordinary talents and efforts—but to his success in winning a good wife.
 

240








245
 

 
Well done, Odysseus, Laertes' wily son! You won a wife of great character
In Icarius' daughter. What a mind she has,
A woman beyond reproach! How well Penelope Kept in her heart her husband, Odysseus.
And so her virtue's fame will never perish, And the gods will make among men on earth A song of praise for steadfast Penelope.
(24.199-206)

Agamemnon here comes close to saying that Penelope, not Odysseus, is the real hero of the Odyssey, the one who makes its happy ending possible and the one who earns the reward of undying celebration in song.

THE LIMITS OF HEROISM
The Odyssey never loses its focus on the heroism of its central character, on the exceptional achievement of a man who resembles the gods in his ability to evade death and overcome the passage of time, who succeeds miraculously in achieving his desires and solving his own and others' problems. But Agamemnon's tribute to Penelope is one example of the several ways in which the poem also gives credit to those who are Odysseus' inferiors in gender, age, breadth of experience, and social status. In doing so, it opens up a challenge, not only to Odysseus' individual claims to greatness and autonomy, but also to the ideology of aristocratic, male superiority on which those
 



120








125
 
claims partly rest. The Odyssey brings in the voices and outlooks of these other characters, letting us see that there are other stories to be told than the one that it itself has chosen. The loyal characters are portrayed as having the same interests as Odysseus and therefore happy to cooperate in his return, but we do get hints of a point of view from which being an accessory to Odysseus' success might not be altogether desirable: in indications that Telemachus' development is thwarted by Odysseus' return; in the glimpses Penelope gives of how much it has cost her psychologically to remain forever faithful; in Nausicaa's unfulfilled fantasies of having Odysseus marry her and settle down in Phaeacia; in Calypso's bitter disappointment when she learns she has to let Odysseus go. While failing to wish for Odysseus' return is presented as unforgivable disloyalty, we see the outlines of other possible solutions as "Telemachus and Penelope begin to figure out what to do if Odysseus does not come back. We can detect, under the surface, the possibility of another perspective, according to which it might not be so terrible for these characters to get on with their lives. At times, even the suitors, with their hopes of succeeding to Odysseus' seemingly abandoned prerogatives, seem not to be altogether unreasonable, and they are not all made to appear as reckless and vile as their ringleaders.
With the Odyssey's stress on domestic life comes an interest in the lives and activities of ordinary people, such as the swineherd Eumaeus. In this way, the poem departs a little from the assumptions of heroic epic and looks forward across many centuries to the modern novel, in which people of no particular distinction claim attention as the heroes of their own lives—the
 
preeminent example being Leopold Bloom, who takes over the role of Odysseus in James Joyce's Ulysses. This can be seen even in connection with Telemachus, whose experiences are much more humdrum than Odysseus', involving mostly a brief trip to the mainland and a series of social interactions with old family friends, but are presented as comparable to Odysseus' and also worthy of interest. With Penelope, whose actions are few and whose trials are largely psychological, the poem hints—most explicitly in the simile quoted above—that the inner life of feelings might be as compelling and significant as the external arena of male heroic actions.
As Odysseus' home becomes a prize that must be won with the utmost skill and daring, the ordinary objects and experiences that are to be found there take on a special power and value. The routine activities of a household become important moments in the plot: Nausicaa is able to help Odysseus when he arrives on Schería because she has gone to the shore to do the family's laundry; Odysseus' entry into his house in disguise is marked by the response of an old hunting dog lying on a dung pile, who knows his master's smell and dies of joy; when Eurycleia performs the household ritual of washing a guest's feet, she recognizes Odysseus unexpectedly and his careful plans are nearly derailed; the night before the contest of a bow, a serving woman who is staying up late to grind wheat gives voice to her thoughts, and this provides Odysseus with a welcome omen. Throughout the Odyssey, there is an appreciative interest in the concrete details of places and things. The architecture of Odysseus' house is fully described, as the plan included in this volume reflects, as is that of Eumaeus' hut. Even the fantasy
 
realm of the adventures is presented in concrete terms—so much so that generations of travelers have imagined they could retrace Odysseus' journey through the Mediterranean, using the Odyssey as a kind of guide.
In its attention to Eumaeus and other humble characters, and in Odysseus' adoption of the persona of a luckless beggar, the Odyssey stresses the shared conditions of human life and even suggests that aristocratic status may be more a matter of chance than of merit. While in that beggar's role, Odysseus himself, speaking to one of the more sympathetic suitors, describes














The loyal, upright members of Odysseus' household express a similar sensitivity to the randomness of fortune, which they link to their concerns for Odysseus in his absence, speculating that he must somewhere be in the same tough circumstances as the
 
beggar in their midst. In fact, the poet plays with this awareness in his virtuous characters, making it seem as if they might recognize Odysseus because of it. In Book 19, during Odysseus' conversation with Penelope by the fire, Penelope asks Eurycleia to wash the beggar's feet in terms that sound for a moment as if she knows who he is:

 
Eurycleia, rise and wash your master's—that is, Wash the feet of this man who is your master's age. Odysseus' feet and hands are no doubt like his now, For men age quickly when life is hard.
(19.388-91)

A central virtue in the Odyssey is the ability to see another person as potentially like oneself, and this ethic of similitude is reflected in its distinctive use of the poetic figure of the simile. Both of the Homeric epics are marked by their use of these extended comparisons, but they employ them very differently. In the Iliad, similes tend to juxtapose the world of battle to some quite different realm of experience, such as the activities of wild animals or those of peaceful farmers and herdsmen. The Odyssey, on the other hand, is notable for similes that bring together the experiences of different characters in the poem, such as the ones already quoted in which Eumaeus is compared to a father like Odysseus or in which Penelope struggling with the suitors is compared to Odysseus at sea.
And yet, while Eurycleia shows her virtue through the way she connects the beggar's fate with Odysseus', it is through a glimpse of his scar that she actually recognizes him. However
 





390
 
plausible as an image of what might be expected, Odysseus' state of worn-out destitution is not his real condition but his disguise, and the story he tells of a loss of fortune and status is a false one designed to maintain that disguise. Through the motif of disguise, the Odyssey preserves a distinction between Odysseus and ordinary mortals, making hardship, decline, and even old age into temporary states that he can discard at will and that do not describe his true nature. As Athena's maneuvers throughout the poem indicate, disguise is frequently a divine strategy, and his use of it sets Odysseus apart as just that much closer to the gods than other humans.
Odysseus constantly takes risks—including the risks involved in doing without his illustrious name and status—out of a sense of confidence and control. Similarly, the Odyssey itself takes the risk of incorporating challenges to its own dominant viewpoint because it can keep them under control, subordinating them to a plot that is dedicated to Odysseus and his claims. Telemachus' ability to replace his father is deferred to a future beyond the horizon of this poem. Eumaeus and Philoetius, honored and treasured as they are, are never really on an equal footing with Odysseus' actual family. After Odysseus and Penelope celebrate their reunion with a night of love- making and storytelling, he reasserts the traditionally separate roles of husband and wife, instructing her to guard the possessions in the house and remain silently in her room while he goes out to meet his father and deal with the suitors' relatives. Odysseus' dominance over his household as over the poem that tells his story is never really in doubt.
The Odyssey is able to tell a story of such assured dominance
 
in part because of its domestic focus, because it identifies its plot with the stage in Odysseus' history at which he is recovering his home. It is only at home that a hero can expect the kind of total acceptance and steady deference that Odysseus receives from his loyal supporters. In the world beyond, he is subject to constant competition with other men who are his peers and who have their own powerful home bases. On the battlefield and in the military camp, heroes constantly challenge one another and jockey for position, never able to stake a permanent claim to preeminence. Because the Odyssey begins long after the Trojan expedition has dispersed, Odysseus is relatively free from this need to compete and the groups of men who do challenge him can be portrayed as acting improperly. The inappropriateness of such challenges grows in proportion to Odysseus' proximity to home. The young men of Phaeacia, who try to draw him into an athletic contest, are portrayed as simply rude, but the companions on his journey, who are his Ithacan subjects as well as his comrades in arms, are portrayed as wrongly insubordinate, although the poem also displays some unease about their fate, an awareness that they are, in a sense, sacrificed to Odysseus' success. The first lines of the Odyssey involve a nervous insistence on the companions' guilt, and Odysseus' solitary return is depicted throughout as a hardship, although it is also the source of his distinction and fame. The poem also displays some unease about the suitors, but much less, because they bring the competition of the outside world to his home where it does not belong. It is because the suitors have transgressed against his rights to his own home that Odysseus' triumph over them can be both glorious and clearly just.
 
Not only, then, does the Odyssey portray the most accomplished of heroes, it also shapes his story in such a way as to present him at the height of his accomplishments, ridding his home of rivals in a feat that combines the military mastery of the battlefield with the justice and security that are only found at home. This portrait is completed through a shrewd choice of where to close: the poem concludes before Odysseus has settled into the quiet retirement that represents the reward of his achievements but also the end of his heroic career and, with it, the end of his story as material for heroic poetry. The Odyssey signals the homebound quality of its plot through its final episode, the aborted battle with the suitors' relatives. As Odysseus and his supporters move beyond the borders of his estate to take on yet another hostile force, Odysseus seems to be on the brink of one more adventure. But, as Athena's intervention makes clear, pressing on would mean risking key elements of his greatness: the unqualified support of the Olympian gods and a peaceful old age surrounded by a harmonious and flourishing people.


HISTORY AND THE POETIC TRADITION

This careful choice of an end point, like the equally careful choice of a starting point, is one of many ways in which the Odyssey shows its self-consciousness about storytelling as a sophisticated craft. Odysseus himself is a master storyteller, who is at several points compared to a professional bard and who fully
 
recognizes the effectiveness of an artfully shaped narrative. In addition to his great account of his adventures at Alcinous' banquet—which Alcinous finds so well told that he concludes Odysseus could not possibly be a liar—Odysseus tells many invented stories while on Ithaca, each carefully tailored to its audience and designed with a particular aim in mind. Many other characters tell stories: Nestor and Menelaus tell Telemachus about their own and others' experiences returning from Troy; Helen and Menelaus tell him stories about Odysseus in Troy; both Penelope and one of the suitors tell the story of her trick with the shroud, and after their reunion, Penelope tells Odysseus the story of all she suffered in his absence. There are also two professional singers in the poem, the Ithacan bard Phemius and the Phaeacian bard Demodocus, and the songs of Demodocus are described at some length. The pointed arrangement of these internal narratives within the larger plot is a defining feature of the Odyssey and serves as a means by which the poem represents its own relationship to history and to the larger poetic tradition out of which it comes.
We know that the Odyssey is the product of a long poetic tradition that developed over several periods of early Greek history, all of which have left their mark on the poem. The Trojan legend, with its tales of disaster and destruction for both the defeated Trojans and the victorious Greeks, is a mythic account of the end of the first stage of ancient Greek history, which is known as the Bronze Age, after the widespread use of bronze (rather than iron, which was not yet in common use), or the Mycenaean period, after the city of Mycenae, one of the main power centers of that era. Mycenaean civilization developed in
 
the centuries after 2000 B.C.E., which is approximately when Greek-speaking people first arrived in the area at the southern end of the Balkan peninsula that we now know as Greece. Those Greek speakers gradually established there a rich civilization dominated by a few powerful cities built around large, highly organized palaces. These palaces were at once fortified military strongholds and centers for international trade, in particular trade with the many islands located in the Aegean Sea, to the east of the Greek mainland. On the largest of those islands, the island of Crete, there was already flourishing, by the time the Mycenaeans arrived in Greece, a rich and sophisticated civilization, known as Minoan civilization, by which the Mycenaeans were heavily influenced and which they came ultimately to dominate.
From the Minoans the Mycenaeans gained, along with many other crafts and institutions, a system of writing: a syllabary, in which each symbol stands for a particular syllable, as opposed to an alphabet, in which each symbol stands for a particular sound. The Mycenaeans adapted for writing Greek the syllabary which the Minoans used to write their own language, a language which, although we have examples of their writing, still has not been identified. This earliest Greek writing system is known to present-day scholars as Linear B, and archaeologists excavating on Crete and at various mainland centers including Mycenae and Pylos have recovered examples of it incised on clay tablets. These tablets contain not—as was hoped when they were found
—political treaties, mythological poems, or accounts of religious rituals—but detailed accounts of a highly bureaucratic palace economy: inventories of grain or livestock, lists of palace functionaries assigned to perform such specialized roles as
 
"unguent boiler," "chair-maker," or "bath-pourer."
Mycenaean civilization reached its height at about 1600 B.C.E., and came to an end in a series of natural disasters and political disruptions about 400 years later, around 1200 B.C.E. We do not really know what happened, but all of the main archaeological sites show some evidence of destruction, burning, or hasty abandonment at about that time, and a sharp decline thereafter in the ambition and complexity of their material culture. Among these is the site of Troy itself, which was discovered in the late 19th century by Heinrich Schliemann, who followed the topographical details given in the Iliad; through this discovery, Schliemann both vindicated the historical validity of Homer and helped to found the field of archaeology.
Related in some way to the disruptions that ended the Bronze Age was the emergence of a new group of Greek speakers as the dominant people on the mainland. The classical Greeks referred to these people as the Dorians and believed that they had invaded Greece from the north. Modern historians are uncertain whether they were new migrants or people already present in Greece who newly came to power in the upheavals of this period. In any case, many people left the mainland as a consequence and moved east, settling on various islands of the Aegean and along the coast of Asia Minor, in the area that is now western Turkey but which then became, in its coastal region, as much a part of the Greek world as was the mainland itself. Both the Greeks who remained on the mainland and those who migrated to Asia Minor lived in conditions that involved less wealth and less highly organized concentrations of political and military power than were characteristic  of  the  Mycenaean  period.  Their  period  is
 
traditionally known as the "Dark Age" because their physical remains suggest a less magnificent level of civilization and because we know relatively little about it, although recent work in archaeology is increasing our knowledge and revealing more evidence of prosperity and artistic achievement than had previously been available. One result of the transition to the Dark Age was that writing, which was probably practiced in the Mycenaean period only by a small class of professional scribes, fell out of use, and the Greeks became once again a culture without writing. On the other hand, they had always relied, and they continued to rely, on oral communication as their central means of recalling, preserving, and transmitting the historical memories, religious beliefs, and shared stories that in our culture would be committed to writing—or now to various forms of electronic media. In particular, the Greeks of Asia Minor, known as the Ionians, developed a tradition of heroic poetry, through which they recalled their own history, looking back and recounting the experiences of that earlier lost era. This poetry centered on certain legendary figures and events, among them the events surrounding the Trojan War, which, as mentioned earlier, appear to reflect the final moments of Mycenaean civilization.
The so-called Dark Age came to an end during a period roughly corresponding to the eighth century—the 700s—B.C.E. The cultural shift that we label the end of the Dark Age and the beginning of the Archaic period involved not a series of upheavals, as with the end of the Bronze Age, but the emergence of new activity in a variety of fields. A growth in population led to a wave of colonization, with established Greek centers sending out colonies to such places as the Black Sea, Sicily, southern
 
Italy, and southern France. There was also greater contact among the various Greek communities, which were politically distinct and remained so for centuries. This led to the development of institutions designed to unite those communities culturally and to reinforce a shared Greek, or panhellenic, heritage, such as the oracle of Apollo at Delphi and the Olympic games (founded in 776 B.C.E.). Around this time, the Greeks began to build large- scale stone temples and to make large-scale statues and a new kind of pottery decorated with elaborate geometric patterns. Many of the features of Greek culture that we associate with the Classical Period—the period that loosely corresponds to the fifth and fourth centuries B.C.E.—had their origins in the eighth century.
In addition to colonization, this was also a time of increased trade and thus of greater contact with other Mediterranean cultures. One consequence of this trade was the renewal of contacts, which had been intensive in the Mycenaean period, with cultures of the Near East. Through their dealings with the Phoenicians, a Semitic people living in present-day Lebanon, the Greeks learned a new system of writing—not a syllabary like Linear B, but an alphabet, the alphabet which is still used to write Greek and which was adapted to become the Roman alphabet, now widely used for many languages, including English. This new way of writing Greek quickly became much more widespread than Linear B had been, and it was put to a greater variety of uses. Among these was the writing down of poetry, and it is generally believed among scholars (although by no means universally agreed) that the Odyssey and a number of other surviving poems (including the other Homeric epic, the Iliad;
 
two poems by Hesiod, the Theogony and the Works and Days; and a group of hymns also attributed to Homer) came into being in the written form in which we know them at that time.
While we know these poems in written form, we can see in their style and in their narrative techniques traces of their oral origins, although there is considerable disagreement among scholars over how close to those origins these particular works may be. Specifically, these poems manifest a use of repeated elements—phrases, lines, groups of lines, and types of episodes
—that are an essential feature of an oral poet's style. Because a poet who performs orally does not memorize and recite an unchanging artifact but composes his song as he goes at the same rate at which he delivers it, he relies on a supply of stock elements; acquiring that supply is a key aspect of his training. Analysts of Homeric style have discovered that these repeated features form an elaborate system, involving both ready- made whole lines and shorter phrases that allowed the poet easily to generate new lines that fit the meter in which he composed, known as the dactylic hexameter. Among the most striking of these are the phrases used to identify the characters, which link their names with their attributes or their ancestry, and exist in different forms to be used as needed at different places in the line and in different grammatical cases. But the poet's reliance on repetition extends to much larger units as well, including obvious repetition of whole blocks of lines, as when a character reports on an event in the same words in which it was originally narrated, and more subtle uses of repeated sequences of actions to describe such circumstances as a host welcoming a guest or one character visiting another in search of important information.
 
Because repeated elements such as epithets have such a clear usefulness as aids to oral composition, it is hard to be sure how much further significance they are meant to bear in any particular context, although they certainly are meaningful as general expressions of a character's nature. For example, two of the epithets most frequently applied to Odysseus are polumêtis (having much mêtis) and polutlas (enduring much), which clearly pertain to his most defining characteristics, but that does not mean that he is acting especially cleverly at the points at which he is called polumêtis or that he is being particularly patient when he is called polutlas. The question of how integral these repeated elements are to the meaning of Homeric poetry is especially pressing for the translator, who has to decide whether to carry this stylistic feature over into a new language and a poetic form that does not have the same strict metrical rules as Homer's hexameters. The modern translator is also involved in a different relationship between the poem and the audience—not a live performance at which all parties were present at once and at which the conventions of Homeric style were familiar and unremarkable, but a less direct form of communication over large stretches of time and space, mediated through the printed page.
Stanley Lombardo has played down the repetitive dimension of the Greek original more than some other translators do for the sake of a swift narrative pace and of making the characters speak in English as real people do. He has also taken advantage of some of Homer's repetitions for a creative solution to one of the most difficult problems of translation, the way in which there is almost never a single word or phrase that captures what is in the original. The fact that the same expressions occur over and over
 
again gives him a chance to try a range of different versions that cumulatively add up to what is in the Greek. For example, one of the most famous lines in Homeric poetry describes the coming of dawn. This is a routine building block of Homeric poetry, which appears twenty times in the Odyssey and twice in the Iliad, a convenient, efficient way of marking a new phase in the action that comes with a new day. But the announcement of dawn's appearance is made to fill an entire line through the addition of two epithets, which mean "early born" and "rosy-fingered." By offering us several different versions of this line, Lombardo is able to bring out much more fully the many meanings of these wonderfully suggestive adjectives: "Dawn's pale rose fingers brushed across the sky" (2.1); "Dawn came early, touching the sky with rose" (5.228); "Dawn spread her roselight over the sky" (8.1); "Dawn came early, with palmettoes of rose" (9.146); "Light blossomed like roses in the eastern sky" (12.8); "At the first blush of Dawn. . ." (half of 12.324).
The relationship between oral poetry and Homeric style was not fully understood until earlier in this century. A crucial step in this understanding was the comparative work of an American scholar, Milman Parry, who during the 1920s and 1930s studied oral poets who were then still practicing their art in the Balkan region and saw that many of their techniques corresponded to the conventions of Homeric style. For well over a century before Parry's discoveries, scholars had been worrying over the ways in which Homeric poetry is different from later poetry produced through the medium of writing, speculating about how these poems were produced, or what came to be known as "the Homeric question." Much attention was given to inconsistencies
 
between different sections of the narrative or to places in which sections of the narrative seem to be awkwardly joined; for example: the fact that Circe's description to Odysseus of what will happen in the Underworld does not match what actually takes place; the fact that the parallel stories involving Odysseus and Telemachus between the divine council in Book 1 and their reunion in Book 16, while occupying the same span of time, actually involve different numbers of days; the fact that in the Underworld scene in Book 24, a dead suitor claims that Odysseus told Penelope to set the contest of the bow, while in Book 19 she comes up with the idea herself; the way the poem seems to backtrack to start over again with a new divine council when the second part of Athena's plan is put into effect at the beginning of Book 5. These inconsistencies were seen by scholars known as "analysts" as supporting a theory according to which the Odyssey was created through the joining together by editors of several shorter traditional poems composed by illiterate bards: perhaps one about Telemachus, one about Odysseus' adventures, and one about Odysseus' revenge. The analysts were countered by "unitarians," scholars who found in the poem an overall unity of theme and conception that outweighs those inconsistencies and points to a single intelligence shaping the entire work. Parry's discoveries have tended to uphold the unitarian position because they reveal that the kinds of small inconsistencies that concerned the analysts are both common and unimportant in the context of oral performance.
Although the answers to the Homeric question proposed during the 18th and 19th centuries are not generally accepted today, the scholars who wrestled with it helped to show how
 
different these works are from modern poetry, and they recognized early on that an important clue to their origins might be provided by the bards actually portrayed in the Odyssey, Phemius and Demodocus, who perform songs as entertainment for groups of people gathered in aristocratic households. Phemius and Demodocus are like the modern bards studied by Parry in that they perform songs that are at once new and traditional, original retellings of legendary material that is the common property of the singer and the audience. Also like modern oral poets, they display a high degree of responsiveness to their audiences as they give shape to each particular version of a story.
The fact that Demodocus is blind marks the poet as a figure who relies on inner resources. In Homeric terms, that means that he is divinely inspired, instilled by the Muses with knowledge of past events that he has not himself witnessed. For divine inspiration, we might substitute the inherited skills and familiarity with poetic tradition of an oral poet, but in either case those inner resources can be contrasted with the external aid of writing, which is never alluded to in the Odyssey, and only once in the Iliad. Interestingly, ancient legends about Homer, the poet to whom both the Odyssey and the Iliad, along with other poems, were attributed, claim that he was blind, so that he too was seen as both a visionary figure—in myth, prophets are also often blind
—and one who did not write. It should be noted, though, that ancient stories about Homer, like most of the biographical information we have about early Greek poets, are largely fictitious, based mainly on the events of the Odyssey, so that Homer is portrayed as an itinerant beggar resembling the figure impersonated by Odysseus.
 
We have no reliable information about Homer that would allow us to decide whether, for example, he really was responsible for both the Iliad and the Odyssey or just what role he played in the process by which the poems we have came into being. A key step in that process was the point at which the traditions of oral performance intersected with the new practice of writing and the epics took on the written form in which we now know them. One of the main challenges now facing Homeric scholars is that of figuring out to what extent the distinctive qualities of the Iliad and the Odyssey are due to the use of writing. On the one hand, the poems bear all the marks of oral style, which tend to disappear quickly once a poet learns to write. On the other hand, they are far too long to have ever been performed on a single occasion like the ones depicted in the Odyssey, and there is considerable debate about whether the large-scale design and complex structure exhibited by both the Iliad and the Odyssey could have been produced without the aid of writing. And, while most scholars believe that the poems were written down in the eighth century B.C.E., when writing first became available, others argue that this happened later, possibly in Athens in the sixth century B.C.E., where we know that official versions of both epics were produced.
Whenever they were actually written down and however much they may have been shaped by writing, the Homeric epics were still primarily oral works, in the sense that they were regularly performed and were known to their audiences through performance, well into the Classical Period. The process of transmission by which the Iliad and the Odyssey became what they are today, poems experienced almost exclusively through
 
reading, whether in Greek or in translation, is a long and complicated one. It starts with that first, still mysterious moment when the epics were first written down and encompasses many stages of editing and copying: by ancient scholars, especially those working in Alexandria in the third century B.C.E., who were responsible, for example, for the division of both poems into twenty-four books; by medieval scribes, who copied out the manuscripts on which our modern editions are based; and by modern scholars who have produced the texts from which translations like this one are made.
Amid such uncertainty, the idea that Phemius and Demodocus might represent singers of the kind who helped to shape the Odyssey is not implausible. Many of the customs and institutions represented there reflect the times in which the poem and its tradition took shape rather than the earlier period during which the events depicted supposedly occurred. Historians and archaeologists who have compared the culture described in the Homeric epics to what we know of Greek history have discovered that the epics describe a world that does not correlate to any one period but combines elements of the Bronze Age with elements of the Dark Age: memories of the earlier time in which the Trojan legend is set have been woven together with circumstances borrowed from the period during which the Trojan legend evolved. The depictions of daily life that come in the sections of the Odyssey that involve Ithaca or the visit of Telemachus to Sparta and Pylos tend to reflect that later period. The kingdoms depicted there are much smaller and much less highly organized than those of the Mycenaean period, and many details of their material culture and social organization accord
 
more closely to what we know of Dark Age life—a way of life that, we then assume, must have seemed quite familiar to the poem's original audience.
The Odyssey's complicated structure serves as an elegant means of handling this combination of different historical eras. The events of its narrative present are those set in this more mundane world resembling that of the audience, while the events of the Trojan War and its aftermath are treated as part of the past. These past events are placed at a distance as they are conveyed through embedded narratives, such as the songs of Phemius and Demodocus or the reminiscences of figures like Odysseus or like Nestor and Menelaus, who have clearly passed on from that realm of experience to a new life of quiet retirement. The survivors of Troy are like time-travelers, who have spanned several eras. In this way, the Odyssey reflects the notion, expressed more explicitly in other versions of the Troy legend, that the Trojan War marked the end of a distinct age of heroes. Odysseus, in particular, is seen in Phaeacia as living into a time in which he himself, as the subject of heroic song, already belongs to cultural memory. Phaeacia serves as a transition for him chronologically as well as geographically, since it combines elements of both the magical world of the adventures and the realistic world of home. Alcinous' magnificent palace may be influenced by memories of the elaborate palaces of the Minoan and Mycenaean periods, but many of the Phaeacians' customs are similar to those found on Ithaca. When Odysseus leaves the Phaeacians, journeying to Ithaca in a deep sleep, their world is frozen and cut off from the rest of humanity as if permanently consigned to the inaccessible past. The Phaeacians no longer
 
perform the service of taking travelers on their way; their ship turns to stone; and their city is—perhaps— walled off behind a mountain.
The Odyssey's structure also allows it to integrate material from a wide range of sources and traditions. If the songs of Demodocus and the tales of Nestor and Menelaus are vehicles for elements of the Trojan legend, Odysseus' adventures bring in material adapted from other legends, especially those concerning the journey of the Argonauts—the first sea adventurers of Greek myth, who followed their leader, Jason, on a quest for the Golden Fleece in the region of the Black Sea—and also from a rich heritage of folklore. A number of Odysseus' adventures, such as the episodes involving the Cyclops and Circe, are reworkings of traditional folktales. The many different settings of the Odyssey's action, both those of its narrative present and those of its embedded stories, allow for a remarkable range of moods and atmospheres and for illuminating comparisons. Deploying the traditional storytelling tool of the typical episode, the poet uses repeated actions to define the different worlds of the poem in relation to each other.
As mentioned already, the visit of Telemachus to Sparta and the visit of Odysseus to Phaeacia are described in similar terms, and father and son both play the role of guest in the conventional rituals of hospitality. Thus each of them has the experience of receiving gifts from his hosts, but each in a different way that reflects the different significance for each of the transaction. Telemachus is offered by Menelaus a set of gifts that involves three horses, but he declines them on the grounds that Ithaca is no good for pasturing horses. This interaction thus becomes for
 
him an opportunity to display tact in a delicate situation and to express a newly realized identity tied up with his rightful possession of his home. Where Odysseus is concerned, what is most striking is simply how many gifts he gets, how much the process is elaborated, with more gifts, for example, being given in response to his wonderful story. This extensive gift-giving makes an appropriate culmination to an episode in which he recovers his threatened status. Through his success in impressing the Phaeacians, Odysseus makes up for the losses of his Trojan loot on his adventures and of his Ithacan possessions through the suitors' depredations, so that he returns to Ithaca with an important element of his previous power and prosperity already restored.
In yet another setting, when Odysseus visits the Cyclops, he has a host to whom the laws of hospitality mean nothing, so he has to ask for a gift. The Cyclops replies with a taunt that mocks those laws: "Noman I will eat last after his friends. / Friends first, him last. That's my gift to you" (9.367-68). Back on Ithaca, Odysseus as the beggar receives similar treatment from one of the suitors, Ctessipus, who hurls a cow's hoof at him proclaiming that it is a guest-gift. This recurrent motif of the travestied guest- gift sets up a revealing parallel between the Cyclops and the suitors, who are like the Cyclops in their brutality and their endless devouring of what they should not. This is characteristic of the way in which the adventures provide a heightened, fantastic, dreamlike preview of the more realistic world of Ithaca, so that, for example, Penelope is prefigured in certain ways by Circe just as the suitors are by the Cyclops.
That this difference between the two realms is one of poetic
 
style, even genre, is signaled by Odysseus' false tales, in which the true adventures he narrates in Phaeacia are reworked in a more realistic, readily believable form—as the Odyssey playfully subverts familiar expectations about truth and fiction. The false tales work out possible fates that Odysseus or someone like him might have had were he not so extraordinary, were he not fated to go beyond the limits of normal human experience. Through these tales, the poem acknowledges other stories that might have been told about its hero—including some that did come to be told in later times. A distinctive feature of the Odyssey's Odysseus is that, although his story reflects an unmistakable interest in exploration and adventure, that is not part of his character. He is represented by the poet, and presents himself, as burdened by the need to travel and interested only in getting home and staying there. Later poets, most famously Dante and Tennyson, have responded to the stimulus of Odysseus' travels and have turned what is in the Odyssey an unwilled, externally imposed fate into the inner motivation of their Odysseus figures, figures who are not happy to stay home and who need to press on to new worlds and experiences. That way of imagining Odysseus' story is already anticipated in the Odyssey, but only in the form of one of his fictions. As he gives a false account of his origins to Eumaeus, Odysseus portrays himself as a restless adventurer, a survivor of Troy who could only stand to be home for a month before he was off again on a trip to Egypt.
For the most part, we can only guess at the ways in which the Odyssey plays with and comments on the long preexisting tradition of earlier accounts of the same characters and events. That this is not the first telling of Odysseus' story seems clear
 
from the opening of the poem, in which the subject is simply identified as "the cunning hero, / The wanderer, blown off course" (1:1-2), as if the audience knows well who that is; his name is not mentioned until many lines later, in a delay that replicates that hero's defining tactic of withholding his name until the strategic moment. And the very complexity of the narrative suggests that it is the outcome of a history of experimentation.
There can be no doubt that the Odyssey is quite self- conscious about its place in a larger tradition, as it takes pains to fit Odysseus' story into the overall picture of the Greeks' experience after Troy. And we can try to assess its relationship to the one other account of the Trojan legend that does survive from the same period, the Iliad, the poem that was in antiquity attributed to the same author. An English scholar of the late 19th century, David Munro, compared the two poems and discovered an interesting phenomenon (now known as Munro's law), which is that there is no overlap in their contents: neither poem recounts any events that are told in the other. This discovery lends itself to several conclusions, such as that the two poems were composed in complete ignorance of each other, but the most likely is that they were designed to complement one another. The Odyssey seems, in fact, to go out of its way to fill in the rest of the story of the Iliad. Not only does it give a comprehensive account of the "Returns" of the Greeks, but it finishes the story of the war itself, recounting events that are implicit but still untold at the end of the Iliad: the death and burial of Achilles and the taking of Troy.
The Odyssey's account of the taking of Troy is not simply a way of supplying information that the Iliad does not, but one more means by which the poem champions its singular hero. This
 
account comes in the context of Demodocus' performances at the court of Alcinous. The first of Demodocus' songs is a curious one because it seems to be a kind of alternate version of the Iliad. While the Iliad focuses on a quarrel between the two major Greek heroes, Achilles and Agamemnon, this song focuses on a quarrel between Achilles and Odysseus. From other sources, we know what this quarrel must have been about, for the two heroes were evidently supposed to have disputed whether Troy would ultimately be taken by biê, or "force," the quality at which Achilles excelled, or mêtis, the quality at which Odysseus excelled. When, as a prelude to identifying himself, Odysseus asks Demodocus for another song and specifies that its subject should be the story of the Trojan Horse, he is implicitly pointing to the resolution of this dispute. Although, as the Iliad recounts, Achilles' might is essential to the Trojan defeat, especially through his killing of Hector, the city is only taken in the end through the trick contrived by Odysseus and Athena, the infiltration of the city by a band of men hidden within a huge statue of a horse, one more example of Odysseus' masterful use of disguise. In having Demodocus sing, at Odysseus' request, a kind of alternative Iliad concerned with the opposition between Achilles and Odysseus, the Odyssey sets up a competition with both the Iliad and its hero that Odysseus wins. Achilles is famous for the choice he has to make between kleos, glory won at war, and nostos, homecoming. Odysseus, the Odyssey tells us, is the hero who does not have to make that choice, who manages to have it all—thanks to his remarkable mind, his mêtis, as described in a poem that is as clearly focused, as wide-ranging, as varied, and as subtle as he is.
 
Sheila Murnaghan University of Pennsylvania
 
NOTE ON THE TEXT

NOTE ON THE TEXT

The translation is based on the Greek text of W. B. Stanford, The Odyssey, 2nd edition, London and New York, 1967. Stanford's text itself is based on T. W. Allen's Oxford Classical Text. Line numbers in the margins of the translation and in the appendixes refer to the translation. Line numbers of the Greek text appear in the translation in brackets at the top of the page.
 

ODYSSEY


BOOK 1

SPEAK, MEMORY—
 







Of the cunning hero,
 
ODYSSEY
 
The wanderer, blown off course time and again After he plundered Troy's sacred heights.
Speak
Of all the cities he saw, the minds he grasped,
The suffering deep in his heart at sea	5
As he struggled to survive and bring his men home But could not save them, hard as he tried—
The fools—destroyed by their own recklessness When they ate the oxen of Hyperion the Sun,
And that god snuffed out their day of return.	10
Of these things,
Speak, Immortal One,
And tell the tale once more in our time.
 
By now, all the others who had fought at Troy—
At least those who had survived the war and the sea—
Were safely back home. Only Odysseus	15
Still longed to return to his home and his wife. The nymph Calypso, a powerful goddess— And beautiful—was clinging to him
In her caverns and yearned to possess him.
The seasons rolled by, and the year came	20
In which the gods spun the thread
For Odysseus to return home to Ithaca, Though not even there did his troubles end, Even with his dear ones around him.
All the gods pitied him, except Poseidon,	25
Who stormed against the godlike hero
Until he finally reached his own native land.

But Poseidon was away now, among the Ethiopians, Those burnished people at the ends of the earth—
Some near the sunset, some near the sunrise—	30
To receive a grand sacrifice of rams and bulls. There he sat, enjoying the feast.
The other gods
Were assembled in the halls of Olympian Zeus, And the Father of Gods and Men was speaking.
He couldn't stop thinking about Aegisthus,	35
Whom Agamemnon's son, Orestes, had killed:

"Mortals! They are always blaming the gods For their troubles, when their own witlessness
 
Causes them more than they were destined for!
Take Aegisthus now. He marries Agamemnon's	40
Lawful wife and murders the man on his return Knowing it meant disaster—because we did warn him, Sent our messenger, quicksilver Hermes,
To tell him not to kill the man and marry his wife,
Or Agamemnon's son, Orestes, would pay him back	45
When he came of age and wanted his inheritance. Hermes told him all that, but his good advice Meant nothing to Aegisthus. Now he's paid in full."
Athena glared at him with her owl-grey eyes:
"Yes, O our Father who art most high—	50
That man got the death he richly deserved, And so perish all who would do the same. But it's Odysseus I'm worried about,
That discerning, ill-fated man. He's suffered
So long, separated from his dear ones,	55
On an island that lies in the center of the sea, A wooded isle that is home to a goddess,
The daughter of Atlas, whose dread mind knows All the depths of the sea and who supports
The tall pillars that keep earth and heaven apart.	60
His daughter detains the poor man in his grief, Sweet-talking him constantly, trying to charm him Into forgetting Ithaca. But Odysseus,
Longing to see even the smoke curling up
From his land, simply wants to die. And yet you	65
Never think of him, Olympian. Didn't Odysseus
 
Please you with sacrifices beside the Greek ships At Troy? Why is Odysseus so odious, Zeus?"
Zeus in his thunderhead had an answer for her:
"Quite a little speech you've let slip through your teeth,	70
Daughter. How could I forget godlike Odysseus? No other mortal has a mind like his, or offers Sacrifice like him to the deathless gods in heaven. But Poseidon is stiff and cold with anger
Because Odysseus blinded his son, the Cyclops	75
Polyphemus, the strongest of all the Cyclopes, Nearly a god. The nymph Thoösa bore him, Daughter of Phorcys, lord of the barren brine,
After mating with Poseidon in a scalloped sea-cave.
The Earthshaker has been after Odysseus	80
Ever since, not killing him, but keeping him away From his native land. But come now,
Let's all put our heads together and find a way To bring Odysseus home. Poseidon will have to
Put aside his anger. He can't hold out alone	85
Against the will of all the immortals."

And Athena, the owl-eyed goddess, replied:

"Father Zeus, whose power is supreme, If the blessed gods really do want
Odysseus to return to his home,	90
We should send Hermes, our quicksilver herald, To the island of Ogygia without delay
 
To tell that nymph of our firm resolve
That long-suffering Odysseus gets to go home. I myself will go to Ithaca
To put some spirit into his son—
Have him call an assembly of the long-haired Greeks And rebuke the whole lot of his mother's suitors.
They have been butchering his flocks and herds. I'll escort him to Sparta and the sands of Pylos So he can make inquiries about his father's return And win for himself a name among men."

Athena spoke, and she bound on her feet The beautiful sandals, golden, immortal, That carry her over landscape and seascape On a puff of wind. And she took the spear,
Bronze-tipped and massive, that the Daughter uses To level battalions of heroes in her wrath.
She shot down from the peaks of Olympus To Ithaca, where she stood on the threshold Of Odysseus' outer porch. Holding her spear, She looked like Mentes, the Taphian captain, And her eyes rested on the arrogant suitors.

They were playing dice in the courtyard, Enjoying themselves, seated on the hides of oxen
They themselves had slaughtered. They were attended By heralds and servants, some of whom were busy Blending water and wine in large mixing bowls, Others wiping down the tables with sponges
 




95








100










105








110










115
 
And dishing out enormous servings of meat.

Telemachus spotted her first.
He was sitting with the suitors, nursing His heart's sorrow, picturing in his mind
His noble father, imagining he had returned And scattered the suitors, and that he himself, Telemachus, was respected at last.
Such were his reveries as he sat with the suitors. And then he saw Athena.
He went straight to the porch, Indignant that a guest had been made to wait so long. Going up to her he grasped her right hand in his
And took her spear, and his words had wings:

"Greetings, stranger. You are welcome here.
After you've had dinner, you can tell us what you need."

Telemachus spoke, and Pallas Athena Followed him into the high-roofed hall. When they were inside he placed her spear In a polished rack beside a great column Where the spears of Odysseus stood in a row. Then he covered a beautifully wrought chair With a linen cloth and had her sit on it
With a stool under her feet. He drew up An intricately painted bench for himself
And arranged their seats apart from the suitors So that his guest would not lose his appetite In their noisy and uncouth company—
 

120










125










130











135








140








145
 
And so he could inquire about his absent father. A maid poured water from a silver pitcher
Into a golden basin for them to wash their hands And then set up a polished table nearby.
Another serving woman, grave and dignified, Set out bread and generous helpings
From the other dishes she had. A carver set down Cuts of meat by the platter and golden cups.
Then a herald came by and poured them wine.

Now the suitors swaggered in. They sat down In rows on benches and chairs. Heralds Poured water over their hands, maidservants
Brought around bread in baskets, and young men Filled mixing bowls to the brim with wine.
The suitors helped themselves to all this plenty, And when they had their fill of food and drink, They turned their attention to the other delights, Dancing and song, that round out a feast.
A herald handed a beautiful zither
To Phemius, who sang for the suitors, Though against his will. Sweeping the strings He struck up a song. And Telemachus, Putting his head close to Pallas Athena's
So the others wouldn't hear, said this to her:

"Please don't take offense if I speak my mind. It's easy for them to enjoy the harper's song, Since they are eating another man's stores Without paying anything—the stores of a man
 








150










155








160








165










170
 
Whose white bones lie rotting in the rain
On some distant shore, or still churn in the waves. If they ever saw him make landing on Ithaca They would pray for more foot speed
Instead of more gold or fancy clothes.
But he's met a bad end, and it's no comfort to us When some traveler tells us he's on his way home. The day has long passed when he's coming home. But tell me this, and tell me the truth:
Who are you, and where do you come from? Who are your parents? What kind of ship Brought you here? How did your sailors
Guide you to Ithaca, and how large is your crew? I don't imagine you came here on foot.
And tell me this, too. I'd like to know, Is this your first visit here, or are you
An old friend of my father's, one of the many Who have come to our house over the years?"

Athena's seagrey eyes glinted as she said:

"I'll tell you nothing but the unvarnished truth. I am Mentes, son of Anchialus, and proud of it. I am also captain of the seafaring Taphians.
I just pulled in with my ship and my crew, Sailing the deep purple to foreign ports.
We're on our way to Cyprus with a cargo of iron To trade for copper. My ship is standing Offshore of wild country away from the city,
In Rheithron harbor under Neion's woods.
 



175








180








185








190











195








200
 
You and I have ties of hospitality,
Just as our fathers did, from a long way back. Go and ask old Laertes. They say he never
Comes to town any more, lives out in the country, A hard life with just an old woman to help him. She gets him his food and drink when he comes in From the fields, all worn out from trudging across The ridge of his vineyard plot.
I have come Because they say your father has returned,
But now I see the gods have knocked him off course. He's not dead, though, not godlike Odysseus,
No way in the world. No, he's alive all right.
It's the sea keeps him back, detained on some island In the middle of the sea, held captive by savages.
And now I will prophesy for you, as the gods Put it in my heart and as I think it will be, Though I am no soothsayer or reader of birds. Odysseus will not be gone much longer
From his native land, not even if iron chains Hold him. He knows every trick there is And will think of some way to come home. But now tell me this, and I want the truth: Tall as you are, are you Odysseus' son?
You bear a striking resemblance to him, Especially in the head and those beautiful eyes. We used to spend quite a bit of time together Before he sailed for Troy with the Argive fleet. Since then, we haven't seen each other at all."
 






205










210








215








220








225
 
Telemachus took a deep breath and said:

"You want the truth, and I will give it to you. My mother says that Odysseus is my father. I don't know this myself. No one witnesses
His own begetting. If I had my way, I'd be the son Of a man fortunate enough to grow old at home. But it's the man with the most dismal fate of all
They say I was born from—since you want to know." Athena's seagrey eyes glinted as she said:
"Well, the gods have made sure your family's name Will go on, since Penelope has borne a son like you. But there is one other thing I want you to tell me.
What kind of a party is this? What's the occasion? Some kind of banquet? A wedding feast?
It's no neighborly potluck, that's for sure, The way this rowdy crowd is carrying on All through the house. Any decent man Would be outraged if he saw this behavior."

Telemachus breathed in the salt air and said:

"Since you ask me these questions as my guest— This, no doubt, was once a perfect house, Wealthy and fine, when its master was still home. But the gods frowned and changed all that
When they whisked him off the face of the earth.
I wouldn't grieve for him so much if he were dead,
 

230










235











240








245











250
 
Gone down with his comrades in the town of Troy, Or died in his friends' arms after winding up the war. The entire Greek army would have buried him then, And great honor would have passed on to his son.
But now the whirlwinds have snatched him away Without a trace. He's vanished, gone, and left me Pain and sorrow. And he's not the only cause
I have to grieve. The gods have given me other trials. All of the nobles who rule the islands—
Doulichium, Same, wooded Zacynthus— And all those with power on rocky Ithaca
Are courting my mother and ruining our house. She refuses to make a marriage she hates
But can't stop it either. They are eating us
Out of house and home, and will kill me someday." And Pallas Athena, with a flash of anger:
"Damn them! You really do need Odysseus back. Just let him lay his hands on these mangy dogs! If only he would come through that door now With a helmet and shield and a pair of spears, Just as he was when I saw him first,
Drinking and enjoying himself in our house On his way back from Ephyre. Odysseus Had sailed there to ask Mermerus' son, Ilus, For some deadly poison for his arrowheads. Ilus, out of fear of the gods' anger,
Would not give him any, but my father
Gave him some, because he loved him dearly.
 

255








260








265










270










275








280
 
That's the Odysseus I want the suitors to meet. They wouldn't live long enough to get married! But it's on the knees of the gods now
Whether he comes home and pays them back Right here in his halls, or doesn't.
So it's up to you
To find a way to drive them out of your house. Now pay attention and listen to what I'm saying. Tomorrow you call an assembly and make a speech To these heroes, with the gods as witnesses.
The suitors you order to scatter, each to his own. Your mother—if in her heart she wants to marry— Goes back to her powerful father's house.
Her kinfolk and he can arrange the marriage,
And the large dowry that should go with his daughter. And my advice for you, if you will take it,
Is to launch your best ship, with twenty oarsmen, And go make inquiries about your long-absent father. Someone may tell you something, or you may hear A rumor from Zeus, which is how news travels best. Sail to Pylos first and ask godly Nestor,
Then go over to Sparta and red-haired Menelaus. He was the last home of all the bronzeclad Greeks. If you hear your father's alive and on his way home, You can grit your teeth and hold out one more year. If you hear he's dead, among the living no more, Then come home yourself to your ancestral land, Build him a barrow and celebrate the funeral
Your father deserves. Then marry off your mother. After you've done all that, think up some way
 




285










290








295








300








305








310
 
To kill the suitors in your house either openly Or by setting a trap. You've got to stop
Acting like a child. You've outgrown that now. Haven't you heard how Orestes won glory Throughout the world when he killed Aegisthus, The shrewd traitor who murdered his father?
You have to be aggressive, strong—look at how big And well-built you are—so you will leave a good name. Well, I'm off to my ship and my men,
Who are no doubt wondering what's taking me so long. You've got a job to do. Remember what I said."
And Telemachus, in his clear-headed way: "My dear guest, you speak to me as kindly
As a father to his son. I will not forget your words. I know you're anxious to leave, but please stay
So you can bathe and relax before returning To your ship, taking with you a costly gift, Something quite fine, a keepsake from me, The sort of thing a host gives to his guest."

And Athena, her eyes grey as saltwater:

"No, I really do want to get on with my journey. Whatever gift you feel moved to make,
Give it to me on my way back home,
Yes, something quite fine. It will get you as good."
 






315








320











325








330











335
 
With these words the Grey-eyed One was gone, Flown up and away like a seabird. And as she went She put courage in Telemachus' heart
And made him think of his father even more than before. Telemachus' mind soared. He knew it had been a god, And like a god himself he rejoined the suitors.

They were sitting hushed in silence, listening To the great harper as he sang the tale
Of the hard journeys home that Pallas Athena Ordained for the Greeks on their way back from Troy.

His song drifted upstairs, and Penelope, Wise daughter of Icarius, took it all in.
She came down the steep stairs of her house— Not alone, two maids trailed behind—
And when she had come among the suitors She stood shawled in light by a column That supported the roof of the great house, Hiding her cheeks behind her silky veils, Grave handmaidens standing on either side.
And she wept as she addressed the brilliant harper:

"Phemius, you know many other songs
To soothe human sorrows, songs of the exploits Of gods and men. Sing one of those
To your enraptured audience as they sit Sipping their wine. But stop singing this one, This painful song that always tears at my heart.
 









340










345










350








355










360
 
I am already sorrowful, constantly grieving For my husband, remembering him, a man Renowned in Argos and throughout all Hellas."

 
And Telemachus said to her coolly:

"Mother, why begrudge our singer Entertaining us as he thinks best? Singers are not responsible; Zeus is,
Who gives what he wants to every man on earth. No one can blame Phemius for singing the doom Of the Danaans: it's always the newest song
An audience praises most. For yourself, You'll just have to endure it and listen. Odysseus was not the only man at Troy
Who didn't come home. Many others perished.
You should go back upstairs and take care of your work, Spinning and weaving, and have the maids do theirs.
Speaking is for men, for all men, but for me Especially, since I am the master of this house."

Penelope was stunned and turned to go,
Her son's masterful words pressed to her heart. She went up the stairs to her room with her women And wept for Odysseus, her beloved husband, Until grey-eyed Athena cast sleep on her eyelids.

All through the shadowy halls the suitors Broke into an uproar, each of them praying
To lie in bed with her. Telemachus cut them short:
 

365










370








375










380










385
 

 
"Suitors of my mother—you arrogant pigs— For now, we're at a feast. No shouting, please! There's nothing finer than hearing
A singer like this, with a voice like a god's.
But in the morning we will sit in the meeting ground, So that I can tell all of you in broad daylight
To get out of my house. Fix yourselves feasts
In each others' houses, use up your own stockpiles. But if it seems better and more profitable
For one man to be eaten out of house and home Without compensation—then eat away!
For my part, I will pray to the gods eternal That Zeus grant me requital: Death for you Here in my house. With no compensation."

Thus Telemachus. And they all bit their lips
And marveled at how boldly he had spoken to them. Then Antinous, son of Eupeithes, replied:

"Well, Telemachus, it seems the gods, no less, Are teaching you how to be a bold public speaker. May the son of Cronus never make you king
Here on Ithaca, even if it is your birthright." And Telemachus, taking in a breath:
"It may make you angry, Antinous,
But I'll tell you something. I wouldn't mind a bit If Zeus granted me this—if he made me king.
 





390








395








400











405











410
 
You think this is the worst fate a man can have? It's not so bad to be king. Your house grows rich, And you're held in great honor yourself. But, There are many other lords on seawashed Ithaca, Young and old, and any one of them
Could get to be king, now that Odysseus is dead. But I will be master of my own house
And of the servants that Odysseus left me." Then Eurymachus, Polybus' son, responded:
"It's on the knees of the gods, Telemachus, Which man of Greece will rule this island.
But you keep your property and rule your house, And may no man ever come to wrest them away From you by force, not while men live in Ithaca. But I want to ask you, sir, about your visitor.
Where did he come from, what port
Does he call home, where are his ancestral fields? Did he bring news of your father's coming
Or was he here on business of his own?
He sure up and left in a hurry, wouldn't stay
To be known. Yet by his looks he was no tramp." And Telemachus, with a sharp response:
"Eurymachus, my father is not coming home. I no longer trust any news that may come,
Or any prophecy my mother may have gotten From a seer she has summoned up to the house.
 




415








420











425








430











435
 
My guest was a friend of my father's from Taphos. He says he is Mentes, son of Anchialus
And captain of the seafaring Taphians."

Thus Telemachus. But in his heart he knew It was an immortal goddess.

And now
The young men plunged into their entertainment, Singing and dancing until the twilight hour.
They were still at it when the evening grew dark, Then one by one went to their own houses to rest.

Telemachus' room was off the beautiful courtyard, Built high and with a surrounding view.
There he went to his bed, his mind teeming, And with him, bearing blazing torches,
Went true-hearted Eurycleia, daughter of Ops And Peisenor's grandaughter. Long ago, Laertes had bought her for a small fortune When she was still a girl. He paid twenty oxen And honored her in his house as he honored His wedded wife, but he never slept with her Because he would rather avoid his wife's wrath.
Of all the women, she loved Telemachus the most And had nursed him as a baby. Now she bore
The blazing torches as Telemachus opened The doors to his room and sat on his bed. He pulled off his soft tunic and laid it
 



440













445










450








455








460
 
In the hands of the wise old woman, and she Folded it and smoothed it and hung it on a peg Beside the corded bed. Then she left the room, Pulled the door shut by its silver handle,
And drew the bolt home with the strap.

There Telemachus Lay wrapped in a fleece all the night through, Pondering the journey Athena had shown him.
 



465











470
 

BOOK 2

Dawn's pale rose fingers brushed across the sky, And Odysseus' son got out of bed and dressed. He slung his sharp sword around his shoulder, Then tied oiled leather sandals onto his feet,
And walked out of the bedroom like a god.	5
Wasting no time, he ordered the heralds To call an assembly. The heralds' cries Rang out through the town, and the men
Gathered quickly, their long hair streaming.
Telemachus strode along carrying a spear	10
And accompanied by two lean hounds. Athena shed a silver grace upon him,
And everyone marveled at him as he entered. The elders made way as he took his father's seat.
First to speak was the hero Aegyptius,	15
A man bowed with age and wise beyond telling. His son, Antiphus, had gone off to Troy
In the ships with Odysseus (and was killed In the cave of the Cyclops, who made of him
His last savage meal). Of three remaining sons,	20
One, Eurynomus, ran with the suitors, And the other two kept their father's farm.
But Aegyptius couldn't stop mourning the one that was lost And was weeping for him as he spoke out now:
 
"Hear me now, men of Ithaca.	25
We have never once held assembly or sat In council since Odysseus left.
Who has called us together today?
Which of the young men, or of the elders,
Has such urgent business as this?	30
Has he had news of the army's return, Some early report he wants to tell us about? Or is there some other public matter
He wants to address? He's a fine man
In my eyes, and may Zeus bless him."	35

Telemachus was glad to hear these words, And he rose from his seat, eager to speak. There he stood, in the midst of the assembly, And the herald Peisenor, a wise counselor,
Placed the staff in the hands of Odysseus' son.	40
In his speech he addressed old Aegyptius first:

"You won't have to look very far to find out Who called this assembly. I called it myself. No, I have not had news of the army's return,
Any early report I could tell you about.	45
Nor is there any other public matter
I want to address. It's a private matter,
My own need. Trouble has come to my house In two forms. First, I have lost my noble father.
He was your king once, and like a father	50
To all of you, gentle and kind. And now,
 
There is even greater trouble, far greater, Which will destroy my house and home. Suitors have latched on to my mother,
Against her will, and they are the sons	55
Of the noblest men here. They shrink From going to her father Icarius' house
So that he could arrange his daughter's dowry And give her away to the man he likes best.
Instead, they gather at our house day after day,	60
Slaughtering our oxen and sheep and fat goats, Living high and drinking wine recklessly.
We've lost almost everything, because
We don't have Odysseus to protect our house.
We can't defend ourselves. If it came to a fight	65
We would only show how pathetic we are. Not that I wouldn't defend myself
If I had the power. Things have gone too far.
The ruin of my house has become a public disgrace.
You should all be indignant, and feel shame	70
Before your neighbors, and fear the wrath Of the gods, who may yet turn against you.
I beg you by Olympian Zeus and by Themis, Who calls and dismisses assemblies of men,
Stop this, my friends, and let me be alone	75
In my grief—unless my father, Odysseus, Was your enemy and did you some harm And now you are paying me back in malice By urging these suitors on. Better for me
If you yourselves, Ithacans all,	80
Were to eat up my treasures and flocks.
 
Then I might get restitution someday.
I'd go through the town and bend people's ears
And ask for our goods until they were all given back. But there is nothing I can do now. There's no cure For what you are making me suffer now."

He spoke in anger, bursting into tears As he threw the scepter onto the ground.
The crowd was motionless with pity. No one Had the heart to respond to him harshly, Except Antinous, who now said:

"Well, the big speaker, the mighty orator. You've got some nerve, Telemachus, Laying the blame on us. It's not the suitors Who are at fault, but your own mother,
Who knows more tricks than any woman alive. It's been three years now, almost four,
Since she's been toying with our affections. She encourages each man, leading us on,
Sending messages. But her mind is set elsewhere. Here's just one of the tricks she devised:
She set up a great loom in the main hall And started weaving a sizeable fabric With a very fine thread, and she said to us:

'Young men—my suitors, since Odysseus is dead— Eager as you are to marry me, you must wait
Until I finish this robe—it would be a shame To waste my spinning—a shroud for the hero
 






85










90










95








100










105
 
Laertes, when death's doom lays him low.
I fear the Achaean women would reproach me
If he should lie in death shroudless for all his wealth.'

"We were persuaded by this appeal to our honor. Every day she would weave at the great loom, And every night she would unweave by torchlight. She fooled us for three years with her craft.
But in the fourth year, as the seasons rolled by, And the moons waned, and the days dragged on, One of her women who knew all about it
Told us, and we caught her unweaving
The gloried shroud. Then we forced her to finish it. Now here is the suitors' answer to you,
And let every Achaean hear it as well:
Send your mother away with orders to marry Whichever man her father likes best.
But if she goes on like this much longer, Torturing us with all she knows and has, All the gifts Athena has given her,
Her talent for handiwork, her good sense, Her cleverness—all of which go far beyond That of any of the heroines of old,
Tyro or Alcmene or garlanded Mycene,
Not one of whom had a mind like Penelope's, Even though now she is not thinking straight— We will continue to eat you out of house and home For as long as she holds to this way of thinking Which the immortal gods have put in her breast. She is building quite a reputation for herself,
 



110










115








120








125








130








135
 
But at your expense. As for us, we're staying put Until she chooses one of the Achaeans to marry."

 
Telemachus, drawing a deep breath, responded:

"Antinous, I cannot throw out of my house The mother who bore me and raised me. As for my father, he may be alive or dead But he is not here. It would not be fair
If I had to pay a great price to Icarius,
As I would if I sent my mother back to him
On my own initiative. And the spirits would send me Other evils, for my mother would curse me
As she left the house, and call on the Furies. And men all over would hold me at fault.
So I will never tell my mother to leave. As for you, if you don't like it,
If this offends your sense of fairness,
Get out of my house! Fix yourselves feasts
In each others' houses, use up your own stockpiles. But if it seems better and more profitable
For one man to be eaten out of house and home Without compensation—then eat away!
But I will pray to the gods eternal
That Zeus grant me requital: Death for you Here in my house. With no compensation."

Telemachus spoke, and Zeus in answer
Sent forth two eagles from a mountain peak. They drifted lazily for a while on the wind,
 

140










145








150








155








160
 
Side by side, with wings outstretched.
But when they were directly above the assembly With its hub-bub of voices, they wheeled about And beat their wings hard, looking down
On the heads of all with death in their eyes. Then they savaged each others' craws
With their talons and veered off to the east Across the city and over the houses
Of the men below. Everyone was amazed,
And they all wondered what these birds portended. Then the old hero Halitherses stepped forth, Mastor's son, the best man of his time
In reading bird flight and uttering oracles.
He was full of good will in the speech that he made.

"Hear me men of Ithaca, and I mean
The suitors especially, since a great tide of woe Is rising to engulf them. Odysseus
Shall not be away from his home much longer. Even now he is near, sowing death for the suitors,
One and all, grim for them and grim for many others Who dwell on Ithaca. But let us take thought now Of how to make an end of this. Or better,
Let the suitors themselves make an end. I am no inexperienced prophet,
But one who knows well, and I declare
That everything is coming true for that man, Just as I told him when he left for Troy:
That after bitter pain and loss of all comrades He would finally reach home after twenty years
 

165








170








175










180








185








190
 
Unknown to anyone. Now it is all coming true."

 
Eurymachus, Polybus' son, answered him:

"Get out of here, old man. Go home and prophesy
For your own children—you don't want them to get hurt. I'm a better prophet than you when it comes to this.
There are lots of birds under the sun, flying
All over the place, and not all of them are omens. As for Odysseus, he died a long way from here, And you should have died with him.
Then you wouldn't spout so many prophecies, Or be egging Telemachus on in his anger, Hoping he'll give you a gift to take home.
I'll tell you this, and I guarantee it'll be done: If you, with all your experience and lore, Talk a younger man into getting angry,
First, we'll go harder on him, and second, We'll slap you with a fine so big
It'll make you choke when you have to pay it. And this is my advice to Telemachus:
Send your mother back to her father's house And have them prepare a wedding feast
And all the gifts that go with a beloved daughter. Until then, the sons of the Achaeans will not stop Their bitter courtship. One thing's for sure,
We fear no man, no, not even Telemachus With all his big talk. We don't give a damn
For your prophecies, old man, and when they don't Come true, you'll be more despised than ever.
 

195










200








205








210








215








220
 
And you, Telemachus, your inheritance
Is going down the drain and will never be restored As long as your mother puts off this marriage.
After all, we wait here patiently day after day Competing for her, and do not go after
Other women who might make us good wives." And Telemachus, keeping his wits about him:
"I'm done pleading with you, Eurymachus, And all the rest of you suitors. I've had my say.
Now the gods know all this, and so do the Achaeans. All I want now is a fast ship and twenty men
Who will crew for me as I sail here and there. I'm going to Sparta and to sandy Pylos
For news of my father, who has been long gone. Someone may tell me something, or I may hear
A rumor from Zeus, which is how news travels best. If I hear my father's alive and on his way home,
I can grit my teeth and hold out one more year. If I hear he's dead, among the living no more, I'll come home myself to my ancestral land, Build him a barrow and celebrate the funeral
My father deserves. Then I'll marry off my mother."

He spoke and sat down. Then up rose Mentor, An old friend of Odysseus. It was him,
Old Mentor, that Odysseus had put in charge Of all his house when he left with the ships. He spoke out now with good will to all:
 






225











230








235








240










245
 

 
"Hear me now, men of Ithaca.
Kings might as well no longer be gentle and kind Or understand the correct order of things.
They might as well be tyrannical butchers For all that any of Odysseus' people
Remember him, a godly king as kind as a father. I have no quarrel with the suitors. True,
They are violent and malicious men,
But at least they are risking their own lives In devouring the house of Odysseus,
Who, they say, will never return.
It is the rest of the people I am angry with. You all sit here in silence and say nothing, Not a word of rebuke to make the suitors quit, Although you easily outnumber them."

Leocritus, Evenor's son, answered him:

"What kind of thing is that to say, Mentor, You stubborn old fool, telling us to stop?
And do you think that even with superior numbers People are going to fight us over a dinner?
Even if Odysseus, your Ithacan hero himself Showed up, all hot to throw the suitors
Out of his house—well, let's just say
His wife wouldn't be too happy to see him,
No matter how much she missed him, that's how ugly His death would be. No, you're way off the mark.
Now let's everybody scatter and go home.
 



250








255








260











265








270








275
 
Mentor and Halitherses can outfit Telemachus. They're old friends of his father. But I think He'll be getting his news sitting here in Ithaca
For a long time to come. He's not going anywhere."

 
With those words the brief assembly was over. Everyone returned to their homes, but the suitors Went off to the house of godlike Odysseus.

Telemachus, though, went down to the shore, Washed his hands in the surf, and prayed to Athena:

"Hear me, god of yesterday. You came to our house And commanded me to sail the misty sea
In search of news of my long-absent father. Now the townspeople are blocking all that, Especially the suitors, those arrogant bastards."

He prayed, and Athena was with him,
Looking just like Mentor and with Mentor's voice. Her words flew to Telemachus on wings:

"You won't turn out to be a fool or a coward, Telemachus, not if any of Odysseus' spirit
Has been instilled in you. Now there was a man Who made sure of his words and deeds! Don't worry, You'll make this journey, and it won't be in vain.
If you're really Odysseus' and Penelope's son, You'll finish whatever you set your mind to.
 

280












285










290










295
 
You know, few sons turn out to be like their fathers; Most turn out worse, a few better.
No, you don't have it in you to be a fool or a coward, And you've got something of Odysseus' brains,
So there's reason to think you'll finish this job. Never mind, then, about the suitors' schemes.
They're mad, not an ounce of sense or justice in them, And they have no idea of the dark death
Closing in on them, doomed all to die on a single day. As for you, the journey you have your heart set on Won't be delayed. I myself, your father's old comrade, Will equip a fast ship and sail along with you.
You get the provisions and stow them aboard, Wine in jars and barley meal in tight skins,
Food that will stick to men's ribs. I'll go through town And round up a volunteer crew. There are plenty of ships In Ithaca, old and new. I'll scout out the best one,
Get her rigged, and launch her onto the open sea." Thus Athena, daughter of Zeus.
And Telemachus, the voice of the goddess Ringing in his ears, went on to his house With a troubled heart. There he found
The haughty suitors, flaying goats And singeing swine in the courtyard. Antinous came up to him with a laugh And clasped his hand and said to him:
 

300








305








310








315












320








325
 
"Ah, Telemachus, the dauntless orator, That's the spirit! No hard feelings now! Let's just eat and drink as we always have.
The townspeople will provide you with everything— A ship, a crew—to speed you on to sacred Pylos
In your search for news of your noble father." And Telemachus, drawing in his breath:
"Antinous, there is no way I can relax
Or enjoy myself with you arrogant bastards. Isn't it bad enough that you have eaten through Much of my wealth while I was still a child?
Now that I'm grown, and hear things from others, And get angrier and angrier at what I see and hear, I'm going to do my best to nail you to the wall, Either by going to Pylos or staying here in this land. But I am going, and I'll make the journey count, Even though I have to sail in another man's ship
And can't captain my own, which I'm sure suits you fine."

And he withdrew his hand from Antinous'. The suitors, busy with preparing the feast,
Jeered at him as they swaggered through the hall:

"Hey, everybody! Telemachus is planning to murder us! He'll bring reinforcements from sandy Pylos,
Or even from Sparta. He's really serious.
Or he'll go to Ephyre and get deadly poisons To put in our wine-bowl and kill us all."
 








330











335








340










345










350
 

And another would sneer:

 
"Who knows?
If he goes off wandering in a hollow ship,
He may die as Odysseus did, far from his friends. That would mean more work for us, dividing
All his possessions and giving his house
Over to his mother—and the man she marries."

That's how their talk went. But Telemachus Went down to his father's treasure chamber, A large room where there lay gold and bronze
Piled to the ceiling. And there were clothes in chests, Fragrant olive oil, and great jars of wine,
Old and sweet, an undiluted, heavenly drink, Ranged in rows along the wall, ready for Odysseus Should he ever return after all his suffering.
The close-fitting, double doors were locked, And the room was watched day and night By a wise old stewardess, Eurycleia,
Daughter of Ops, son of Peisenor. Telemachus Had summoned her and now spoke to her there:

"Nurse, siphon me off some wine in jars, The sweetest, mellowest wine we have After what you are holding in reserve For Odysseus, that unlucky man,
Should he ever return from the jaws of death.
 







355










360








365








370










375
 
Fill twelve jars and fit them with lids,
And pour some barley meal into well-sewn skins. I'll need twenty quarts of ground barley meal.
But don't let anyone know. Just have all this Ready to go. I'll pick it up this evening After my mother has gone to bed upstairs. I'm off to Sparta and to sandy Pylos
To see if I can get some news of my father."

He spoke, and Eurycleia gave a shrill cry. She sobbed as her words went out to him:

"Ah, where did you get this idea, child? Why would you want to travel abroad, you, A beloved only son? Zeus-born Odysseus Perished far from home, in a strange land.
These men, as soon as you are gone, will plot To have you killed by treachery, and then divide
All these things among themselves. No, stay here With what is yours. There is no need for you
To wander and suffer on the barren sea."

And Telemachus, in his cool-headed way:

"Don't worry, nurse. There is a god Behind all this. But swear you won't say
Anything to my mother for a dozen days or so, Or until she misses me herself or has heard That I am gone. I don't want her crying."
 








380










385










390










395










400
 
And the old woman swore to the gods That she would say nothing. That done, She drew the wine for him in jars
And poured the barley meal into skins,
While Telemachus went back to join the suitors.

Owl -eyed Athena saw what to do next. Assuming the form of Telemachus,
She went through the town recruiting sailors, Telling them to gather by the ship at dusk.
Then she asked Noemon, Phronius' son, For a fast ship, and he cheerfully agreed.

When the sun set and shadows hung everywhere, She drew the swift ship down to the sea,
Put in all the gear a benched sailing ship needs, And then moored it at the harbor's mouth. The crew
Gathered around, and the goddess encouraged each man.

Then she moved on, making her way
To the house of godlike Odysseus. There She shed sweet sleep on the suitors
And made their minds wander in their wine
And knocked the cups from their hands. Eyelids heavy, They stumbled to their feet and one by one
Staggered through the city home and to bed.

Athena's eyes flashed in the dark.
She looked like Mentor now, and in his voice
 








405










410










415










420










425
 
She called Telemachus out from the hall:

"Telemachus, your crew is ready with the oars And waiting for you. It's time to set forth."

 
Pallas Athena led the way quickly,
And the man followed in the deity's footsteps. They came down to the ship and the sea
And found the crew standing on the beach, Their hair blowing in the offshore breeze. And Telemachus, feeling his father's blood:

"This way, men! We have provisions to haul. Everything's ready at my house. My mother Knows nothing of all this, nor do any
Of the women, except for one I told."

He led the way, and they brought the provisions Down to the ship and stowed them below.
Athena went aboard, followed by Telemachus, And they sat side by side on the stern of the ship As the men untied the cables and then came aboard To sit at their benches. The Grey-eyed One
Put the wind at their backs, a strong gust from the West That came in chanting over the wine-dark water.
Telemachus called to the crew to rig the sail. Falling to, they raised the fir mast,
Set it in its socket, braced it with forestays And hauled up the white sail. The wind Bellied the canvas, and an indigo wave
 



430










435










440








445








450
 
Hissed off the bow as the ship sped on. When they had made all the tackle secure In their swift black ship, they set out bowls Brimming with wine, and poured libations To the immortal gods, most of all
To the daughter of Zeus with seagrey eyes.

The ship bore through the night and into the dawn.
 






455
 

BOOK 3

The sun rose from the still, beautiful water Into the bronze sky, to shine upon the gods And upon men who die on the life-giving earth.

The ship came to Pylos, Nestor's great city.
Onshore, black bulls were being sacrificed	5
To the blue-maned Lord of the Sea. Nine companies of five hundred men
Were each assigned nine bulls for sacrifice.
They had just tasted the innards and were burning
The thigh pieces for the god when the ship	10
Pulled in to shore. The crew furled the sail, Moored the vessel and disembarked.
Telemachus stepped off the ship behind Athena, And the goddess, eyes glinting, said to him:

"There's no need to feel embarrassed, Telemachus,	15
Not at all. This is why you have sailed the sea— To get news of your father, to find out his fate And where the earth conceals him. Come on, now, Go straight up to Nestor. Let's see what he knows.
Ask him yourself, so he'll tell you the truth.	20
Not that he would lie. He's very wise."

And Telemachus, taking in a breath:
 

"How should I go up to him, Mentor, And what should I say? I'm not used
To making clever speeches. And besides,	25
A young man just doesn't question an elder." Athena's eyes glinted in the morning light:
"You'll come up with some things yourself, Telemachus, And a god will suggest others. I do not think
You were born and bred without the gods' good will."	30
Thus Pallas Athena. She led the way quickly, And the man followed in the deity's footsteps. They came to the great company of Pylians And there found Nestor sitting with his sons.
All around him were men preparing for the feast,	35
Skewering meat on spits and roasting it.
But when they saw the new arrivals, they all Crowded around, clasping their hands in welcome And inviting them to sit down. Nestor's son
Peisistratus was first, taking them both by the hand	40
And having them sit down at the feast
On soft fleeces spread on the sandy beach Beside his father and Thrasymedes his brother. Then he gave them servings of the inner organs
And poured wine into a golden cup. Passing it on	45
To Pallas Athena, he spoke directly to her, The daughter of Zeus, who wields the aegis:
 
"Pray now, stranger, to Lord Poseidon,
For it is his feast you have happened upon.
When you have poured libations and have said	50
The ritual prayers, pass the cup of sweet wine On to your friend, so that he too may pour, Since I have no doubt he also prays to the gods. All men have need of the immortal gods.
But he is younger than you, about my age,	55
So to you I will give the golden cup first."

He spoke, and handed her the cup of sweet wine, And Athena rejoiced at his respect for custom
In handing her the golden cup first.
Without hesitation she prayed to Poseidon:	60

"Hear me, Poseidon who laps all the earth, And do not refuse to fulfill my prayer.
Bring renown to Nestor first, and his sons, And grant your grace to all the men of Pylos
In return for this glorious sacrifice.	65
And grant also to Telemachus and to me A safe return home, having accomplished
All that we came for in our swift black ship."

Thus Athena's prayer, which she herself granted.
Then she gave Telemachus the beautiful cup,	70
And Odysseus' true son prayed the same way.
 
The meat was roasted now. They drew it Off the spits and served it up for the feast.
When they had eaten and drunk all that they wanted,
Nestor, the Gerenian horseman, spoke:	75
"It is seemlier to ask our guests who they are Now that they have enjoyed some food with us. Who are you, strangers? Where do you sail from? Are you on some business, or are you adventurers
Wandering the seas, risking your own lives	80
And bringing trouble to men in foreign lands?"

Telemachus felt a sudden surge of courage, Implanted in his heart by Athena herself
So that he would inquire about his absent father
And win for himself a name among men:	85

"Nestor, son of Neleus, glory of the Achaeans, You ask where we are from, and I will tell you. We have come from Ithaca, under Mount Neion, But my business is my own, not the Ithacans'.
I come for news of my father, any news at all	90
About noble Odysseus, who once, they say, Fought beside you and sacked the city of Troy. We have heard where each of the other heroes Who fought the Trojans met his bitter end.
But Zeus has placed Odysseus' death	95
Beyond hope of knowing. No one can say Exactly where Odysseus died,
 
Whether it was on land, overcome by enemies, Or on the deep sea in Amphtrite's waves.
And so I am at your knees, to see if you Can tell me how my father met his end, Whether you saw it with your own eyes, Or heard about it from someone else, Some wanderer. He was born to sorrow, More than any man on earth. And do not, Out of pity, spare me the truth, but tell me
Whatever you have seen, whatever you know. I beseech you, if my father, noble Odysseus, Ever fulfilled a promise he made to you
In the land of Troy, where the Achaeans suffered, Remember it now, and tell me the truth."
And Nestor, the Gerenian horseman, answered: "Ah, my friend, you bring to my mind
The sorrow we bravely endured in that land,
Heroes all and the sons of heroes— Everything we suffered on the misty sea, Looting and plundering wherever Achilles led, And all of our battles around Priam's great city, Where our best were killed. There lies
Ajax, dear to Ares, there great Achilles, There Patroclus, like a god in council, There my own dear son, Antilochus, Strong and swift, a peerless warrior.
And there were many more losses we suffered. No mortal man could recount them all.
 




100








105








110











115








120








125
 
Even if you stayed for five or six years And wanted to hear the whole tale of woe,
You would return home weary before the end. For nine years we devised all sorts of strategies To bring Troy down—which the son of Cronus Scarcely brought to pass. In that effort
No man could match Odysseus for cunning. Your father was the master of all strategies— If indeed you are his son. I am amazed
As I look upon you. The way you speak
Is very much like him. One would not think A younger man could speak so appropriately. Now all that time Odysseus and I
Never disagreed in assembly or council. We had one heart, and with our wisdom
We advised the Argives on the best course to take. But when we had sacked Priam's tall town,
Zeus planned in his heart a bitter journey home For the Greeks—who were not all prudent or just, Which is why the wrath of the Grey-eyed One Brought many of them to an evil end.
She caused a quarrel between Atreus' two sons, Agamemnon and Menelaus. It happened this way: These two called an assembly of the entire army In a reckless manner, toward sunset
And all out of order. We had all been drinking.
They made their speeches, and announced their purpose In assembling the troops. Menelaus wanted
The entire army to set their sights homeward, To begin shipping out on the open sea,
 








130








135








140








145








150








155
 
But this was not at all to Agamemnon's liking. He wanted to delay their departure
And offer formal sacrifice to appease The wrath of Athena—the fool,
He had no idea she would never relent.
The minds of the eternal ones are not quickly turned. So these two stood there exchanging insults,
And the soldiers rose up with one huge roar And took sides. We spent that night Nursing our resentment against each other, For Zeus was bringing on our doom.
At dawn some of us hauled our ships To the bright water and loaded on board
Our goods and our softly belted women. Half of the army held back, remaining With King Agamemnon, son of Atreus,
But half of us embarked and launched our ships, Which pulled away swiftly, for some god
Had made the teeming water smooth as glass. We pulled in to Tenedos and offered sacrifice, Eager to reach home, but Zeus held firm Against our immediate return and stirred up Still more dissension. Some now turned back Their curved ships, following Odysseus,
A wise leader with a flexible mind, Out of respect for Lord Agamemnon. But I fled on with all my ships,
For I knew that Zeus had evil in mind. Diomedes also got his men out then, And Menelaus brought up the rear.
 








160








165








170








175








180








185
 
He caught up with us in Lesbos
As we were debating the long journey ahead, Whether we should sail above rugged Chios And on to Psyria, keeping Chios on our left, Or go below Chios past windy Mimas.
We asked the god to give us a sign And he showed us one, telling us
To cut through the sea straight to Euboea, The sooner to get ourselves out of danger. A shrill wind rose up and started to blow, And the ships flew over the teeming brine. We put in at Geraestus that night,
And, with all that water behind us, We sacrificed many bulls to Poseidon.
On the fourth day Diomedes made Argos, But I held on toward Pylos, and the wind
Did not die down once since it began to blow.

"And so I came home, dear child, knowing nothing Of who survived and who was lost.
But what I have heard sitting here in my halls You too shall hear, as is only right.
The Myrmidons, they say, made it safely home, Led by the son of great-souled Achilles; Philoctetes too; and Idomeneus
Brought back to Crete all of his men
Who survived the war; he lost none at sea. Of Agamemnon you have already heard, Far off though you be, how he came home And how Aegisthus plotted his grisly death
 








190








195








200










205








210
 
And then paid for it in a horrible way. How good it is for a son to be left When a man dies! Agamemnon's son Avenged his death, killing his murderer,
The treacherous Aegisthus. You too, my friend— For I see that you are handsome and tall—
Should be brave and strong, and win a name for yourself." And Telemachus, in his clear-headed way:
"Nestor, son of Neleus, glory of the Achaeans, Truly, Orestes was a son who took vengeance, And the Achaeans will spread his fame
To future generations. I wish the gods Would clothe me in such strength, that I Might take vengeance on the suitors For their transgressions against me.
They are violent and malicious men.
But the gods have spun into the web of my life No such happiness for me or my father,
And so I will simply have to endure." Nestor, the Gerenian horseman, answered:
"Now that you've mentioned it, I recall hearing That a crowd of suitors for your mother's hand, Uninvited by you, are causing you trouble.
Why do you put up with this? Has some god Turned the townspeople against you?
Who knows but that Odysseus may come some day,
 

215








220











225








230











235








240
 
Alone or with an army, and make them pay in blood. Ah, if only grey-eyed Athena chose to love you
The way she did glorious Odysseus In the land of Troy! I have never seen A god show love so openly
As Athena did to him. You could see her Standing at his side! If she would choose To love you like that and take care of you,
Some of those suitors might forget about marriage!" And Telemachus answered him:
"I do not think, sir, this will ever happen. The very thought amazes me. It is too much To hope for, even if the gods willed it."
Then Athena, eyes flashing, put in: "Telemachus, what a thing to say!
It is easy for a god to bring a man safely home, Even from far away. And speaking for myself, I would rather suffer on my homeward journey
Than be killed at my hearth, as Agamemnon was— By the treachery of Aegisthus and of his own wife. But even the gods cannot ward off death,
The great leveler, from a man they love, Not when destiny comes to lay him low."

And Telemachus answered him:
 








245










250













255








260
 
"Mentor, let us speak of this no longer, For all our grief. He cannot return.
The gods have already devised his death. But now I have another question for Nestor, Steeped as he is in knowledge and wisdom. He has been king for three generations
And has the look of an immortal god. Nestor, son of Neleus, tell me this:
How was Agamemnon, son of Atreus, slain? Where was Menelaus? How could Aegisthus Dare to plot the murder of a king, a man
Far more powerful than he himself was?
Was Menelaus not in Argos, and did his absence Encourage Aegisthus to commit the murder?"

And Nestor, the Gerenian horseman:

"Well then, my child, I will tell you all.
You yourself have guessed what would have happened If Atreus' son, red-haired Menelaus,
Had come back from Troy and found Aegisthus Still alive in his halls. His dead body
Would never have been buried in earth; Dogs and birds would have ripped it apart As it lay on the plain far from the city,
Nor would any Greek woman have wept for him,
So monstrous was the crime he planned and committed. While we toiled and sweated over there in Troy,
He relaxed in a corner of bluegrass Argos Sweet-talking the wife of Agamemnon,
 

265








270








275











280








285








290
 
Noble Clytemnestra. At first she refused
The whole sordid affair. She had good sense, And with her was a singer whom Agamemnon, When he left for Troy, had strictly ordered
To guard his wife. But when the gods doomed her To be undone, Aegisthus took the singer of tales To a desert island and left him there
For the dogs and birds. And he led her off, Just as willing as he was, to his own house. Many an ox's thigh he burned on the altars,
Many an offering he made of tapestries and gold When he accomplished the great deed
He had never hoped in his heart to achieve.
Menelaus and I were sailing then
On our way back from Troy, the best of friends. But when we came to holy Sunium,
The cape of Athens, Phoebus Apollo Shot Menelaus' pilot with his arrows, Killing him softly as he held the tiller
Of the speeding ship—Phrontis his name, The best rough-weather pilot in all the world. So Menelaus stopped, eager though he was To press on, and gave his comrade a funeral.
When he got his ships on the deep purple again He made good time to Malea's steep height, But then Zeus put trouble in his way, shearing Blasts of shrill winds down from the sky,
And the waves swelled to the size of mountains. Then he split the fleet into two, bringing some To the part of Crete where the Cydonians live,
 




295








300








305








310








315








320
 
Near the Iardanus river. There is a smooth cliff Sheer to the misty sea on the border of Gortyn, Where the Southwest Wind drives huge waves Against the headland on the left, toward Phaestus. The only breakwater is a small rock offshore.
So, some of the fleet came there. The men Barely escaped with their lives, but the ships Were broken to pieces against the reef.
Five other black ships, though, were blown All the way to Egypt, and Menelaus
Wandered up and down that coast with his ships, A stranger in a strange land, amassing
A fortune in gold and goods. Aegisthus, Meanwhile, was working his evil at home. Having killed the son of Atreus
And subdued the people, he reigned
For seven years in gold-crusted Mycenae. In the eighth year, though, he met his doom
In the person of Orestes, come back from Athens. Orestes killed his father's murderer,
The treacherous Aegisthus, and, having killed him, Invited all the Argives to a funeral feast
For his hateful mother and her craven lover. On that very day Menelaus arrived,
Bearing all the treasure his ships could hold.
So don't you wander long from home, my friend, Leaving your wealth behind, and in your house Insolent men who might divide up your goods
While you are gone on a useless journey. Still, I think you should visit Menelaus,
 




325








330








335








340








345








350
 
For he has just lately returned from abroad, From a country no one would hope to return to Once a storm has driven him off course
Into a sea so wide that not even migrating birds Make the trip more than once a year,
So great is that sea and so terrible.
So then,
Go off now with your ship and your crew. Or if you would rather travel by land,
We have chariots and horses at your disposal. My sons are at your service, ready to guide you
To gleaming Lacedaemon, where Menelaus lives. Beseech him yourself, so he'll tell you the truth. Not that he would lie. He's very wise."

The sun set on his words, and darkness came on. Athena's eyes flashed grey as she said:

"You have told the tale well, old man.
But come, cut the tongues and mix the wine So we can pour libations to Poseidon
And the other gods, and then think of sleep. It is late. Twilight has faded to dark,
And it is not right to linger at feasts of the gods."

Thus Zeus' daughter, and they did as she said. Heralds poured water over their hands
And youths filled bowls to the brim with drink And served it to all, first pouring into each cup
 




355










360








365












370










375
 
A few drops for libation. They cut the tongues, Threw them on the fire, and standing up in turn Poured libations upon them. Having done so, And having drunk to their heart's content, Athena and godlike Telemachus
Both started to head for their hollow ship, But Nestor prevailed upon them to stay:

"God forbid you should go to your ship— As if I were poor and didn't have enough
Cloaks and blankets for myself and my guests
To sleep softly upon! I have plenty of cloaks and blankets, And Odysseus' son shall never lie down
On the deck of a ship while I am alive, Or any child of mine is left in the halls
To entertain strangers who come to my house." And Athena, her eyes flecked with dark gold:
"Well spoken, old friend, and Telemachus Would do well to accept your invitation.
It is better that way. So he will go with you To sleep in your house, but I will go back
To the black ship and have a word with the crew To raise their spirits. I am the only
Older man among them. They are all youngsters, Telemachus' age, and sail with us as friends.
I will spend this night down there by the ship, But at dawn I am off to the Cauconians
To collect an old debt, and not a small one at that.
 




380










385








390











395








400
 
But send this young man on his way
In a chariot, and send your son with him, And the fastest, strongest horses you have."

Thus Athena, her eyes flashing in the dark, And as she left they saw only a vulture Beating its long, dusky wings.
Their jaws dropped And the old man could scarcely believe his eyes. He grabbed Telemachus' hand and said to him:

"If you have gods as escorts when you are so young, I do not think you will turn out badly at all!
This was no other of the Olympian gods But the daughter of Zeus, Tritogeneia, Most glorious Athena, who also honored Your noble father among the Argive forces. Be gracious, Lady, and grant me renown— Me, my sons, and my venerable wife.
And in return I will sacrifice to you
A yearling heifer, broad of brow and unbroken, Which no man has ever led beneath the yoke. And I will plate her horns with gold for sacrifice."

Thus Nestor, and Pallas Athena heard his prayer. Then the old Gerenian horseman led his sons And daughters' husbands to his beautiful palace,
Where they sat down in rows on benches and chairs. The housekeeper opened a jar of wine
Eleven years old. The old man mixed a bowl
 

405










410











415








420










425








430
 
Of this sweet wine, and as he poured libations He prayed over and over to Pallas Athena, Daughter of Zeus who holds the aegis.

 
When they had all poured libations And drunk wine to their hearts' content,
They went home to their houses to take their rest. But Nestor told Telemachus to sleep
Under the echoing portico on a corded bed Next to Peisistratus, a good man with a spear And the only of Nestor's sons still unmarried. Nestor himself slept in an inner room
With his wife, the lady of the house, beside him.

As soon as Dawn appeared in the sky Nestor, the Gerenian horseman, rose And went to sit on the polished stones Outside his high doors, the white stones, Glistening with oil, upon which of old Neleus would sit, like a god in counsel. Neleus had met his fate long ago
And gone down to Hades' undergloom, And now upon these stones in his turn Sat Nestor of Gerenia, holding a scepter.
His sons came out and gathered about him, Echephron and Stratius and Perseus, Aretus and godlike Thrasymedes,
And as the sixth, the hero Peisistratus. And they brought godlike Telemachus
 



435








440










445








450








455
 
And had him sit beside Gerenian Nestor, Who then spoke:

 
"Quickly now, my sons, That I may propitiate Athena,
Who came to me at the feast of the god As clear as day. One of you go to the plain For a heifer, and have the cowherd
Drive her here speedily. Let another go
To the black ship of great-hearted Telemachus And bring his crew, leaving only two behind. And someone go fetch the goldsmith Laerces To plate the horns of the heifer with gold.
The rest of you stay here, and have the serving women Prepare a feast throughout our glorious halls,
And bring seats, plenty of logs, and fresh water."

Thus Nestor, and they all set to work. The heifer Came from the plain, and from the sailing ship Came Telemachus' crew. The smith came
With the tools of his trade, a bronze hammer, An anvil, and a pair of well-made tongs
With which he wrought gold. And Athena came To accept the sacrifice.
 



460








465








470










475
 
Nestor, the old charioteer, Gave the smith gold, and the smith worked it
And leafed it around the heifer's horns
To make the goddess rejoice at the offering. Stratius and Echephron led the heifer up
By the horns, and Aretus came from the chamber
 




480
 
Carrying water for their hands in a basin Embossed with flowers. In his other hand he held A basket of barley. Thrasymedes stood by
With a sharp axe to strike down the heifer,
And Perseus held the blood-bowl. Nestor began The washing of hands and sprinkling of barley, Praying hard to Athena as he cut the first hairs From the victim's head and threw them on the fire. These rites done, high-hearted Thrasymedes Came up and struck. When the axe severed
The sinews of the neck, and the heifer collapsed, The women raised the ritual cry, Nestor's daughters, The wives of his sons, and his august wife, Eurydice, eldest of Clymenus' daughters.
Then the men raised the heifer's head from the ground And held it for Peisistratus to cut the throat.
When the black blood had flowed out, and the life Left the bones, they butchered the heifer,
Jointing the thigh pieces in ritual order
And covering them with a double layer of fat And with bits cut raw from the rest of the carcass. These the old man burned on split logs
And poured bright wine over them. At his side Were young men holding five-tined forks.
When the thigh pieces were burned and the innards tasted, They carved up the rest, skewered the pieces,
And roasted them holding the spits in their hands.

Meanwhile, Telemachus was being bathed
 



485








490








495








500








505








510
 
By Polycaste, Nestor's youngest daughter.
When this lovely girl had bathed him, rubbed him with oil, And thrown on his shoulders a tunic and cloak, Telemachus came forth like an immortal god
And took his seat beside Nestor, shepherd of the people.

When they had roasted the meat and drawn it Off the spits, they sat down and feasted,
Waited upon by worthy men who poured their wine Into golden cups. When they had enough
To eat and drink, Gerenian Nestor spoke:

"My sons, yoke the combed horses to the chariot So that Telemachus may begin his journey."

He spoke, and they did as he said,
Quickly yoking the horses. The housekeeper Placed in the chariot bread and wine
And the sort of fare kings and lords eat. Telemachus mounted the beautiful chariot, And Peisistratus, Nestor's son,
Stepped in beside him and took the reins. He flicked the lash and the horses took off, Eating up the plain and leaving behind them The high rock of Pylos. All day long
They jostled the yoke that held them together.

As the sun set and the world grew dark
They came to Pherae and pulled up at the house Of Diocles, son of Ortilochus,
 






515










520











525








530










535
 
Himself a son of the river Alpheus. There they spent the night, and Diocles Gave them the hospitality due to guests.

When Dawn brushed the pale sky with rose, They yoked the horses, stepped up into
The inlaid chariot and drove out through the gate And echoing portico. Peisistratus
Flicked the lash and the horses took off.
When they reached the level, wheat-bearing plains They kept pushing on—so strong were their horses— Until the sun set and the world grew dark.
 




540










545
 

BOOK 4

They came to the hollows of Lacedaemon And drove to Menelaus' palace,
Which they found filled with guests. Menelaus Was hosting a double wedding party
For his son and his daughter. He was sending her	5
To wed the son of Achilles, as he had promised Long ago in Troy, and now the gods
Were bringing the marriage to pass.
He was sending her off with horses and chariots
For her journey to the city of the Myrmidons,	10
Over whom her husband-to-be was lord. For his son he was bringing a bride From Sparta, the daughter of Alector.
This son, Megapenthes, was born from a slave woman,
For the gods had made Helen barren	15
After the birth of her daughter Hermione, Who had the beauty of golden Aphrodite. So Menelaus' kinsfolk and neighbors Were feasting in the great hall. A bard
Was singing and playing the lyre,	20
And two tumblers whirled among the guests And led them in the dancing.
Telemachus And Nestor's son halted their horses At the gate, and Eteoneus,
 
Menelaus' right-hand man, came out and saw them	25
And went through the hall to bring the news To the shepherd of the people. He stood
At Menelaus' shoulder and his words flew fast:

"Two strangers have arrived, Lord Menelaus,
Two men in the line of Zeus by their looks.	30
Should we unyoke their horses, or should we Send them elsewhere for hospitality?"

And red-haired Menelaus, greatly displeased:

"It's not like you to talk nonsense like this,
Eteoneus. How many times have you and I	35
Enjoyed the hospitality of others,
Hoping that Zeus would someday put an end To our hard traveling? Unyoke their horses And bring our new guests in to the feast."

He spoke, and Eteoneus hurried through the halls,	40
Calling other attendants to come along with him. They unyoked the sweating horses and tied them At the stalls, where they threw before them
A mixture of spelt and white barley. They leaned
The chariot against the gleaming entrance walls	45
And led the men into the palace. Their eyes Went wide as they looked around the mansion Of this sky-bred king, for a light as of the sun Or the moon played over the high-roofed home
Of glorious Menelaus. When they had taken it all in,	50
 
They went into the polished tubs. When the maids Had bathed them and rubbed them down with oil, And clothed them in tunics and fleecy cloaks, They sat down on chairs beside Menelaus.
A maid poured water from a golden pitcher	55
Into a silver basin for them to wash their hands And then set up a polished table nearby.
Another serving woman, grave and dignified, Set out bread and served generous helpings
From the other dishes she had; a carver set down	60
Cuts of meat by the platter and golden cups; And a herald came by and poured them wine. Then red-haired Menelaus said in greeting:
"Enjoy yourselves and eat. After supper
We will ask who you are—your bloodlines	65
Have not been lost in you. You belong
To the race of men who are sceptered kings, Bred from Zeus. You're not just anybody."

And he set before them the prime cut of roast beef
That had been served to him as a mark of honor.	70
They helped themselves to the feast before them, And when they had enough of food and drink, Telemachus spoke to Nestor's son, holding
His head close so the others wouldn't hear:

"Do you see all this, Peisistratus, my friend,	75
These echoing halls flashing with bronze, With gold, amber, silver, and ivory?
 
This must be what the court of Olympian Zeus Looks like. This is unimaginable wealth!"

 
Menelaus, the red-haired king, overheard him, And, speaking to both of them, had this to say:

"No mortal man could challenge Zeus, my boys. His halls and possessions are everlasting.
My wealth may be matched by another man's Or maybe not. For it is true I brought home Shiploads after wandering for eight hard years. Cyprus, Phoenicia, Egypt—I went all over, Came to the Ethiopians, the Sidonians,
The Erembi, even to Libya,
Where the lambs have horns soon after they're born. The ewes give birth three times a year there,
And neither shepherd nor lord ever runs short
Of cheese, meat or milk; the flocks are milked year round. While I wandered through those lands amassing wealth My brother was murdered, caught off guard
By treachery and the guile of his accursed wife. So I do not enjoy being lord of this wealth.
You may have heard of all this from your fathers, Whoever they may be, for I suffered greatly
And saw my house ruined, with all its treasures. I would gladly live with a third of my wealth And have those men back who perished in Troy
Far from the bluegrass pastures of Argos. And yet, Though I weep for them often in my halls,
Easing my heart, I do not grieve constantly—
 

80










85








90








95








100








105
 
A man can get too much of chill grief.
I miss them all, but there is one man I miss More than all the others. When I think of him I don't want to sleep or eat, for no one
In the entire Greek army worked as hard As Odysseus, and all he ever got for it Was pain and sorrow, and I cannot forget
My sorrow for him. He has been gone so long, And we do not know whether he is alive or dead. Old Laertes must mourn for him, Penelope too, And Telemachus, who was an infant when he left."

His words roused in Telemachus the desire To weep for his father. Hot tears
Fell from his eyes when he heard his father's name, And he pulled his purple cloak over his face.
Seeing this, Menelaus wondered Whether he should allow Telemachus
To bring up his father himself, or whether
He should draw him out with pointed questions.

While Menelaus pondered this,
Helen came from her fragrant bedroom Like gold-spindled Artemis. Adraste,
Her attendant, drew up a beautiful chair for her, And Alcippe brought her a soft wool rug.
Another maid, Phylo, brought a silver basket— A gift from Alcandre, wife of Polybus,
Who lived in Thebes, the city in Egypt
 








110








115










120










125








130
 
That has the wealthiest houses in the world. Polybus had given Menelaus two silver baths, Two tripods, and ten bars of gold.
And his wife, Alcandre, gave to Helen Beautiful gifts of her own—a golden spindle And a silver basket with gold-rimmed wheels. This basket Phylo now placed beside her, Filled with fine-spun yarn, and across it
Was laid the spindle, twirled with violet wool. Helen sat upon the chair, a footstool
Under her feet, and questioned her husband:

"Do we know, Menelaus, who our guests Claim to be? Shall I speak my mind or not? My heart urges me to speak. I have never seen Such a resemblance between any two people, Man or woman, as between this man
And Odysseus' son—as I imagine him now— Telemachus, who was a newborn baby
When for my sake, shameless thing that I was, The Greeks came to Troy with war in their hearts."
And Menelaus, the red-haired king: "Now that you mention it, I see
The resemblance myself—the feet, the hands, The way he looks at you, that head of hair.
And just now when I was talking about Odysseus, Saying how much he went through for my sake, Tears welled up in his eyes, bitter tears,
 




135








140










145








150











155
 
And he covered his face with his purple cloak." At this Nestor's son Peisistratus spoke up:
"Menelaus, son of Atreus, Zeus-bred king, This is indeed, as you say, Odysseus' son.
But he is prudent and would not think it proper, When he just got here, to make a big speech Before you—whose voice delights us as a god's. Nestor of Gerenia sent me with him as a guide, For he was eager to see you, hoping that
You could suggest something he could do or say. A son has many problems to face at home
When his father is gone and there is no one else To help him. So it is now with Telemachus, Whose father is gone, and there is no one else Among the people to keep him from harm."
And Menelaus, the red-haired king: "What's this? Here in my house, the son
Of my dear friend who did so much for me! I used to think that if he came back
I would give him a welcome no other Greek Could ever hope to have—if Olympian Zeus Had brought us both home from over the sea In our swift ships. I would have given him
A city of his own in Argos, built him a house, Brought him over from Ithaca with his goods, His son and all of his people—a whole city
 

160











165








170










175










180








185
 
Cleared out just for him! We would have been together, Enjoying each other's company, and nothing
Would have parted us until death's black cloud Finally enfolded us. But I suppose Zeus himself Begrudged us this, for Odysseus alone,
That unlucky man, was never brought home."

His words aroused in all of them
A longing for lamentation. Argive Helen, A child of Zeus, wept; Telemachus wept; And Menelaus wept, the son of Atreus. Nor could Nestor's son keep his eyes dry, For he remembered Antilochus,
His flawless brother, who had been killed By Memnon, Dawn's resplendent son, And this memory gave wings to his words:

"Son of Atreus, old Nestor used to say, Whenever we talked about things like this, That no one could match your understanding. So please understand me when I say
That I do not enjoy weeping after supper— And it will be dawn before we know it.
Not that I think it's wrong to lament the dead. This is all we can do—cut our hair
And shed some tears. I lost someone myself At Troy, my brother, not the least hero there. You probably knew him. I am too young
Ever to have seen him, but men say Antilochus Could run and fight as well as any man alive."
 








190










195








200










205








210
 

And Menelaus, the red-haired king:

 
"No one could have put that better, my friend, Not even someone much older. Your speech, Wise and clear, shows the sort of father you have. It's easy to spot a man for whom Zeus
Has spun out happiness in marriage and children, As he has done for Nestor throughout his life.
And now he has reached a sleek old age in his halls, And his sons are wise and fight with the best.
So we will stop this weeping, and once more Think of supper. Let the servants pour water Over our hands. Telemachus and I will have Much to say to each other come morning."

So he spoke, and Asphalion, Menelaus' attendant, poured water Over their hands, and they reached out
For all the good cheer spread out before them.

But Helen, child of Zeus, had other ideas. She threw a drug into the wine bowl
They were drinking from, a drug That stilled all pain, quieted all anger
And brought forgetfulness of every ill. Whoever drank wine laced with this drug Would not be sad or shed a tear that day, Not even if his own father and mother
 

215








220








225










230










235
 
Should lie there dead, or if someone killed His brother, or son, before his eyes.
Helen had gotten this potent, cunning drug From Polydamna, the wife of Thon,
A woman in Egypt, where the land Proliferates with all sorts of drugs, Many beneficial, many poisonous. Men there know more about medicines Than any other people on earth,
For they are of the race of Paeeon, the Healer. When she had slipped the drug into the wine, Helen ordered another round to be poured, And then she turned to the company and said:

"Menelaus, son of Atreus in the line of Zeus, And you sons of noble fathers, it is true
That Zeus gives easy lives to some of us
And hard lives to others—he can do anything, after all— But you should sit now in the hall and feast
And entertain yourselves by telling stories. I'll start you off. I couldn't begin to tell you All that Odysseus endured and accomplished, But listen to what that hero did once
In the land of Troy, where the Achaeans suffered.
First, he beat himself up—gave himself some nasty bruises— Then put on a cheap cloak so he looked like a slave,
And in this disguise he entered the wide streets Of the enemy city. He looked like a beggar, Far from what he was back in the Greek camp, And fooled everyone when he entered Troy.
 



240








245








250










255








260








265
 
I alone recognized him in his disguise
And questioned him, but he cleverly put me off. It was only after I had bathed him
And rubbed him down with oil and clothed him And had sworn a great oath not to tell the Trojans Who he really was until he got back to the ships, That he told me, at last, what the Achaeans planned. He killed many Trojans before he left
And arrived back at camp with much to report. The other women in Troy wailed aloud,
But I was glad inside, for my heart had turned Homeward, and I rued the infatuation Aphrodite gave me when she led me away From my native land, leaving my dear child, My bridal chamber, and my husband,
A man who lacked nothing in wisdom or looks." And Menelaus, the red-haired king:
"A very good story, my wife, and well told. By now I have come to know the minds
Of many heroes, and have traveled far and wide, But I have never laid eyes on anyone
Who had an enduring heart like Odysseus. Listen to what he did in the wooden horse, Where all we Argive chiefs sat waiting
To bring slaughter and death to the Trojans. You came there then, with godlike Deiphobus. Some god who favored the Trojans
Must have lured you on. Three times you circled
 




270








275








280











285








290








295
 
Our hollow hiding place, feeling it
With your hands, and you called out the names Of all Argive leaders, making your voice Sound like each of our wives' in turn.
Diomedes and I, sitting in the middle With Odysseus, heard you calling And couldn't take it. We were frantic
To come out, or answer you from inside, But Odysseus held us back and stopped us. Then everyone else stayed quiet also,
Except for Anticlus, who wanted to answer you, But Odysseus saved us all by clamping
His strong hands over Anticlus' mouth
And holding them there until Athena led you off." Then Telemachus said in his clear-headed way:
"Menelaus, son of Atreus in the line of Zeus, It is all the more unbearable then, isn't it?
My father may have had a heart of iron, But it didn't do him any good in the end. Please send us to bed now. It is time
We rested and enjoyed some sweet sleep."

He spoke, and Helen of Argos told her maids
To place beds on the porch and spread upon them Beautiful purple blankets and fleecy cloaks.
The maids went out of the hall with torches And made up the beds, and a herald
Led the guests out to them. So they slept there
 








300








305










310










315










320
 
On the palace porch, the hero Telemachus And Nestor's glorious son. But Menelaus slept In the innermost chamber of that high house Next to Helen, Zeus' brightness upon her.

Dawn brushed her pale rose fingers across the sky, And Menelaus got out of bed and dressed.
He slung his sharp sword around his shoulder, Tied oiled leather sandals onto his feet,
And walked out of the bedroom like a god. Then he sat down next to Telemachus and said:

"Tell me, Telemachus, what has brought you here To gleaming Sparta over the sea's broad back?
Public business or private? Tell me the truth."

Telemachus took a deep breath and said:

"Menelaus, son of Atreus in the line of Zeus, I came to see if you could tell me anything About my father. My land is in ruin.
I'm being eaten out of house and home
By hostile men who constantly throng my halls Slaughtering my sheep and horned cattle
In their arrogant courtship of my mother. And so I am at your knees. Tell me
How my father, Odysseus, met his end, Whether you saw it with your own eyes, Or heard about it from someone else,
 




325










330










335











340








345
 
Some wanderer. He was born to sorrow, More than any man on earth. And do not, Out of pity, spare me the truth, but tell me
Whatever you have seen, whatever you know. I beseech you, if my father, noble Odysseus, Ever fulfilled a promise he made to you
In the land of Troy, where the Achaeans suffered, Remember it now, and tell me the truth."

And Menelaus, deeply troubled by this:

"Those dogs! Those puny weaklings, Wanting to sleep in the bed of a hero!
A doe might as well bed her suckling fawns In the lair of a lion, leaving them there
In the bush and then going off over the hills Looking for grassy fields. When the lion Comes back, the fawns die an ugly death. That's the kind of death these men will die When Odysseus comes back. O Father Zeus, And Athena and Apollo, bring Odysseus back With the strength he showed in Lesbos once When he wrestled a match with Philomeleides And threw him hard, making all of us cheer— That's the Odysseus I want the suitors to meet! They'd get married all right—to bitter death. But, as to what you ask me about,
I will not stray from the point or deceive you. No, I will tell you all that the infallible
Old Man of the Sea told me, and hide nothing.
 




350








355











360








365








370








375
 
I was in Egypt, held up by the gods Because I failed to offer them sacrifice. The gods never allow us to forget them. There is an island in the whitecapped sea Just north of Egypt. Men call it Pharos, And it lies one hard day's sailing offshore. There is a good harbor there where ships
Take on fresh water before heading out to sea. The gods kept me stuck in that harbor
For twenty days. A good sailing breeze Never rose up, and all my supplies
Would have been exhausted, and my crew spent, Had not one of the gods taken pity on me
And saved me. This was Eidothea,
Daughter of Proteus, the Old Man of the Sea. Somehow I had moved her heart. She met me As I wandered alone, apart from my crew, Who roamed the island continually, fishing
With bent hooks, their bellies cramped with hunger. She came close to me and spoke:

'Are you completely out of your mind, stranger, Or do you actually like suffering like this?
You've been marooned on this island a long time With no end in sight, and your crew's fading fast.'

"She spoke like this, and I answered her:

'I tell you, goddess—whichever goddess you are— That I am not stranded here of my own free will.
 








380








385








390








395











400
 
I must have offended one of the immortals. But you tell me—for gods know everything—
Which of the immortals is pinning me down here And won't let me go. And tell me how
I can sail back home over the teeming sea.' "And the shining goddess answered me:
'Well, all right, stranger, since you ask. This is the haunt of an unerring immortal, Egyptian Proteus, the Old Man of the Sea,
Who serves Poseidon and knows all the deeps. They say he's my father. If you can
Somehow catch him in ambush here,
He will tell you the route, and the distance too, Of your journey home over the teeming sea. And he will tell you, prince, if you so wish,
What has been done in your house for better or worse While you have been gone on your long campaign.'
"So she spoke, and I answered her: 'Show me yourself how to ambush
The old god, or he may give me the slip. It's hard for a mortal to master a god.'

"And the shining goddess answered me:

'I'll tell you exactly what you need to know. When the sun is at high noon, the unerring
 




405











410








415










420













425
 
Old Man of the Sea comes from the salt water, Hidden in dark ripples the West Wind stirs up, And then lies down to sleep in the scalloped caves. All around him seals, the brine-spirit's brood, Sleep in a herd. They come out of the grey water With breath as fetid as the depths of the sea.
I will lead you there at break of day
And lay you in a row, you and three comrades Chosen by you as the best on your ship.
Now I'll tell you all the old man's wiles.
First, he will go over the seals and count them, And when he has counted them off by fives, He will lie down like a shepherd among them. As soon as you see him lying down to rest, Screw up your courage to the sticking point And pin him down, no matter how he struggles And tries to escape. He will try everything,
And turn into everything that moves on the earth, And into water also, and a burning flame.
Just hang on and grip him all the more tightly. When he finally speaks to you of his own free will
In the shape you saw him in when he lay down to rest, Then ease off, hero, and let the old man go,
And ask him which of the gods is angry with you, And how you can sail home over the teeming sea.'

"And with that she slipped into the surging sea.
I headed for my ships where they stood on the sand And brooded on many things as I went.
When I had come down to the ships and the sea,
 






430








435








440








445








450










455
 
We made supper, and when night came on, We lay down to take our rest on the beach. When dawn came, a palmetto of rose,
I went along the shore of the open sea Praying over and over to the immortal gods, Taking with me the three of my crew
I trusted the most for any adventure.

"The goddess, meanwhile, dove underwater And now came back with the skins of four seals, All newly flayed. She was out to trick her father. She scooped out hiding places for us in the sand And sat waiting as we cautiously drew near.
Then she had us lie down in a row, and threw A seal skin over each of us. It would have been A gruesome ambush—the stench of the seals Was unbearable—but the goddess saved us
By putting ambrosia under each man's nose, Drowning out the stench with its immortal fragrance. So we waited patiently all morning long,
And then the seals came from the water in throngs. They lay down in rows along the seashore,
And at noon the Old One came from the sea. He found the fat seals and went over the herd, Counting them up. He counted us first,
Never suspecting any kind of trick, And then he lay down. We rushed him With a shout and got our hands on him, And the Old One didn't forget his wiles, Turning first into a bearded lion,
 








460










465








470








475








480
 
Then a serpent, a leopard, and a huge boar. He even turned into flowing water,
And into a high, leafy tree. But we Held on, gritting our teeth, and at last
The wily Old One grew weary, and said to me:

'Which god have you plotted with, son of Atreus, To catch me off-guard? What do you want?'

"He spoke, and I answered him:

'You know, old man—don't try to put me off— How long I have been stuck on this island With no end in sight. I'm losing heart.
Just tell me this—you gods know everything— Which of the immortals has marooned me here? How can I sail home over the teeming sea?'

"When I said this, he answered:

'You should have offered noble sacrifice to Zeus And the other gods before embarking
If you wanted a speedy journey home
Over the deep purple sea. It is not your fate To come home to your friends and native land
Until you go once more to the waters of the Aegyptus, The sky-fed river, and offer holy hecatombs
To the immortal gods who hold high heaven. Only then will they grant the journey you desire.'
 

485










490











495











500








505
 
"When he said this my spirit was crushed. It was a long, hard pull over the misty deep Back to the Aegyptus. Still, I answered:

'I will do all these things, just as you say. But tell me this, and tell me the truth:
Did all the Achaeans make it home in their ships, All those whom Nestor and I left at Troy?
Or did any die on shipboard, or in their friends' arms, After winding up the war?'
"To which Proteus said: 'Why, son of Atreus, ask me about this?
You don't need to know. Nor do I think
You will be free from tears once you have heard it. Many were killed in the war. You were there
And know who they were. Many, too, survived. On the homeward journey two heroes died.
Another still lives, perhaps, held back by the sea.

'Ajax went down among his long-oared ships. Poseidon had driven him onto Gyrae's rocks
But saved him from the sea. He would have escaped, Despite Athena's hatred, but he lost his wits
And boasted loudly that he had survived the deep In spite of the gods. Poseidon heard this boast, And with his trident he struck Gyrae's rock
And broke it asunder. One part held firm, But the other part, upon which Ajax sat
 



510










515













520










525








530
 
In his blind arrogance, fell into the gulf And took Ajax with it. And so he perished, His lungs full of saltwater.
Your brother, though, Outran the fates in his hollow ships,
With the help of Hera. But when he was nearing Malea's heights, a storm wind caught him
And carried him groaning over the teeming sea
To the frontier of the land where Thyestes once lived And after him Thyestes' son, Aegisthus.
Then the gods gave him a following wind And safe passage homeward. Agamemnon Rejoiced to set foot on his ancestral land.
He fell to the ground and kissed the good earth And hot tears of joy streamed from his eyes, So glad was he to see his homeland again.
But from a high lookout a watchman saw him. Aegisthus had treacherously posted him there And promised a reward of two bars of gold. He had been keeping watch for a year by then So that Agamemnon would not slip by unseen And unleash his might, and now he reported His news to Aegisthus, who acted quickly And set a trap. He chose his twenty best men And had them wait in ambush. Opposite them,
On the hall's farther side, he had a feast prepared, And then he drove off in his chariot,
Brooding darkly, to invite Agamemnon.
So he brought Agamemnon up to the palace Unaware of his doom and slaughtered him
 



535










540








545








550








555








560
 
The way an ox is slaughtered at the stall. None of Agamemnon's men was left alive,
Nor any of Aegisthus'. All were slain in the hall.'

"Proteus spoke, and my heart was shattered. I wept and wept as I sat on the sand, losing All desire to live and see the light of the sun.
When I could not weep or flail about any more, The unerring Old Man of the Sea addressed me:

'Weep no more, son of Atreus. We gain nothing By such prolonged bouts of grief. Instead,
Go as quickly as you can to your native land. Either Aegisthus will still be alive, or
Orestes may have beat you to it and killed him, And you may happen to arrive during his funeral.'

"These words warmed my heart, although I was still in shock. Then I asked him:

'I know now what became of these two,
But who is the third man, the one who's alive, But held back by the sea, or perhaps is dead. I want to hear about him, despite my grief.'

"Proteus answered me without hesitation:

'It is Laertes' son, whose home is in Ithaca. I saw him on an island, shedding salt tears,
In the halls of Calypso, who keeps him there
 




565










570










575











580











585
 
Against his will. He has no way to get home To his native land. He has no ships left,
No crew to row him over the sea's broad back. As for you, Menelaus, Zeus' cherished king, You are not destined to die and to meet your fate In bluegrass Argos. The immortals will take you To the ends of the earth and the Elysian Fields, Where Rhadamanthus lives and life is easiest. No snow, nor storm, nor heavy rain comes there, But a sighing wind from the West always blows Off the Ocean, a cooling breeze for men.
For Helen is your wife, and in the gods' eyes You are the son-in-law of great Zeus himself.'

"And with that he dove into the surging sea.
I went back to the ships with my godlike companions And brooded on many things as I went.
When we had come down to the ships and the sea, And had made supper, immortal night came on, And we lay down to take our rest on the beach.
When dawn came with palmettoes of rose,
We hauled our ships down to the shining water, And set up the masts and sails in the hulls.
The crews came aboard, and sitting in rows They beat the sea white with their churning oars. And so I sailed back to the rain-fed Aegyptus, Moored my ships, and offered perfect sacrifice. When I had appeased the everlasting gods
I heaped up a barrow for Agamemnon
So that his memory would not fade. Only then
 






590








595










600








605








610








615
 
Did I set sail for home, and the gods gave me A following wind that brought me back swiftly.
Well, now, I want you to stay in my halls Until eleven or twelve days have passed, And then I will give you a royal send-off And these splendid gifts: three horses
And a polished chariot, and a beautiful cup,
So that you can pour libations to the deathless gods And remember me all the days of your life."
Telemachus answered in his clear-headed way: "Son of Atreus, do not keep me here long.
I could spend a year in your house
And never miss my home or my parents. That's how much I enjoy listening to you And hearing your tales. But even now My crew is getting restless back in Pylos And you are keeping me long here.
As for gifts, Give me whatever treasure you will, But I will not take horses to Ithaca.
They are better off here for you to enjoy, For you rule a wide plain, with lotus
Everywhere, and galingale, and wheat and spelt, And heavy ears of white barley. But Ithaca
Has no broad horse-runs or meadowlands at all. Its pasture is for goats, and more lovely
Than horse pasture. None of the islands
That slope to the sea has rich meadows, or is good
 








620










625










630










635








640
 
For driving horses, and Ithaca least of all."

 
And Menelaus, who could make his voice Carry in battle, said to Telemachus:

"You are of good blood, my boy, to talk like that! All right, I will change my gifts, as I easily can. Of all the gifts that lie stored in my house
I will give you the most beautiful—
And the most valuable—a well-wrought bowl, Solid silver, with the lip finished in gold,
The work of Hephaestus. The hero Phaedimus, King of the Sidonians, gave it to me
When I stayed at his house on my way home. Now I want you to take it home with you."

And while they talked to each other,
The banqueters came to their lord's palace, Driving sheep with them and bringing wine,
And bread that their veiled wives had sent with them. And so they were busy with the feast in Menelaus' halls.

Meanwhile, back in Ithaca,
The suitors were entertaining themselves In front of Odysseus' palace again, Throwing the javelin and discus
On the level terrace, arrogant as ever. Antinous and Eurymachus, who were Their natural leaders, were sitting there,
 



645










650








655










660










665
 
And Noemon, son of Phronius,
Came up to them and asked Antinous:

 
"Antinous, do we have any idea
When Telemachus will return from Pylos? He's gone off with a ship of mine,
And I need her to cross over to Elis, Where I have twelve brood mares
And ten mules still at the teat. I would like To drive one of them off and break him in."

When he said this, Antinous and Eurymachus Just looked at each other. They had no idea Telemachus had gone to Neleian Pylos.
They thought he was somewhere out in the field With the sheep flocks, or off with the swineherd. Antinous questioned Noemon closely:

"Tell me exactly when Telemachus left
And who went with him, a hand-picked crew From the island, or his own fieldhands and slaves? He could have done it either way. And tell me this, So I'll have it right. Did he force you to give him The ship, or were you just doing him a favor?"

And Noemon answered him:

"I gave it freely. What else could I do, When a man like that, with all his troubles, Asks me? It would be hard to refuse him.
 

670








675










680










685











690
 
Those who went with him are the best in town, After ourselves, and when they boarded
I noticed Mentor going on board, too, As their leader, either Mentor or a god
Who looked just like him. I wonder about this, Because I saw Mentor here yesterday morning, After he had set sail for sandy Pylos."

With that, Noemon left for his father's house. Antinous and Eurymachus were furious.
They made the suitors stop their games And had them sit down. Antinous
Addressed them. His black heart was seething With anger, and his eyes burned like fire:

"Unbelievable! Telemachus has some nerve, Pulling off this voyage. We never thought We'd see it happen, and the boy is up and gone, Just like that, with all of us against it,
Launching a ship and picking the best crew around. He's going to start giving us trouble soon.
May Zeus cripple him before he reaches manhood! All right, now, give me a ship and twenty men
So I can lie in ambush and watch for him
As he comes through the strait between Ithaca And rocky Samos. He'll be sorry
He ever made this voyage in search of his father."

They all praised his speech and urged him on. Then they stood up and went to Odysseus' palace.
 




695










700








705










710








715
 

 
It did not take Penelope long to find out The suitors' dark intentions. The herald, Medon, was the one who brought her word. He had overheard the suitors talking
As he stood outside the courtyard
Where they were weaving their plots, and now He went through the hall to tell Penelope.
As he crossed the threshold, she asked him:

"Medon, why have the suitors sent you here? To tell the handmaids of divine Odysseus
To drop everything and prepare a feast for them? May this be their last courtship, their last party, Oh, may this latest feast be their last of all!
Do you hear me, you thronging leeches Who are eating away Telemachus' property? You surely weren't listening to your fathers
When you were children, or you would have heard What kind of man Odysseus was to them,
How he never wronged anyone in word or deed, How he was fair to everyone, unlike
Most sceptered kings, who all have their favorites. He never lost his temper with any man at all.
But your vile deeds and hearts are plain to see, And there is no gratitude for kindness past."

Then Medon, the tactful herald:

"If only this were the greatest evil, Lady,
 

720








725










730








735








740











745
 
But there is a greater and more grievous. The suitors are planning—and may Zeus
Never bring their plans to pass—to kill Telemachus On his way back home. He went to sandy Pylos And gleaming Lacedaemon for news of his father."

When Medon said these things, Penelope felt That her heart had been unstrung. Her eyes Filled with tears, and she was unable to speak For a long time. Finally she said to the herald:

"Medon, why is my son gone? There was no need For him to board any sea-going ships,
Which men use to cross the wide water
As they use horses on land. Why did he go?
So that not even his name would be left among men?" And Medon, the tactful herald:
"I do not know whether a god urged him on, Or his own heart moved him to go to Pylos To learn either of his father's return
Or of the manner in which he met his fate."

So saying, Medon went into Odysseus' house. Pain washed over Penelope and seeped
Into her bones. She could not bring herself To sit down in one of the many chairs
That were there in the house, but sat curled On the worn threshold of her bedroom
 








750











755










760











765








770
 
And wept. Around her the women of the house Moaned softly, the old and the young,
And Penelope spoke to them through her tears:

 
"Hear me, my friends, for the god on Olympus Has given me pain beyond all other women Of my generation. I have lost a fine husband
With a heart like a lion, the glory of the Danaans, The pride of all Hellas, a man of many virtues. And now the winds have ripped my beloved son From my house. I never even heard him leave.
You were cruel, each of you, not to think
Of getting me from bed, for you must have known He was going aboard that hollow black ship.
If I had known he was setting out on this journey, He would have stayed here, despite his willfulness, Or else he would have left me dead in our halls.
Quick now, someone go get old Dolios, The servant whom my father gave me
Before I left home and who now tends my orchards. He should sit with Laertes and tell him all this.
Laertes may be able to weave some plan And complain to the people about these men Who want to destroy his and Odysseus' line."
And her beloved nurse, Eurycleia, said: "Child, you can spare me or stab me
With a sword, but I will not hide what I know. I was in on all this. I got his provisions,
 



775








780








785








790











795
 
Bread and sweet wine. He made me swear Not to tell you until twelve days had passed Or until you missed him yourself or heard He had gone. He didn't want you crying.
Now take a bath and put on some clean clothes. Then go upstairs with the serving women
And pray to Athena, daughter of Zeus.
No matter what, she can save your son from death. But do not trouble the old man. He has
Troubles enough. Yet I do not think The line of Laertes, son of Arcesius, Is entirely hated by the blessed gods.
There may still be someone in that line to own This high hall and all the rich fields around."

So the old nurse soothed Penelope's grief And kept her eyes dry. Penelope bathed
And put on clean clothes. Then she went upstairs With the serving women, put barley for strewing In a basket, and prayed to Athena:

"Hear me, Mystic Daughter of Zeus.
If ever in these halls my cunning Odysseus Burned fat thighbones of bulls or sheep for you, Remember it now and save my beloved son.
Protect him from the arrogant suitors' violence."

Penelope voiced this prayer, and Athena heard it, While down in the shadowy halls below
These same suitors were talking noisily,
 




800








805








810










815










820
 
Making crude comments such as these:

"So while the lady upstairs gets ready to marry One of her suitors, she has no idea
That her suitors are arranging to murder her son!"

But they had no idea of what was being arranged. Antinous had some words for all of them:

"Are you crazy? Stow that kind of talk, Or someone may report it to those inside. We're going to do what we said we would
Under cover of silence. We're all in this together."

And he picked out the twenty best men there. They went down to the shore of the sea
And hauled a fast ship out onto the water. They set up mast and sail in that black ship And fit the oars into the leather thole-straps,
All in due order. Then they unfurled the white sails. Their attendants brought all their gear aboard,
And they moored the ship where she would catch The evening breeze. Then they disembarked,
Ate their dinner, and waited for twilight.

Penelope lay in her room upstairs. She would not touch any food or drink
But only lay there worrying about her son, Wondering whether he would escape from death
 

825











830











835








840










845
 
Or be killed by the insolent suitors.

 
Surrounded by men, a lion broods and then panics When they begin to tighten their crafty ring.

So too Penelope, until sleep drifted over her, And she sank back with all her body relaxed.

Athena's eyes were flashing in the dark.
She made a phantom in the form of a woman, Iphthime, daughter of great Icarius,
Now wed to Eumelus, whose home was in Pherae. She sent the phantom into Odysseus' house
To stop Penelope's weeping and sobbing.
It drifted into her room through the keyhole And stood above her head, and spoke to her:

"Asleep, Penelope, and broken-hearted? The blessed gods are unwilling that you
Should weep and be sad, for your son will return. He has not offended the gods at all."

And Penelope, slumbering sweetly At the gate of dreams, answered her:

"Why have you come here, sister? You live Far away and have seldom come before.
You tell me to stop grieving, tell me to rest
From the sorrows that plague my mind and heart. Long ago now I lost my fine husband,
 

850











855








860










865











870
 
A lion-hearted man, the glory of the Danaans, The pride of Hellas, a man of many virtues. And now my beloved son has gone away
In a hollow ship, a mere child, who knows nothing Of the world of men. I grieve for him even more Than for my husband. I am trembling with fear That he will get hurt, either among the people
He has gone off to visit, or on the open sea. For his many enemies are plotting against him And mean to kill him before he gets home."

The glimmering phantom answered her:

"Take heart, and don't be so afraid. The guide Who goes with him is one many men pray for To stand at their side, a powerful ally—
Pallas Athena. And she pities you in your grief, For it is she who sent me to tell you this."

And Penelope, in her circumspect way:

"If you are truly a god and have heard a god's voice, Tell me also of that man of many sorrows,
Whether he still lives and sees the light of the sun, Or whether he is dead and in Hades' dark world."

The glimmering phantom answered her:

"No, I will not speak of him, whether he be Alive or dead. Empty words are ill spoken."
 




875








880











885











890











895
 

 
And the phantom slipped through the keyhole And became a sigh in the air. Penelope
Started up from sleep, and her heart was warmed
By the clear dream that had come in the soft black night.

By now the suitors had embarked and set sail, Their hearts set on murdering Telemachus.
There is a rocky island out in the sea, Midway between Ithaca and rugged Samos. Asteris is its name, not very big,
But it has a harbor with outlets on either side Where a ship can lie. There the suitors waited.
 







900










905
 

BOOK 5

Dawn reluctantly
Left Tithonus in her rose-shadowed bed, Then shook the morning into flakes of fire.

Light flooded the halls of Olympus
Where Zeus, high Lord of Thunder,	5
Sat with the other gods, listening to Athena Reel off the tale of Odysseus' woes.
It galled her that he was still in Calypso's cave:

"Zeus, my father—and all you blessed immortals—
Kings might as well no longer be gentle and kind	10
Or understand the correct order of things. They might as well be tyrannical butchers For all that any of Odysseus' people
Remember him, a godly king as kind as a father.
No, he's still languishing on that island, detained	15
Against his will by that nymph Calypso,
No way in the world for him to get back to his land. His ships are all lost, he has no crew left
To row him across the sea's crawling back.
And now the islanders are plotting to kill his son	20
As he heads back home. He went for news of his father To sandy Pylos and white-bricked Sparta."
 
Storm Cloud Zeus had an answer for her:

"Quite a little speech you've let slip through your teeth,
Daughter. But wasn't this exactly your plan	25
So that Odysseus would make them pay for it later? You know how to get Telemachus
Back to Ithaca and out of harm's way
With his mother's suitors sailing in a step behind."

Zeus turned then to his son Hermes and said:	30

"Hermes, you've been our messenger before. Go tell that ringleted nymph it is my will
To let that patient man Odysseus go home.
Not with an escort, mind you, human or divine,
But on a rickety raft—tribulation at sea—	35
Until on the twentieth day he comes to Schería
In the land of the Phaeacians, our distant relatives, Who will treat Odysseus as if he were a god
And take him on a ship to his own native land
With gifts of bronze and clothing and gold,	40
More than he ever would have taken back from Troy Had he come home safely with his share of the loot. That's how he's destined to see his dear ones again And return to his high-gabled Ithacan home."

Thus Zeus, and the quicksilver messenger	45
Laced on his feet the beautiful sandals, Golden, immortal, that carry him over Landscape and seascape on a puff of wind.
 
And he picked up the wand he uses to charm
Mortal eyes to sleep and make sleepers awake.	50

Holding this wand the tough quicksilver god Took off, bounded onto Pieria
And dove through the ether down to the sea,

Skimming the waves like a cormorant,
The bird that patrols the saltwater billows	55
Hunting for fish, seaspume on its plumage,

Hermes flying low and planing the whitecaps.

When he finally arrived at the distant island He stepped from the violet-tinctured sea
On to dry land and proceeded to the cavern	60
Where Calypso lived. She was at home. A fire blazed on the hearth, and the smell Of split cedar and arbor vitae burning
Spread like incense across the whole island.
She was seated inside, singing in a lovely voice	65
As she wove at her loom with a golden shuttle. Around her cave the woodland was in bloom, Alder and poplar and fragrant cypress.
Long-winged birds nested in the leaves,
Horned owls and larks and slender-throated shorebirds	70
That screech like crows over the bright saltwater. Tendrils of ivy curled around the cave's mouth, The glossy green vine clustered with berries.
 
Four separate springs flowed with clear water, criss-
Crossing channels as they meandered through meadows	75
Lush with parsley and blossoming violets. It was enough to make even a visiting god Enraptured at the sight. Quicksilver Hermes Took it all in, then turned and entered
The vast cave.	80
Calypso knew him at sight. The immortals have ways of recognizing each other, Even those whose homes are in outlying districts.
But Hermes didn't find the great hero inside. Odysseus was sitting on the shore,
As ever those days, honing his heart's sorrow,	85
Staring out to sea with hollow, salt-rimmed eyes.

Calypso, sleek and haloed, questioned Hermes Politely, as she seated him on a lacquered chair:

"My dear Hermes, to what do I owe
The honor of this unexpected visit? Tell me	90
What you want, and I'll oblige you if I can."

The goddess spoke, and then set a table
With ambrosia and mixed a bowl of rosy nectar. The quicksilver messenger ate and drank his fill,
Then settled back from dinner with heart content	95
And made the speech she was waiting for:

"You ask me, goddess to god, why I have come. Well, I'll tell you exactly why. Remember, you asked.
 
Zeus ordered me to come here; I didn't want to. Who would want to cross this endless stretch Of deserted sea? Not a single city in sight Where you can get a decent sacrifice from men. But you know how it is: Zeus has the aegis, And none of us gods can oppose his will.
He says you have here the most woebegone hero Of the whole lot who fought around Priam's city
For nine years, sacked it in the tenth, and started home. But on the way back they offended Athena,
And she swamped them with hurricane winds and waves. His entire crew was wiped out, and he
Drifted along until he was washed up here.
Anyway, Zeus wants you to send him back home. Now. The man's not fated to rot here far from his friends.
It's his destiny to see his dear ones again
And return to his high-gabled Ithacan home."

He finished, and the nymph's aura stiffened. Words flew from her mouth like screaming hawks:

"You gods are the most jealous bastards in the universe— Persecuting any goddess who ever openly takes
A mortal lover to her bed and sleeps with him. When Dawn caressed Orion with her rosy fingers, You celestial layabouts gave her nothing but trouble Until Artemis finally shot him on Ortygia—
Gold-throned, holy, gentle-shafted assault goddess! When Demeter followed her heart and unbound Her hair for Iasion and made love to him
 



100








105








110








115











120








125
 
In a late-summer field, Zeus was there taking notes And executed the man with a cobalt lightning blast. And now you gods are after me for having a man. Well, I was the one who saved his life, unprying him From the spar he came floating here on, sole survivor Of the wreck Zeus made of his streamlined ship, Slivering it with lightning on the wine-dark sea.
I loved him, I took care of him, I even told him I'd make him immortal and ageless all of his days. But you said it, Hermes: Zeus has the aegis
And none of us gods can oppose his will.
So all right, he can go, if it's an order from above, Off on the sterile sea. How I don't know.
I don't have any oared ships or crewmen To row him across the sea's broad back. But I'll help him. I'll do everything I can
To get him back safely to his own native land."

The quicksilver messenger had one last thing to say:

"Well send him off now and watch out for Zeus' temper. Cross him and he'll really be rough on you later."

With that the tough quicksilver god made his exit.

Calypso composed herself and went to Odysseus, Zeus' message still ringing in her ears.
She found him sitting where the breakers rolled in. His eyes were perpetually wet with tears now,
 






130








135








140











145












150
 
His life draining away in homesickness. The nymph had long since ceased to please. He still slept with her at night in her cavern,
An unwilling lover mated to her eager embrace. Days he spent sitting on the rocks by the breakers, Staring out to sea with hollow, salt-rimmed eyes. She stood close to him and started to speak:

"You poor man. You can stop grieving now And pining away. I'm sending you home.
Look, here's a bronze axe. Cut some long timbers And make yourself a raft fitted with topdecks,
Something that will get you across the sea's misty spaces. I'll stock it with fresh water, food and red wine—
Hearty provisions that will stave off hunger—and I'll clothe you well and send you a following wind To bring you home safely to your own native land, If such is the will of the gods of high heaven, Whose minds and powers are stronger than mine."

Odysseus' eyes shone with weariness. He stiffened, And shot back at her words fletched like arrows:

"I don't know what kind of send-off you have in mind, Goddess, telling me to cross all that open sea on a raft, Painful, hard sailing. Some well-rigged vessels
Never make it across with a stiff wind from Zeus. You're not going to catch me setting foot on any raft Unless you agree to swear a solemn oath
That you're not planning some new trouble for me."
 






155










160








165










170










175
 

 
Calypso's smile was like a shower of light.
She touched him gently, and teased him a little:

"Blasphemous, that's what you are—but nobody's fool! How do you manage to say things like that?
All right. I swear by Earth and Heaven above And the subterranean water of Styx—the greatest Oath and the most awesome a god can swear—
That I'm not planning more trouble for you, Odysseus. I'll put my mind to work for you as hard as I would For myself, if ever I were in such a fix.
My heart is in the right place, Odysseus, Nor is it a cold lump of iron in my breast."

With that the haloed goddess walked briskly away And the man followed in the deity's footsteps.
The two forms, human and divine, came to the cave And he sat down in the chair which moments before Hermes had vacated, and the nymph set out for him Food and drink such as mortal men eat.
She took a seat opposite godlike Odysseus And her maids served her ambrosia and nectar.
They helped themselves to as much as they wanted, And when they had their fill of food and drink Calypso spoke, an immortal radiance upon her:

"Son of Laertes in the line of Zeus, my wily Odysseus, Do you really want to go home to your beloved country Right away? Now? Well, you still have my blessings.
 



180










185








190










195








200
 
But if you had any idea of all the pain
You're destined to suffer before getting home, You'd stay here with me, deathless—
Think of it, Odysseus!—no matter how much
You missed your wife and wanted to see her again. You spend all your daylight hours yearning for her. I don't mind saying she's not my equal
In beauty, no matter how you measure it. Mortal beauty cannot compare with immortal."
Odysseus, always thinking, answered her this way: "Goddess and mistress, don't be angry with me.
I know very well that Penelope,
For all her virtues, would pale beside you. She's only human, and you are a goddess, Eternally young. Still, I want to go back.
My heart aches for the day I return to my home. If some god hits me hard as I sail the deep purple, I'll weather it like the sea-bitten veteran I am.
God knows I've suffered and had my share of sorrows In war and at sea. I can take more if I have to."

The sun set on his words, and the shadows darkened. They went to a room deep in the cave, where they made Sweet love and lay side by side through the night.

Dawn came early, touching the sky with rose.
 

205








210











215








220










225
 
Odysseus put on a shirt and cloak,
And the nymph slipped on a long silver robe Shimmering in the light, cinched it at the waist With a golden belt and put a veil on her head. What to do about sending Odysseus off?
She handed him an axe, bronze, both edges honed. The olive-wood haft felt good in his palms.
She gave him a sharp adze, too, then led the way To the island's far side where the trees grew tall, Alder and poplar and silver fir, sky-topping trees Long-seasoned and dry that would keep him afloat. Calypso showed him where the trees grew tall Then went back home, a glimmer in the woods, While Odysseus cut timber.
Working fast, He felled twenty trees, cut them to length,
Smoothed them skillfully and trued them to the line. The glimmer returned—Calypso with an auger— And he drilled the beams through, fit them up close And hammered them together with joiners and pegs. About the size of a deck a master shipwright Chisels into shape for a broad-bowed freighter
Was the size Odysseus made his wide raft. He fit upright ribs close-set in the decking And finished them with long facing planks. He built a mast and fit in a yardarm,
And he made a rudder to steer her by. Then he wove a wicker-work barrier To keep off the waves, plaiting it thick.
Calypso brought him a large piece of cloth
 



230








235








240










245








250








255
 
To make into a sail, and he fashioned that, too. He rigged up braces and halyards and lines, Then levered his craft down to the glittering sea.

Day four, and the job was finished.
Day five, and Calypso saw him off her island, After she had bathed him and dressed him
In fragrant clothes. She filled up a skin With wine that ran black, another large one With water, and tucked into a duffel
A generous supply of hearty provisions.
And she put a breeze at his back, gentle and warm.

Odysseus' heart sang as he spread sail to the wind, And he steered with the rudder, a master mariner Aboard his craft. Sleep never fell on his eyelids
As he watched the Pleiades and slow-setting Bootes And the Bear (also known as the Wagon)
That pivots in place and chases Orion
And alone is aloof from the wash of Ocean. Calypso, the glimmering goddess, had told him To sail with the stars of the Bear on his left.
Seventeen days he sailed the deep water,
And on the eighteenth day the shadowy mountains Of the Phaeacians' land loomed on the horizon,
To his eyes like a shield on the misty sea.
 




260










265










270








275








280
 

And Poseidon saw him.
From the far Solymi Mountains
 
The Lord of Earthquake, returning from Ethiopia, Saw him, an image in his mind bobbing on the sea. Angrier than ever, he shook his head
And cursed to himself:

"Damn it all, the gods Must have changed their minds about Odysseus While I was away with the Ethiopians.
He's close to Phaeacia, where he's destined to escape The great ring of sorrow that has closed around him. But I'll bet I can still blow some trouble his way."

He gathered the clouds, and gripping his trident He stirred the sea. And he raised all the blasts
Of every wind in the world and covered with clouds Land and sea together. Night rose in the sky.
The winds blew hard from every direction,
And lightning-charged Boreas rolled in a big wave. Odysseus felt his knees and heart weaken.
Hunched over, he spoke to his own great soul:

"Now I'm in for it.
I'm afraid that Calypso was right on target When she said I would have my fill of sorrow On the open sea before I ever got home.
It's all coming true. Look at these clouds
Zeus is piling like flowers around the sky's rim, And he's roughened the sea, and every wind
In the world is howling around me. Three times, four times luckier than I
 




285











290










295










300








305
 
Were the Greeks who died on Troy's wide plain! If only I had gone down on that day
When the air was whistling with Trojan spears In the desperate fight for Achilles' dead body.
I would have had burial then, honored by the army. As it is I am doomed to a wretched death at sea."

His words weren't out before a huge cresting wave Crashed on his raft and shivered its timbers.
He was pitched clear of the deck. The rudder flew From his hands, the mast cracked in two
Under the force of the hurricane winds, And the yardarm and sail hove into the sea. He was under a long time, unable to surface
From the heaving swell of the monstrous wave, Weighed down by the clothes Calypso had given him. At last he came up, spitting out saltwater,
Seabrine gurgling from his nostrils and mouth.
For all his distress, though, he remembered his raft, Lunged through the waves, caught hold of it
And huddled down in its center shrinking from death. An enormous wave rode the raft into cross-currents.
The North Wind in autumn sweeps through a field Rippling with thistles and swirls them around.

So the winds swirled the raft all over the sea, South Wind colliding at times with the North, East Wind shearing away from the West.
 



310










315








320








325











330
 

 
And the White Goddess saw him, Cadmus' daughter Ino, once a human girl with slim, beautiful ankles Who had won divine honors in the saltwater gulfs. She pitied Odysseus his wandering, his pain,
And rose from the water like a flashing gull, Perched on his raft, and said this to him:

"Poor man. Why are you so odious to Poseidon, Odysseus, that he sows all this grief for you?
But he'll not destroy you, for all of his fury. Now do as I say—you're in no way to refuse: Take off those clothes and abandon your raft To the winds' will. Swim for your life
To the Phaeacians' land, your destined safe harbor. Here, wrap this veil tightly around your chest.
It's immortally charmed: Fear no harm or death. But when with your hands you touch solid land Untie it and throw it into the deep blue sea Clear of the shore so it can come back to me."

With these words the goddess gave him the veil And slipped back into the heavy seas
Like a silver gull. The black water swallowed her. Godlike Odysseus brooded on his trials
And spoke these words to his own great soul:

"Not this. Not another treacherous god
Scheming against me, ordering me to abandon my raft. I will not obey. I've seen with my own eyes
 

335








340










345








350










355










360
 
How far that land is where she says I'll be saved. I'll play it the way that seems best to me.
As long as the timbers are still holding together I'll hang on and gut it out right here where I am. When and if a wave shatters my raft to pieces, Then I'll swim for it. What else can I do?"

As he churned these thoughts in the pit of his stomach Poseidon Earthshaker raised up a great wave—
An arching, cavernous, cresting tsunami— And brought it crashing down on him.

As storm winds blast into a pile of dry chaff And scatter the stuff all over the place,

So the long beams of Odysseus' raft were scattered. He went with one beam and rode it like a stallion, Stripping off the clothes Calypso had given him
And wrapping the White Goddess' veil round his chest. Then he dove into the sea and started to swim
A furious breaststroke. The Lord of Earthquake saw him And said to himself with a slow toss of his head:

"That's right. Thrash around in misery on the open sea Until you come to human society again.
I hope that not even then will you escape from evil."

With these words he whipped his sleek-coated horses And headed for his fabulous palace on Aegae.
 








365










370











375










380
 
But Zeus' daughter Athena had other ideas. She barricaded all the winds but one
And ordered them to rest and fall asleep.
Boreas, though, she sent cracking through the waves, A tailwind for Odysseus until he was safe on Phaeacia, And had beaten off the dark birds of death.

Two nights and two days the solid, mitered waves Swept him on, annihilation all his heart could foresee. But when Dawn combed her hair in the third day's light, The wind died down and there fell
A breathless calm. Riding a swell He peered out and saw land nearby.

You know how precious a father's life is
To children who have seen him through a long disease, Gripped by a malevolent spirit and melting away,
But then released from suffering in a spasm of joy.

The land and woods were that welcome a sight To Odysseus. He kicked hard for the shoreline, But when he was as close as a shout would carry He heard the thud of waves on the rocks, Thundering surf that pounded the headland
And bellowed eerily. The sea churned with foam. There were no harbors for ships, no inlets or bays, Only jutting cliffs and rocks and barnacled crags. Odysseus' heart sank and his knees grew weak.
With a heavy sigh he spoke to his own great soul:
 

385








390










395










400










405








410
 
"Ah, Zeus has let me see land I never hoped to see And I've cut my way to the end of this gulf,
But there's no way to get out of the grey saltwater. Only sharp rocks ahead, laced by the breakers, And beyond them slick stone rising up sheer Right out of deep water, no place for a foothold, No way to stand up and wade out of trouble.
If I try to get out here a wave might smash me Against the stone cliff. Some mooring that would be! If I swim around farther and try to find
A shelving shore or an inlet from the sea, I'm afraid that a squall will take me back out Groaning deeply on the teeming dark water,
Or some monster will attack me out of the deep From the swarming brood of great Amphitrítê. I know how odious I am to the Earthshaker."

As these thoughts welled up from the pit of his stomach A breaker bore him onto the rugged coast.
He would have been cut to ribbons and his bones crushed But grey-eyed Athena inspired him.
Slammed onto a rock he grabbed it with both hands And held on groaning until the breaker rolled by.
He had no sooner ducked it when the backwash hit him And towed him far out into open water again.

It was just like an octopus pulled out of its hole With pebbles stuck to its tentacles,

Odysseus' strong hands clinging to the rocks
 








415








420








425










430










435
 
Until the skin was ripped off. The wave Pulled him under, and he would have died Then and there. But Athena was with him.
He surfaced again: the wave spat him up landwards, And he swam along parallel to the coast, scanning it For a shelving beach, an inlet from the sea,
And when he swam into the current of a river delta He knew he had come to the perfect spot,
Lined with smooth rocks and sheltered from the wind. He felt the flowing of the rivergod, and he prayed:

"Hear me, Riverlord, whoever you are And however men pray to you:
I am a fugitive from the sea And Poseidon's persecution, A wandering mortal, pitiful To the gods, I come to you, To your water and your knees. I have suffered much, O Lord, Lord, hear my prayer."

At these words the god stopped his current, Made his waters calm and harbored the man In his river's shallows. Odysseus crawled out
On hands and knees. The sea had broken his spirit. His whole body was swollen, and saltwater trickled From his nose and mouth. Breath gone, voice gone, He lay scarcely alive, drained and exhausted.
When he could breathe again and his spirit returned He unbound the goddess' veil from his body
 




440








445










450








455










460








465
 
And threw it into the sea-melding river
Where it rode the crest of a wave down the current
And into Ino's own hands. He turned away from the river, Sank into a bed of rushes, and kissed the good earth.
Huddled over he spoke to his own great soul:

"What am I in for now? How will this end? If I keep watch all night here by the river
I'm afraid a hard frost—or even a gentle dew— Will do me in, as weak as I am.
The wind blows cold from a river toward dawn. But if I climb the bank to the dark woods up there And fall asleep in a thicket, even if I survive Fatigue and cold and get some sweet sleep,
I'm afraid I'll fall prey to some prowling beast."

He thought it over and decided it was better To go to the woods. They were near the water
On an open rise. He found two olive trees there, One wild, one planted, their growth intertwined, Proof against blasts of the wild, wet wind,
The sun unable to needle light through, Impervious to rain, so thickly they grew
Into one tangle of shadows. Odysseus burrowed Under their branches and scraped out a bed.
He found a mass of leaves there, enough to keep warm Two or three men on the worst winter day.
The sight of these leaves was a joy to Odysseus, And the godlike survivor lay down in their midst And covered himself up.
 








470










475










480








485








490
 

 
A solitary man Who lives on the edge of the wilderness
And has no neighbors, will hide a charred log Deep in the black embers and so keep alive The fire's seed and not have to rekindle it From who knows where.

So Odysseus buried Himself in the leaves. And Athena sprinkled His eyes with sleep for quickest release From pain and fatigue.
 





495











500
 
And she closed his eyelids.
 

BOOK 6

So Odysseus slept, the godlike survivor Overwhelmed with fatigue.
But the goddess Athena Went off to the land of the Phaeacians,
A people who had once lived in Hypereia,
Near to the Cyclopes, a race of savages	5
Who marauded their land constantly. One day Great Nausithous led his people
Off to Schería, a remote island,
Where he walled off a city, built houses
And shrines, and parceled out fields.	10
After he died and went to the world below, Alcinous ruled, wise in the gods' ways.
Owl-eyed Athena now came to his house To devise a passage home for Odysseus.
She entered a richly decorated bedroom	15
Where a girl as lovely as a goddess was sleeping, Nausicaa, daughter of noble Alcinous.
Two maids, blessed with the beauty of Graces, Slept on either side of the closed, polished doors.
Athena rushed in like a breath of wind,	20
Stood over Nausicaa's head, and spoke to her In the guise of her friend, the daughter
Of the famed mariner Dymas. Assuming This girl's form, the owl-eyed goddess spoke:
 

"Nausicaa, how could your mother have raised	25
Such a careless child? Your silky clothes
Are lying here soiled, and your wedding is near! You'll have to dress yourself and your party well, If you want the people to speak highly of you
And make your mother and father glad.	30
We'll wash these clothes at the break of dawn.
I'll go with you and help so you'll get it done quickly. You're not going to be a virgin for long, you know! All the best young men in Phaeacia are eager
To marry you—as well they should be.	35
Wake up now, and at dawn's first blush
Ask your father if he will hitch up the mulecart To carry all these sashes and robes and things. It'll be much more pleasant than going on foot.
The laundry pools are a long way from town."	40
The grey-eyed goddess spoke and was gone, Off to Olympus, which they say is forever The unmoving abode of the gods, unshaken
By winds, never soaked by rain, and where the snow
Never drifts, but the brilliant sky stretches	45
Cloudless away, and brightness streams through the air. There, where the gods are happy all the world's days, Went the Grey-eyed One after speaking to the girl.
Dawn came throned in light, and woke Nausicaa,
Who wondered at the dream as it faded away.	50
 
She went through the house to tell her parents,
Her dear father and mother. She found them within, Her mother sitting by the hearth with her women, Spinning sea-blue yarn. Her father she met
As he headed for the door accompanied by elders	55
On his way to a council the nobles had called. She stood very close to her father and said:
"Daddy, would you please hitch up a wagon for me— A high one that rolls well—so I can go to the river
And wash our good clothes that are all dirty now.	60
You yourself should wear clean clothes When you sit among the first men in council.
And you have five sons who live in the palace, Two married and three still bachelors.
They always want freshly washed clothes	65
To wear to the dances. This has been on my mind."

She was too embarrassed to mention marriage To her father, but he understood and said:

"Of course you can have the mules, child,
And anything else. Go on. The servants will rig up	70
A high, smooth-rolling wagon fitted with a trunk."

He called the servants, and they got busy Rolling out a wagon and hitching up mules. Nausicaa brought out a pile of laundry
And loaded it into the polished cart,	75
While her mother packed a picnic basket
 
With all sorts of food and filled a goatskin with wine. The girl put these up on the cart, along with
A golden flask of oil her mother gave her
For herself and her maids to rub on their skin. She took the lash and the glossy reins
And had the mules giddyup. They jangled along At a steady pace, pulling the clothes and the girl, While the other girls, her maids, ran alongside.

They came to the beautiful, running river And the laundry pools, where the clear water Flowed through strongly enough to clean
Even the dirtiest clothes. They unhitched the mules And shooed them out along the swirling river's edge To munch the sweet clover. Then they unloaded The clothes, brought them down to the water,
And trod them in the trenches, working fast
And making a game of it. When the clothes were washed They spread them out neatly on the shore of the sea Where the waves scoured the pebbled beach clean.
Then they bathed themselves and rubbed rich olive oil Onto their skin, and had a picnic on the river's banks While they waited for the sun to dry the clothes.
When the princess and her maids had enough to eat They began to play with a ball, their hair streaming free.

Artemis sometimes roams the mountains— Immense Taygetus, or Erymanthus— Showering arrows upon boars or fleet antelope, And with her play the daughters of Zeus
 






80










85








90








95








100
 
Who range the wild woods—and Leto is glad That her daughter towers above them all
With her shining brow, though they are beautiful all—

So the unwed princess among her attendants.

But when she was about to fold the clothes, Yoke the mules, and head back home,
The Grey-eyed One sprung her plan: Odysseus would wake up, see the lovely girl,
And she would lead him to the Phaeacians' city. The princess threw the ball to one of the girls, But it sailed wide into deep, swirling water.
The girls screamed, and Odysseus awoke. Sitting up, he tried to puzzle it out:

"What kind of land have I come to now? Are the natives wild and lawless savages, Or godfearing men who welcome strangers?
That sounded like girls screaming, or the cry Of the spirit women who hold the high peaks, The river wells, and the grassy meadows.
Can it be I am close to human voices? I'll go have a look and see for myself."

With that Odysseus emerged from the bushes.
He broke off a leafy branch from the undergrowth And held it before him to cover himself.

A weathered mountain lion steps into a clearing,
 

105











110








115










120








125
 
Confident in his strength, eyes glowing.
The wind and rain have let up, and he's hunting Cattle, sheep, or wild deer, but is hungry enough To jump the stone walls of the animal pens.

So Odysseus advanced upon these ringleted girls, Naked as he was. What choice did he have?
He was a frightening sight, disfigured with brine, And the girls fluttered off to the jutting beaches. Only Alcinous' daughter stayed. Athena
Put courage in her heart and stopped her trembling. She held her ground, and Odysseus wondered How to approach this beautiful girl. Should he
Fall at her knees, or keep his distance
And ask her with honeyed words to show him The way to the city and give him some clothes? He thought it over and decided it was better
To keep his distance and not take the chance Of offending the girl by touching her knees. So he started this soft and winning speech:

"I implore you, Lady: Are you a goddess
Or mortal? If you are one of heaven's divinities I think you are most like great Zeus' daughter
Artemis. You have her looks, her stature, her form. If you are a mortal and live on this earth,
Thrice blest is your father, your queenly mother, Thrice blest your brothers! Their hearts must always Be warm with happiness when they look at you, Just blossoming as you enter the dance.
 

130










135








140








145










150








155
 
And happiest of all will be the lucky man Who takes you home with a cartload of gifts. I've never seen anyone like you,
Man or woman. I look upon you with awe. Once, on Delos, I saw something to compare— A palm shoot springing up near Apollo's altar.
I had stopped there with the troops under my command On what would prove to be a perilous campaign.
I marveled long and hard when I saw that tree, For nothing like it had ever grown from the earth. And I marvel now, Lady, and I am afraid
To touch your knees. Yet my pain is great. Yesterday, after twenty days, I pulled myself out Of the wine-dark sea. All that time, wind and wave Bore me away from Ogygia Island,
And now some spirit has cast me up here To suffer something new. I do not think
My trials will end soon. The gods have much more In store for me before that ever happens.
Pity me, mistress. After all my hardships It is to you I have come first. I don't know A soul who lives here, not a single one.
Show me the way to town, and give me
A rag to throw over myself, some piece of cloth You may have brought along to bundle the clothes. And for yourself, may the gods grant you
Your heart's desire, a husband and a home, And the blessing of a harmonious life.
For nothing is greater or finer than this, When a man and woman live together
 




160








165








170








175








180








185
 
With one heart and mind, bringing joy To their friends and grief to their foes."

 
And white-armed Nausicaa answered him:

"Stranger, you do not seem to be a bad man Or a fool. Zeus himself, the Olympian god,
Sends happiness to good men and bad men both,
To each as he wills. To you he has given these troubles, Which you have no choice but to bear. But now,
Since you have come to our country,
You shall not lack clothing, nor anything needed By a sore-tried suppliant who presents himself. I will show you where the city is and tell you That the people here are called Phaeacians.
This is their country, and I am the daughter
Of great-hearted Alcinous, the Phaeacians' lord." Then the princess called to the ringleted girls:
"Stop this now. Running away at the sight of a man! Do you think he is part of an enemy invasion?
There is no man on earth, nor will there ever be, Slippery enough to invade Phaeacia,
For we are very dear to the immortal gods, And we live far out in the surging sea,
At the world's frontier, out of all human contact. This poor man comes here as a wanderer,
And we must take care of him now. All strangers, All beggars, are under the protection of Zeus,
 

190










195








200











205








210
 
And even small gifts are welcome. So let's feed This stranger, give him something to drink, And bathe him in the river, out of the wind."

The girls stopped, turned, and urged each other on. They took Odysseus to a sheltered spot,
As Nausicaa, Alcinous' daughter, had ordered. They set down a mantle and a tunic,
Gave him a golden flask of olive oil, And told him to wash in the river.
Then sunlit Odysseus said to them:

"Stay off a ways there, girls, and let me Wash the brine off my shoulders myself And rub myself down. It's been a long time Since my skin has felt oil. But I don't want To wash in front of you. I'd be ashamed
To come out naked in front of young girls."

The girls went off and talked with Nausicaa, And Odysseus rinsed off with river water
All the brine that caked his shoulders and back, And he scrubbed the salty scurf from his scalp.
He finished his bath, rubbed himself down with oil, And put on the clothes the maiden had given him. Then Athena, born from Zeus, made him look Taller and more muscled, and made his hair Tumble down his head like hyacinth flowers.

Imagine a craftsman overlaying silver
 



215










220










225










230








235
 
With pure gold. He has learned his art From Pallas Athena and Lord Hephaestus, And creates works of breathtaking beauty.

So Athena herself made Odysseus' head and shoulders Shimmer with grace. He walked down the beach
And sat on the sand. The princess was dazzled, And she said to her white-armed serving girls:

"Listen, this man hasn't come to Phaeacia Against the will of the Olympian gods. Before, he was a terrible sight, but now,
He's like one of the gods who live in the sky.
If only such a man would be called my husband, Living here, and content to stay here.
Well, go on, give him something to eat and drink."

They were only too glad to do what she said. They served Odysseus food and drink,
And the long-suffering man ate and drank Ravenously. It had been a long fast.

Nausicaa had other things on her mind.
She folded the clothes and loaded the wagon, Hitched up the mules and climbed aboard.
Then she called to Odysseus and said:

"Get ready now, stranger, to go to the city,
So I can show you the way to my father's house,
Where I promise you will meet the best of the Phaeacians.
 

240










245










250










255










260
 
Now this is what you must do—and I think you understand: As long as we're going through countryside and farms, Keep up with my handmaidens behind the wagon.
Just jog along with them. I'll lead the way,
And we'll soon come to the city. It has a high wall Around it, and a harbor on each side.
The isthmus gets narrow, and the upswept hulls Are drawn up to the road. Every citizen
Has his own private slip. The market's there, too, Surrounding Poseidon's beautiful temple
And bounded by stones set deep in the earth. There men are always busy with their ships' tackle, With cables and sails, and with planing their oars. Phaeacians don't care for quivers and bows
But for oars and masts and streamlined ships In which they love to cross the grey, salt sea. It's their rude remarks I would rather avoid. There are some insolent louts in this town, And I can just hear one of them saying:
'Well, who's this tall, handsome stranger trailing along Behind Nausicaa? Where'd she pick him up?
She'll probably marry him, some shipwreck she's taken in From parts unknown. He's sure not local.
Maybe a god has come to answer her prayers, Dropped out of the sky for her to have and to hold. It's just as well she's found herself a husband From somewhere else, since she turns her nose up At the many fine Phaeacians who woo her.'
That's what they'll say, and it will count against me. I myself would blame anyone who acted like this,
 

265








270








275








280








285








290
 
A girl who, with her father and mother to tell her better, Kept the company of men before her wedding day.
No, stranger, be quick to understand me,
So that you can win from my father an escort home, And soon at that.
 

295
 
Close by the road you will find A grove of Athena, beautiful poplars
Surrounded by a meadow. A spring flows through it. Right there is my father's estate and vineyard, About as far from the city as a shout would carry.
Sit down there and wait for a while, until We reach the city and arrive at my house.
When you think we've had enough time to get there, Go into the city and ask any Phaeacian
For the house of my father, Lord Alcinous. It's very easy to spot, and any child
Can lead you there. There's no other house In all Phaeacia built like the house
Of the hero Alcinous. Once you're safely within The courtyard, go quickly though the hall
Until you come to my mother. She'll be sitting By the hearth in the firelight, spinning
Sea-blue yarn—a sight worth seeing—
As she leans against a column, her maids behind her. Right beside her my father sits on his throne, Sipping his wine like an immortal god.
Pass him by and throw your arms
Around my mother's knees, if you want to see Your homeland soon, however far it may be.
If she smiles upon you, there is hope that you will
 


300








305








310








315








320
 
Return to your home and see your loved ones again."

 
And she smacked the mules with the shining lash. They trotted on smartly, leaving the river behind. She drove so that Odysseus and the girls
Could keep up, and used the lash with care. The sun had set when they reached the grove Sacred to Athena. Odysseus sat down there And said this prayer to great Zeus' daughter:

"Hear me, mystic child of the Storm God, O hear me now, as you heard me not
When I was shattered by the Earthshaker's blows. Grant that I come to Phaeacia pitied and loved."

Thus his prayer, and Pallas Athena heard it But did not appear to him face to face, not yet,
Out of respect for her uncle, who would rage against Godlike Odysseus until he reached home.
 

325








330










335
 

BOOK 7

While Odysseus was praying in the grove, The strong mules bore Nausicaa to the city. She pulled up at the gate of her father's palace,
And her brothers, men like gods, crowded around,
Unhitched the mules, and took the clothes inside.	5
Nausicaa went to her bedroom, where Eurymedusa, Her waiting-woman, kindled a fire for her.
Eurymedusa had come from Apeire
In the curved ships, long ago, and had been chosen
From the spoils of war for Alcinous,	10
Who ruled the Phaeacians as if he were a god. It was this old woman who had reared
White-armed Nausicaa in the palace
And who now prepared her supper on the fire.

As Odysseus started out for the city,	15
Athena enveloped him in magic mist,
So that none of the Phaeacians he might meet Along the way would challenge him
And ask him who he was.
He was about to enter
The lovely city when the Grey-eyed One	20
Came up to him. She looked like a young girl Carrying a pitcher, standing there before him, And godlike Odysseus questioned her:
 

"My child, I wonder if you could guide me
To the house of Alcinous, the man	25
Who is lord of this people? I am a traveler From a far land, a stranger in need,
And I know no one in this city."

Athena's eyes flashed in the blue sealight:

"Well of course, grandad, I'll show you	30
Where Alcinous lives. His house is close to ours. Come on, I'll lead the way. But you'll have to be quiet. Don't look at anyone or ask any questions.
The people here aren't very tolerant of strangers
Or very welcoming. All they trust are their ships,	35
In which they cross the great ocean, because Poseidon lets them. Their ships are very fast, Fast as a flying bird, or even a thought."

Thus Pallas Athena, and she led the way
Quickly, while Odysseus followed	40
In the goddess' footsteps. None of the Phaeacians Noticed him as he moved through their city,
For the dread goddess, her hair done up in braids, Would not allow them, shedding around him
A magical mist that made him invisible.	45
She had a soft spot in her heart for the hero.

Odysseus marveled at the harbors
And the shapely ships, at the meeting grounds
 
And the long walls capped with palisades.
When they came to the king's palace,	50
The Grey-eyed One was the first to speak:

"Here you are, grandad, the house you asked for. You will find the lords feasting at a banquet.
Go inside and don't be afraid of anything.
Things turn out better for a man who is bold,	55
Especially if he's a stranger from a distant land. The first person you'll meet is the queen. Arete Is her name, and she's from the same line
As King Alcinous. It goes like this:
First Nausithous was born from Poseidon	60
And Periboea, a most beautiful woman, The youngest daughter of Eurymedon, Who once was king of the arrogant Giants.
He brought destruction down on his reckless people
And on himself. Well, anyway, Poseidon	65
Lay with Periboea and she bore a son, Nausithous, who ruled the Phaeacians. Nausithous fathered Rhexenor and Alcinous. Rhexenor had just got married when Apollo
Shot him with his silver bow in his hall.	70
He didn't leave a son, but did leave a daughter, Only one, Arete. Alcinous married her
And honored her as no other woman on earth Is honored, of all the women who keep house
For their husbands—that's how she is honored,	75
From the heart, and always has been,
Both by her children and by Alcinous himself
 
As by the people, who look to her as a goddess
And greet her as one when she goes through the city. She understands everything, and has sound judgment And settles quarrels with a generous heart.
If she likes you, there is a very good chance You will get to see your dear ones again
And the high-roofed hall in your own native land."

Thus the goddess with the seagrey eyes,
And then she was off over the desolate water, Leaving lovely Schería. She came to Marathon
And the wide streets of Athens, and she disappeared Into the great house of Erechtheus.

But Odysseus Went to the glorious palace of Alcinous.
There he stood, heart pounding as he took it all in Before crossing the bronze threshold. Gleams
As of the sun or the moon played over the high roof Of Alcinous' house. The bronze walls, surmounted With a blue enamel frieze, stretched from the threshold To the inner hall. The outer doors were golden,
And silver doorposts were set in the bronze threshold. The lintel was silver and the door handle gold.
Flanking the door were two gold and silver dogs Made by Hephaestus with all his art
To guard the palace, and they were immortal
And ageless. Inside, seats were built flush to the walls On either side, stretching from the threshold
To the inner hall, and upon them were flung
 




80










85











90








95








100
 
Robes of a fine, soft weave, the craft of women. The Phaeacian leaders would sit on these seats Eating and drinking, and they lacked for nothing. Golden statues of young men stood on pedestals Holding torches to light the night for banqueters.
There were fifty slave women scattered through the house, Some grinding yellow grain on the millstone,
Others weaving cloth or twirling yarn on spindles
As they sat, fluttering like so many leaves on a poplar, And the finely woven fabric glistened with oil.
For just as the Phaeacian men outstrip all others In sailing ships on the sea, so too are the women Skilled above all others in working the loom.
Athena has given them a deep understanding Of beautiful handiwork.
 

105








110








115
 
Outside the courtyard, Just beyond the doors, are four acres of orchard Surrounded by a hedge. The trees there grow tall, Blossoming pear trees and pomegranates,
Apple trees with bright, shiny fruit, sweet figs And luxuriant olives. The fruit of these trees Never perishes nor fails, summer or winter— It lasts year round, and the West Wind's breath
Continually ripens apple after apple, pear upon pear, Fig after fig, and one bunch of grapes after another. The fruitful vineyard is planted there, too.
One warm, level spot is for drying grapes
In the sun; elsewhere, some grapes are being gathered And others trod upon. In front, the unripe clusters Are losing their bloom, and others are turning purple.
 


120








125








130
 
By the last row of vines are trim garden plots With rich blooms of all sorts throughout the year. Two separate springs flow through the orchard, One of them meandering throughout the garden,
While the other flows under the courtyard threshold, And from this spring the townspeople draw their water.

Odysseus stood and gazed at all of the blessings The gods had lavished on the house of Alcinous. When he had taken it all in, he passed quickly Over the threshold and entered the house.
There he found the Phaeacian nobles Tipping their cups in honor of Hermes, To whom they poured libations last of all
When they thought it was time to take their rest. Odysseus, the godlike survivor, went through the hall In the heavy mist Athena had wrapped him in,
Until he came to Arete and Lord Alcinous. There he threw his arms around Arete's knees,
And the magical mist melted away at that moment. They were all hushed to silence, marveling
At the sight of Odysseus, who now made his prayer:

"Arete, daughter of godlike Rhexenor,
To your husband and to your knees I come
In great distress, and to these banqueters also— May the gods grant prosperity to them
In this life, and may each of them hand down
Their wealth and honor to their children after them. Grant me but this: a speedy passage home,
 



135










140








145








150










155








160
 
For I have suffered long, far from my people."

 
And with that he sat down in the ashes By the fireside. The hall fell silent.
Finally Echeneus, a Phaeacian elder,
Wise in the old ways and the ways of words, Spoke out with good will among them:

"Alcinous, this will not do at all. It is not proper That a guest sit in the ashes on the hearth.
We are all holding back, waiting on your word. Come, help the stranger up and have him sit Upon a silver-studded chair. And bid the heralds Mix wine, so we may pour libations also to Zeus, Lord of Thunder, who walks beside suppliants.
And let the housekeeper bring out food for our guest."

When the sacred King Alcinous heard this,
He took the hand of Odysseus, the cunning hero, And raised him from the fireside and had him sit On a polished chair from which he asked his son Laodamas to rise, for he was Alcinous'
Best beloved son, and sat at his right hand. A maid poured water from a golden pitcher Into a silver basin for him to wash his hands And then set up a polished table nearby.
Another serving woman, grave and dignified, Set out bread and generous helpings
From the other dishes she had. So Odysseus, Who had endured much, ate and drank.
 





165










170








175










180








185
 
And the sacred King Alcinous spoke to the herald:

 
"Pontonous, mix the bowl and serve wine
To all, so we may pour libations also to Zeus, Lord of Thunder, who walks beside suppliants."

Pontonous mixed the mellow wine And served it to all, pouring out first
Drops for libation, which they all tipped out. When they had drunk to their heart's content, Alcinous addressed them and said:

"Hear me, Phaeacian lords and counselors, So I may speak to you what is in my heart.
Now that you have feasted, go home to your rest. In the morning we will invite more of the elders And entertain the stranger in our halls
And offer fine sacrifices to the gods.
Then we will think of how to convey our guest To his own native land, so he may come home Speedily and with joy, be it ever so far.
Nor shall he suffer any harm or misfortune Before he sets foot upon his own land. Thereafter, He shall suffer whatever fate
The Spinners spun for him when he was born. But if he is one of the immortals
Come down from heaven, then the gods Have changed their ways. Always before this, Whenever we offered sacrifice to them,
They appeared to us in their own bright forms,
 

190










195










200








205








210








215
 
And they sat with us and shared the feast. Even when one of us meets them on the road
They do not conceal themselves, for we are kin, Just like the Cyclopes and savage Giants."

 
Odysseus, always thinking, answered him:

"Don't worry about that, Alcinous. I am not like The immortals, either in build or looks.
I am completely human. Better to liken me To the most woebegone man you ever knew. That's who I'd compare myself to.
I could tell you much more, a long tale
Of the suffering I've had by the will of the gods, But all I want now is to be allowed to eat,
Despite my grief. There is nothing more shameless Than this belly of ours, which forces a man
To pay attention to it, no matter how many Troubles he has, how much pain in his heart. I have pain in my heart, but my belly always
Makes me eat and drink and forget my troubles, Pestering me to keep it filled. So then,
Please do move quickly at break of day To set me ashore on my own native land, Even though it be after all my suffering.
I'd die gladly once I've seen my home again,
My household servants and my high-roofed hall."

They praised him, and urged that the stranger
Be sped on his way. He had said all the right things.
 

220










225








230








235








240
 
Then, when they had poured libations and drunk To their heart's content, they went home to rest. Odysseus was left behind in the hall
Sitting beside Arete and godlike Alcinous. The serving women cleared away the dishes, And then white-armed Arete broke the silence. She had recognized the mantle and tunic
As soon as she saw them, for she had made
These beautiful clothes herself, with her handmaids, And when she spoke her words flew on wings:

"Stranger, I myself will ask you this first. Who are you, and where do you come from?
And who gave you these clothes? Did you not say That you came here wandering over the sea?"

And Odysseus, never at a loss for words:

"It would be hard, my lady, to tell the tale Of all my troubles, since the heavenly gods
Have given me many. But I will tell you what You ask me about.
 




245








250










255











260
 
There is an island, Ogygia, that lies far off in the sea.
Adas' daughter lives there, guileful Calypso, Her hair rich as sea-foam, a dread goddess. No one, mortal or divine, ever visits her.
It was my bad luck to be led to her hearth By some mysterious force, all alone,
Washed up there after Zeus shattered my ship,
 








265
 
Slivering it with lightning on the wine-dark sea. My whole crew went down in that wreck,
But I hung on to the curved keel of my ship, Adrift for nine days. The tenth black night Brought me to the island of Ogygia
And the awesome goddess. She took me in, Gave me food, and said she would make me Immortal and ageless for all of my days.
But she never touched my heart. I spent
Seven years with Calypso. The immortal clothes She gave me were always wet with my tears.
Then, when the eighth year came around, she told me I could go, either because of some message from Zeus, Or because she herself had changed her mind.
She sent me off on a sturdy raft, well stocked With bread and wine, and she clothed me well, And put a breeze at my back, gentle and warm. Seventeen days I sailed the deep water,
And on the eighteenth day the shadowy mountains Of your land appeared, and my heart was glad.
But my luck turned sour, and I was soon engulfed In suffering sent by the Earthshaker Poseidon.
He stirred up the winds, blocking my course, And roused up huge seas that left me groaning And unable to stay with my raft, which was Shattered to pieces by the hurricane winds.
I swam my way through all that saltwater
Until wind and wave brought me here to your coast. But if I had tried to come ashore, the pounding surf Would have smashed me to bits on the beetling crags.
 



270








275








280








285








290








295
 
I swam back out and then along the coast Until I came to a river, the perfect spot,
Lined with smooth stones and sheltered from the wind. I staggered out, exhausted. Night was coming on.
I climbed the river bank and lay down to sleep In the bushes, covering myself with dry leaves. Some god shed upon me boundless slumber, And I slept in the leaves, my heart troubled—
Slept through the night, through dawn and high noon, And did not wake until the sun was going down.
When I awoke I saw your daughter's handmaids Playing on the shore, and saw your daughter Like a goddess among them. It was she
I supplicated, and she understood Everything perfectly. You would not expect Anyone so young to act with such grace,
For the young are thoughtless. She gave me bread And bright red wine, bathed me in the river
And gave me these clothes.
As much as it pains me To recall it, all I have told you is true."

And Alcinous responded:

"Stranger,
My daughter was out of line in not bringing you Here to our house along with her handmaids, Since you went to her first as a suppliant."

And Odysseus, with his usual presence of mind:
 



300








305








310








315















320
 

 
"Do not rebuke your blameless daughter for this, My lord. She did tell me to follow along
With the girls, but I refused out of fear and shame, Thinking your heart might cloud over with anger. People everywhere, I have found, have tempers."

Alcinous answered him:

"Stranger,
My heart is not like that, to grow angry
Without cause. Better to give all things their due. I would wish, by Zeus, by Athena and Apollo, That you, being the kind of man you are—
My kind of man—would marry my daughter And stay here and be called my son. I would Give you a house filled with possessions
If you chose to remain, but no Phaeacian Will ever keep you here against your will—
And may such a thing never please Father Zeus. As for your send-off, so you can be sure of it,
It will be tomorrow. You will lie down and sleep While they row you over the calm water
Until you come to your home, or wherever you will, Even if it is much farther away than Euboea,
Which our sailors say is the farthest of lands.
They went there once when they took Rhadamanthus To visit Tityus, the son of Earth.
They made the round trip in a single day
Without even trying. But you will see for yourself
 



325













330








335








340








345
 
How good our ships and rowers are."

Odysseus, the godlike survivor, was glad, And he spoke in prayer:

"Father Zeus, Let Alcinous accomplish all that he says.
May his fame never fade over all the earth, And may I reach at last my own native land."

So they spoke, and white-armed Arete told her maids To place a bed on the porch and spread upon it Beautiful purple blankets and fleecy cloaks.
The maids went out of the hall with torches
And made up the bed. Then they called to Odysseus: "You may lie down, stranger. Your bed is made."
These were welcome words, and Odysseus, Who had suffered much, fell asleep on the bed
Under the echoing portico. But Alcinous lay down In the innermost chamber of that lofty house,
And his lady shared his bed and slept beside him.
 

350













355










360











365
 

BOOK 8

Dawn spread her roselight over the sky, And Alcinous awoke in all his sacred might, As did Zeus-born Odysseus, sacker of cities.
Alcinous led the way to the Phaeacian assembly,
Which was built near the harbor. The Phaeacians	5
Filed in and sat on the polished stones Close by each other, and Pallas Athena,
Disguised as Alcinous' herald, went through the city To lay the groundwork for Odysseus' trip home,
Going up to each man and saying to him:	10
"Gather round, Phaeacian leaders and counselors, And go to the assembly to learn of the stranger Who has just arrived at Alcinous' palace,
Driven over the sea, a man like a god."
This got their attention, and the seats	15
In the assembly filled up quickly with men Who marveled at the sight of Laertes' son, For Athena poured on his shoulders and head A shimmering grace and made him taller
And more heavily muscled, so that he would be	20
Welcomed by the Phaeacians as a man to respect, And so he would be able to accomplish the feats The Phaeacians would use to test his mettle.
 
When the men were all gathered, Alcinous spoke:
"Hear me, Phaeacian lords and counselors,	25
So I may speak what is in my heart. This stranger has come to my house
In his wanderings. I don't know who he is, Or if he has come from the east or the west.
He asks for passage home, and asks us to set	30
A firm time for departure. Let us speed him On his way, as we have always done.
No one has ever come to my house
And languished here long for lack of transport.
Haul a black ship, then, onto the bright saltwater	35
For her maiden voyage. And pick two and fifty Of the best young sailors in all the land.
When you have lashed the oars well at the benches, Disembark and hurry to my house. We have a feast
To prepare, and I will provide well for all!	40
Those are my orders for the younger men. But you others, all the sceptered kings, Come to my palace and help me entertain The stranger in the hall. Let no one refuse.
And summon the godlike singer of tales,	45
Demodocus. For the god has given him, Beyond all others, song that delights However his heart urges him to sing."

So saying, he led the way, followed
By the sceptered kings. A herald went	50
For the godlike singer, and two and fifty
 
Chosen young sailors went, as he ordered, Down to the shore of the barren sea.
There they hauled a ship out onto the water.
They set up mast and sail in that swift, black ship,	55
Fit the oars into the leather thole-straps,
All in due order, and then unfurled the white sails. They moored the ship where her sails would catch The evening breeze, and then went their way
To the great palace of wise Alcinous.	60
The porticoes, courtyards, and rooms were filled With crowds of men both young and old.
Alcinous sacrificed for them a dozen sheep,
Eight white-tusked boars, and two shambling oxen,
Which they flayed and dressed for the feast.	65
Then the herald came up leading Demodocus. The Muse loved this man, but gave him Good and evil both, snuffing out the light
Of his eyes as she opened his heart to sweet song.
Pontonous, the herald, had the bard sit	70
Among the banqueters on a silver-studded chair
Propped against a column, and he hung the clear-toned lyre On a peg above Demodocus' head
And showed him how to reach it with his hands.
He set up a table and basket beside the bard	75
And a cup of wine ready at hand.
They all reached out to the feast before them, And when they had satisfied their appetites, The Muse moved the bard to sing of heroes.
The piece that he sang was already famed	80
Throughout the world—the quarrel
 
Odysseus once had with Achilles,
Going head to head at a feast of the gods With violent words, and Agamemnon, The warlord, rejoiced that these two,
The best of the Greeks, were at each other's throats. For long ago, when he crossed the stone threshold In sacred Pytho to consult the oracle,
Apollo had prophesied that this would happen. That was in the days when the great tide of woe Was rolling in upon Trojans and Greeks alike Through the will of great Zeus.
This was the song The renowned bard sang. But Odysseus Pulled his great purple cloak over his head And hid his handsome face. He was ashamed
To let the Phaeacians see his tears falling down. Whenever the singer paused, Odysseus
Would wipe away his tears, pick up his great cup And pour libations to the gods. But when the singer Started again, urged on by the Phaeacian lords, Who delighted in his words, Odysseus
Would cover his head again and moan.
He managed to conceal his tears from everyone Except Alcinous, who sat at his elbow
And could not help but hear his heavy sighs. Alcinous acted quickly and said to his guests:

"Hear me, Phaeacian nobles and lords. We have had enough of feasting now, And of the lyre that complements a feast.
 






85








90










95








100








105
 
We should go outdoors for some contests now, All the athletic events, so that this stranger
Can tell his friends back home how good we are In boxing, wrestling, jumping, and footraces."

And with that he led them outdoors. The herald Hung the clear-toned lyre on its peg
And led Demodocus by the hand Out of the hall and along the road
The nobles had gone down to see the games. They made their way to the assembly grounds, And huge crowds trailed along, thousands Past counting.
 

110










115








120
 
Then up rose the young heroes.
Up rose Acroneus and Ocyalus and Elatreus; Nauteus, Prymneus, Anchialus, and Eretmeus; Ponteus, Proreus, Thoön, and Anabesineus; Amphialus, Polyneus' son and Tecton's grandson; And Euryalus, a match for the War God
And son of Naubolus. He was the handsomest Of the Phaeacians, after peerless Laodamas. And up rose the three sons of Alcinous, Laodamas, Halius, and godlike Clytoneus.

The first contest was a footrace. The course Stretched out before them from the starting post, And they were off, raising dust from the plain As they sped along. No one could keep up
With Clytoneus, who extended his lead
 








125








130










135
 
To the length of a furrow a mule-team plows.
That's how far ahead he was when he reached the crowd, Leaving the rest of the field far behind.
Wrestling was next, and in this painful sport Euryalus outdid the other young princes.
The best jumper proved to be Amphialus; Elatreus took the discus throw; and Laodamas, Alcinous' son, outboxed all comers.
Everyone had enjoyed the games, and then Alcinous' son Laodamas said to his friends:

"Come on, now. We should ask the stranger Whether he is skilled in any sport. His build Is impressive enough, his thighs and calves, His arms and stout neck. This man is strong!
He's still got what it takes, but he has been broken By many hardships. Nothing's worse than the sea
To get a man out of shape, no matter how strong he is." And Euryalus answered him:
"Well spoken, Laodamas. Go ahead And challenge him yourself, in public."

When Laodamas heard this, he strode out Front and center and spoke to Odysseus:

"You should come forward, too, as our guest, And try your hand at one of the sports,
If you are skilled in any. I'm sure you are,
 








140








145










150











155











160
 
For there is no greater glory a man can win in life Than the glory he wins with his hands and feet. So shrug off your cares and give it a try.
It won't delay your journey. Your ship
Is already launched and the crew is ready." Odysseus, always thinking, answered him this way:
"Laodamas, why do you provoke me like this? I have more serious things on my mind
Than track and field. I've had my share of suffering, And paid my dues. Now I sit in the middle
Of your assembly, longing to return home,
A suppliant before your king and all the people." Then Euryalus taunted him to his face:
"You know, stranger, I've seen a lot of sportsmen, And you don't look like one to me at all.
You look more like the captain of a merchant ship, Plying the seas with a crew of hired hands
And keeping a sharp eye on his cargo, Greedy for profit. No, you're no athlete."
Odysseus stared the man down and said: "That's an ugly thing to say, stranger,
And it makes you look like a reckless fool. The sad truth is that the gods don't give anyone All their gifts, whether it's looks, intelligence,
 








165











170











175










180
 
Or eloquence. One man might not have good looks, But the gods crown his words with beauty,
And men look at him with delight. He speaks With unfaltering grace and sweet modesty, And stands out in any crowd. When he walks Through town, men look upon him as a god. Another man might look like an immortal, But his words are not crowned with beauty. That's how it is with you. Your looks
Are outstanding. Not even a god
Could improve them. But your mind is crippled. And now you've got my blood pumping
With your rude remarks. I'm no novice in sports, As you suggest. No, I was one of the best, When I could trust my youth and my hands.
Now I'm slowed down by my aches and pains And the suffering I've had in war and at sea. Even so, even with all I've been through,
I'll give your games a try. Your words Cut deep, and now you've got me going."

He jumped up, cloak still on, and grabbed a discus Larger than the others, thicker and much heavier Than the one the Phaeacians used for competition. Winding up, he let it fly, and the stone,
Launched with incredible force from his hand, Hummed as it flew. The Phaeacians ducked
As the discus zoomed overhead and finally landed Far beyond the other marks. Pallas Athena,
Who looked like a man now, marked the spot
 

185








190








195








200










205








210
 
Where it came down, and she called out to him:

 
"Even a blind man could find your mark, stranger, For it's not all mixed up with the others
But way out front. You can be confident
No Phaeacian will come close to this throw."

Odysseus cheered up at this, glad to see A loyal supporter out on the field.
In a lighter mood now, he spoke to the Phaeacians:

"Match that if you can, boys. In a minute I'll get another one out just as far or farther. And if anyone else has the urge to try me, Step right up—I'm angry now—
I don't care if it's boxing, wrestling,
Or even running. Come one, come all— Except Laodamas, who is my host.
Only a fool would challenge the man
Who gives him hospitality in a distant land. He would only wind up hurting himself.
But I wouldn't turn down anyone else, Or take any of you lightly. I only want
To see what you're made of, and to test myself. I'm not weak in any athletic event,
And I really know how to handle a bow. I'm always the first to hit my man
In the enemy lines, no matter how many archers Are standing with me and getting off shots.
Only Philoctetes, of all the Greeks,
 

215










220










225








230








235








240
 
Outshot me at Troy. No one else came close, Nor could any man now alive on this earth. I do not compare myself to the men of old, To Heracles, or Oechalian Eurytus,
Who tried to outshoot the immortal gods. Eurytus died young, killed by Apollo,
Who was angry that he had challenged him To a contest with the bow.
As for the spear,
I can throw it farther than you can shoot an arrow. It's only in running that I fear some Phaeacian May beat me to the line. I've taken a pounding Out in the waves, and didn't come here aboard
A well-stocked ship, so my legs are still shaky."

He spoke, and they were all stunned to silence. Only Alcinous was able to answer:

"Your words, stranger, are not ungracious. You want only to demonstrate your prowess, Angry that this man stood up at the games And taunted you in a way no one ever would Who knew in his heart how to speak fitly.
But now listen to my words, so that one day, As you sit feasting with your wife and children, You may tell another hero what you remember Of the Phaeacians' skill in the feats that Zeus Established as ours in our forefathers' days.
For we are not flawless boxers or wrestlers, But we are swift of foot, and the best sailors,
 








245










250










255










260








265
 
And we love feasts and the lyre and dancing, Fresh clothes, warm baths, and soft beds.
Up now, let the best dancers in Phaeacia dance, So that the stranger can tell his friends back home How superior we are in seamanship,
In fleetness of foot, in dancing, and in song. Someone go get Demodocus his lyre,
Which is lying somewhere in the palace halls."

Thus godlike Alcinous, and the herald left
To get the hollow lyre from the king's palace. Then up rose the officials, nine in all,
Who were in charge of the games. They marked out A wide dancing ring and made the ground level.
The herald returned with the lyre, and Demodocus Moved to the middle of the dancing ring, Surrounded by boys in the bloom of youth, Accomplished dancers all. Their feet struck the floor Of the sacred ring, and as Odysseus watched
He marveled at how their feet flashed in the air.

Then Demodocus swept the strings of his lyre And began his song. He sang of the passion Between Ares and gold-crowned Aphrodite, How they first made love in Hephaestus' house, Sneaking around, and how the War God Ares Showered her with gifts and shamed the bed
Of her husband, Hephaestus. But it wasn't long Before Hephaestus found out. Helios told him
 




270








275










280








285










290
 
That he had seen them lying together in love. When Hephaestus heard this heart-wrenching news He went to his forge, brooding on his wrongs,
And set the great anvil up on its block
And hammered out a set of unbreakable bonds, Bonds that couldn't loosen, bonds meant to stay put. When he had wrought this snare, furious with Ares, He went to his bedroom and spread the bonds
All around the bedposts, and hung many also From the high roofbeams, as fine as cobwebs, So fine not even the gods could see them.
When he had spread this cunning snare All around the bed, he pretended to leave On a trip to Lemnos, his favorite city.
Ares wasn't blind, and when he saw Hephaestus On his way out, he headed for the house
Of the glorious smith, itching to make love
To the Cytherean goddess. She had been visiting Her father, Zeus, and was just sitting down When Ares came in, took her hand, and said:

"Let's go to bed, my love, and lie down together. Hephaestus has left town, off to Lemnos no doubt To visit the barbarous Sintians."

This suggestion appealed to the goddess,
And they climbed into bed. They were settling in When the chains Hephaestus had cunningly wrought Fell all around them. They couldn't move an inch, Couldn't lift a finger, and by the time it sank in
 

295








300








305








310










315










320
 
That there was no escape, there was Hephaestus, Gimpy-legged and glorious, coming in the door. He had turned back on his way to Lemnos
As soon as Helios, his spy, gave him the word. He stood in the doorway, seething with anger, And with an ear-splitting yell called to the gods:

"Father Zeus and all you blessed gods eternal, Come see something that is as ridiculous
As it is unendurable, how Aphrodite, Daughter of Zeus, scorns me for being lame And loves that marauder Ares instead
Because he is handsome and well-knit, whereas I Was born misshapen, which is no one's fault
But my parents', who should have never begotten me! Come take a look at how these two
Have climbed into my bed to make love and lie In each other's arms. It kills me to see it!
But I don't think they will want to lie like this Much longer, no matter how loving they are. No, they won't want to sleep together for long, But they're staying put in my little snare
Until her father returns all of the gifts
I gave him to marry this bitch-faced girl, His beautiful, yes, but faithless daughter."

Thus Hephaestus, and the gods gathered At his bronze threshold.
 




325










330








335








340








345
 
Poseidon came,
The God of Earthquake, and Hermes the Guide,
 
And the Archer Apollo. The goddesses
All stayed home, out of modesty; but the gods Stood in the doorway and laughed uncontrollably When they saw Hephaestus' cunning and craft. One of them would look at another and snigger:
 

350
 

 
"Crime doesn't pay."
 

"The slow catches the swift.
 

355
 
Slow as he is, old Gimpy caught Ares, The fastest god on Olympus."
"Ares has to pay the fine for adultery."

 
That was the general drift of their jibes. And then Apollo turned to Hermes and said:

"Tell me, Hermes, would you be willing
To be pinched in chains if it meant you could lie Side by side with golden Aphrodite?"
And the quicksilver messenger shot back: "I tell you what, Apollo. Tie me up
With three times as many unbreakable chains,
And get all the gods and goddesses, too,
To come here and look, if it means I can sleep Side by side with golden Aphrodite."

The gods roared with laughter, except Poseidon Who did not think it was fanny. He kept Pleading that Ares should be released,
 



360













365










370
 
And his words winged their way to Hephaestus:

 
"Let him go, and I will ensure he will pay you Fair compensation before all the gods."
And the renowned god, lame in both legs: "Do not ask me to do this, Poseidon.
Worthless is the surety assured for the worthless.
How could I ever hold you to your promise
If Ares slipped out of the bonds and the debt?" Poseidon the Earthshaker did not back off:
"Hephaestus, if Ares gets free and disappears Without paying the debt, I will pay it myself."

And the renowned god, lame in both legs: "I cannot refuse you. It wouldn't be right."
And with that the strong smith undid the bonds, And the two of them, free at last from their crimp, Shot out of there, Ares to Thrace,
And Aphrodite, who loves laughter and smiles, To Paphos on Cyprus, and her precinct there With its smoking altar. There the Graces
Bathed her and rubbed her with the ambrosial oil That glistens on the skin of the immortal gods. And then they dressed her in beautiful clothes,
 



375











380















385










390
 
A wonder to see.

This was the song The renowned bard sang, and Odysseus
Was glad as he listened, as were the Phaeacians, Men who are famed for their long-oared ships.

Then Alcinous had Halius and Laodamas Dance alone, for no one could match them. They picked up a beautiful iridescent ball, The work of Polybus. One of them
Would lean backward and toss it high Toward the shadowy clouds, and the other Would leap and catch it and shoot it back up Before his feet ever touched ground again.
When they had tried their skill with upward throws They started to dance on the bounteous earth, Tossing the ball constantly back and forth.
The others beat time as they stood on the field, And thunderous applause rose from the crowd.

Then Odysseus said to Alcinous:

"Lord Alcinous, you said that your dancers Are the best in the world, and your words Have proved true. I am in awe before them."

So he spoke, and the sacred king was glad. He turned to his sea-loving people and said:
 

395














400








405








410











415
 

 
"Hear me Phaeacian lords and counselors. Our guest seems in my eyes to be a man Of the highest discernment. Come, then, Let us give him a gift that befits a guest.
Twelve honored kings are lords in Phaeacia, And I myself am the thirteenth king.
Let each of you twelve bring here now
A fresh cloak and tunic and a bar of fine gold. Let us get these all together at once,
So that our guest may have these gifts in hand And be glad at heart when he goes to supper. And let Euryalus apologize and give him a gift,
For what he said to our guest was in no way proper."

The lords all approved of what Alcinous said, And each sent a herald to fetch the gifts.
Then Euryalus in turn answered Alcinous:

"Lord Alcinous, renowned above all men,
I will indeed apologize to our guest, as you bid. And I will give him this sword, all bronze
And with a silver hilt. It comes with a scabbard
Of newly sawn ivory, and will be worth much to him."

And he put the silver-studded sword Into Odysseus' hands and said to him:

"Revered stranger and guest, if any word Has been harshly spoken, may the winds
 





420








425








430











435










440
 
Snatch it away. And may the gods grant
That you see your wife and come to your homeland, For you have suffered long apart from your people."

And Odysseus, whose thoughts were many:

"And you, my friend, be well, and may the gods Grant you happiness. And may you never miss This sword you have given me to make amends."

He spoke, and slung the silver-studded sword Around one shoulder.
 




445













450
 
The sun went down, And the gifts were ready to be presented.
The heralds brought them into the palace And Alcinous' sons set them down
Before their mother. They were beautiful gifts. Alcinous, the sacred king, led the way
And the lords entered and sat on their thrones. Then Alcinous in his might addressed Arete:

"Bring out the finest chest you have, my wife, And place in it a newly washed cloak and tunic. And heat water for our guest in a bronze cauldron, So that when he has bathed and seen the gifts
The Phaeacians have brought all neatly stowed, He will enjoy the feast and the words of the song. And I will give him this beautiful cup,
Pure gold, to remember me by all of his days
 








455










460








465
 
As he pours wine to Zeus and to the other gods."

 
He spoke, and Arete signaled her women To set a cauldron on the fire instantly.
They filled the cauldron with water for a bath, Set kindling beneath it and lit the fire.
The flames licked the belly of the cauldron And the water grew warm.
Arete meanwhile Brought out a handsome chest for the stranger And placed within it the beautiful gifts,
The clothes and the gold which the nobles gave. And she herself placed in it a cloak
And beautiful tunic. And she said to Odysseus:

"There is the lid. Tie it down with a knot
As a precaution against someone robbing you On your way back, when you are lying asleep On your journey home in the swift, black ship."

When Odysseus, who had borne much, heard this, He tied the lid down quickly with a cunning knot
He had learned from Circe. Then the housekeeper came To tell him it was time to go and bathe. The warm bath Was a welcome sight to Odysseus. He had not been Cared for like this since leaving Calypso,
Who had treated him as if he were a god.

When the women had bathed him, rubbed him with oil, And clothed him in a beautiful tunic and cloak,
 





470










475










480










485










490
 
Odysseus strode from the bath and was on his way To join the men drinking wine.
Nausicaa, Beautiful as only the gods could make her, Stood by the doorpost of the great hall.
Her eyes went wide when she saw Odysseus, And her words beat their way to him on wings:

"Farewell, stranger, and remember me
In your own native land. I saved your life." And Odysseus, whose thoughts ran deep:
"Nausicaa, daughter of great Alcinous, So may Zeus, Hera's thundering lord, Grant that I see my homeland again. There I will pray to you, as to a god, All of my days. I owe you my life."

And he took his seat next to Lord Alcinous. They were serving food and mixing the wine When the herald came up leading the bard, Honored Demodocus, and seated him on a chair
Propped against a tall pillar in the middle of the hall. Odysseus, with his great presence of mind,
Cut off part of a huge chine of roast pork Glistening with fat, and said to the herald:

"Herald, take this cut of meat to Demodocus For him to eat. And I will greet him
 








495











500










505










510










515
 
Despite my grief. Bards are revered By all men upon earth, for the Muse
Loves them well and has taught them the songways."

 
The herald brought the cut of meat to Demodocus And placed it in his hands, much to the bard's delight. Then everyone reached out to the feast before them,
And when they had eaten and drunk to their hearts' content, Odysseus spoke to Demodocus:

"I don't know whether it was the Muse Who taught you, or Apollo himself,
But I praise you to the skies, Demodocus. When you sing about the fate of the Greeks Who fought at Troy, you have it right,
All that they did and suffered, all they endured. It's as if you had been there yourself,
Or heard a first-hand account. But now, Switch to the building of the wooden horse Which Epeius made with Athena's help, The horse which Odysseus led up to Troy As a trap, filled with men who would Destroy great Ilion. If you tell me this story
Just as it happened, I will tell the whole world That some god must have opened his heart And given to you the divine gift of song."

So he spoke, and the bard, moved by the god, Began to sing. He made them see it happen,
How the Greeks set fire to their huts on the beach
 



520










525








530








535










540
 
And were sailing away, while Odysseus
And the picked men with him sat in the horse, Which the Trojans had dragged into their city. There the horse stood, and the Trojans sat around it And could not decide what they should do.
There were three ways of thinking:
Hack open the timbers with pitiless bronze,
Or throw it from the heights to the rocks below, Or let it stand as an offering to appease the gods. The last was what would happen, for it was fated That the city would perish once it enclosed
The great wooden horse, in which now sat
The Greek heroes who would spill Troy's blood. The song went on. The Greeks poured out
Of their hollow ambush and sacked the city. He sang how one hero here and another there Ravaged tall Troy, but how Odysseus went, Like the War God himself, with Menelaus
To the house of Deiphobus, and there, he said, Odysseus fought his most daring battle
And won with the help of Pallas Athena.

This was his song. And Odysseus wept. Tears Welled up in his eyes and flowed down his cheeks.

A woman wails as she throws herself upon Her husband's body. He has fallen in battle Before the town walls, fighting to the last To defend his city and protect his children.
As she sees him dying and gasping for breath
 




545








550








555








560










565










570
 
She clings to him and shrieks, while behind her Soldiers prod their spears into her shoulders and back, And as they lead her away into slavery
Her tear-drenched face is a mask of pain.

 
So too Odysseus, pitiful in his grief.
He managed to conceal his tears from everyone Except Alcinous, who sat at his elbow
And could not help but hear his heavy sighs. Alcinous acted quickly and said to his guests:

"Hear me, Phaeacian counselors and lords— Demodocus should stop playing his lyre.
His song is not pleasing to everyone here. Ever since dinner began and the divine bard Rose up to sing, our guest has not ceased From lamentation. He is overcome with grief. Let the lyre stop. It is better if we all,
Host and guest alike, can enjoy the feast.
All that we are doing we are doing on behalf Of the revered stranger, providing him
With passage home and gifts of friendship.
A stranger and suppliant is as dear as a brother To anyone with even an ounce of good sense.
So there is no need, stranger, for you to withhold What I am about to ask for, no need to be crafty Or think of gain. Better to speak the plain truth. Tell me your name, the one you were known by
To your mother and father and your people back home. No one is nameless, rich man or poor.
 

575










580








585








590








595
 
Parents give names to all of their children When they are born. And tell me your country, Your city, and your land, so that our ships
May take you there, finding their way by their wits. For Phaeacian ships do not have pilots,
Nor steering oars, as other ships have.
They know on their own their passengers' thoughts, And know all the cities and rich fields in the world, And they cross the great gulfs with the greatest speed, Hidden in mist and fog, with never a fear
Of damage or shipwreck.
But I remember hearing My father, Nausithous, say how Poseidon
Was angry with us because we always give Safe passage to men. He said that one day Poseidon would smite a Phaeacian ship
As it sailed back home over the misty sea,
And would encircle our city within a mountain. The old man used to say that, and either the god Will bring it to pass or not, as suits his pleasure. But tell me this, and tell me the truth.
Where have you wandered, to what lands? Tell me about the people and cities you saw,
Which ones are cruel and without right and wrong, And which are godfearing and kind to strangers. And tell me why you weep and grieve at heart When you hear the fate of the Greeks and Trojans. This was the gods' doing. They spun that fate
So that in later times it would turn into song. Did some kinsman of yours die at Troy,
 



600








605










610








615








620








625
 
A good, loyal man, your daughter's husband Or your wife's father, someone near and dear, Or perhaps even a relative by blood?
Or was it a comrade, tried and true?
A friend like that is no less than a brother."
 




630
 

BOOK 9

And Odysseus, his great mind teeming:

"My Lord Alcinous, what could be finer Than listening to a singer of tales
Such as Demodocus, with a voice like a god's?
Nothing we do is sweeter than this—	5
A cheerful gathering of all the people Sitting side by side throughout the halls, Feasting and listening to a singer of tales, The tables filled with food and drink,
The server drawing wine from the bowl	10
And bringing it around to fill our cups.
For me, this is the finest thing in the world. But you have a mind to draw out of me
My pain and sorrow, and make me feel it again.
Where should I begin, where end my story?	15
Heaven has sent me many tribulations.
I will tell you my name first, so that you, too, Will know who I am, and when I escape
The day of my doom, I will always be
Your friend and host, though my home is far.	20
I am Odysseus, great Laertes' son,
Known for my cunning throughout the world, And my fame reaches even to heaven.
My native land is Ithaca, a sunlit island
 
With a forested peak called Neriton,	25
Visible for miles. Many other islands
Lie close around her—Doulichion, Same,
And wooded Zacynthus—off toward the sunrise, But Ithaca lies low on the evening horizon,
A rugged place, a good nurse of men.	30
No sight is sweeter to me than Ithaca. Yes, Calypso, the beautiful goddess, kept me In her caverns, yearning to possess me; And Circe, the witch of Aeaea, held me
In her halls and yearned to possess me;	35
But they could not persuade me or touch my heart. Nothing is sweeter than your own country
And your own parents, not even living in a rich house— Not if it's far from family and home.
But let me tell you of the hard journey homeward	40
Zeus sent me on when I sailed from Troy.

From Ilion the wind took me to the Cicones
In Ismaros. I pillaged the town and killed the men. The women and treasure that we took out
I divided as fairly as I could among all hands	45
And then gave the command to pull out fast. That was my order, but the fools wouldn't listen. They drank a lot of wine and slaughtered
A lot of sheep and cattle on the shore.
Some of the town's survivors got away inland	50
And called their kinsmen. There were more of them, And they were braver, too, men who knew how to fight
 
From chariots and on foot. They came on as thick As leaves and flowers in spring, attacking
At dawn. We were out of luck, cursed by Zeus	55
To suffer heavy losses. The battle-lines formed Along our beached ships, and bronze spears Sliced through the air. As long as the day's heat Climbed toward noon, we held our ground
Against superior numbers. But when the sun	60
Dipped down, the Cicones beat us down, too. We lost six fighting men from each of our ships. The rest of us cheated destiny and death.
We sailed on in shock, glad to get out alive
But grieving for our lost comrades.	65
I wouldn't let the ships get under way Until someone had called out three times
For each mate who had fallen on the battlefield. And then Zeus hit us with a norther,
A freak hurricane. The clouds blotted out	70
Land and sea, and night climbed up the sky. The ships pitched ahead. When their sails Began to shred in the gale-force winds,
We lowered them and stowed them aboard,
Fearing the worst, and rowed hard for the mainland.	75
We lay offshore two miserable days and nights. When Dawn combed her hair in the third day's light, We set up the masts, hoisted the white sails,
And took our seats. The wind and the helmsmen
Steered the ships, and I would have made it home	80
Unscathed, but as I was rounding Cape Malea
 
The waves, the current, and wind from the North Drove me off course past Cythera Island.
 

Nine days of bad winds blew us across
The teeming seas. On the tenth day we came To the land of the Lotus-Eaters.
We went ashore, And the crews lost no time in drawing water And preparing a meal beside their ships.
After they had filled up on food and drink,
I sent out a team—two picked men and a herald— To reconnoiter and sound out the locals.
They headed out and made contact with the Lotus-Eaters, Who meant no harm but did give my men
Some lotus to eat. Whoever ate that sweet fruit Lost the will to report back, preferring instead
To stay there, munching lotus, oblivious of home. I hauled them back wailing to the ships,
Bound them under the benches, then ordered All hands to board their ships on the double Before anyone else tasted the lotus.
They were aboard in no time and at their benches, Churning the sea white with their oars.

We sailed on, our morale sinking,
And we came to the land of the Cyclopes, Lawless savages who leave everything
Up to the gods. These people neither plow nor plant, But everything grows for them unsown:
 




85










90








95








100










105
 
Wheat, barley, and vines that bear
Clusters of grapes, watered by rain from Zeus. They have no assemblies or laws but live
In high mountain caves, ruling their own Children and wives and ignoring each other.

A fertile island slants across the harbor's mouth, Neither very close nor far from the Cyclopes' shore. It's well-wooded and populated with innumerable Wild goats, uninhibited by human traffic.
Not even hunters go there, tramping through the woods And roughing it on the mountainsides.
It pastures no flocks, has no tilled fields— Unplowed, unsown, virgin forever, bereft
Of men, all it does is support those bleating goats. The Cyclopes do not sail and have no craftsmen To build them benched, red-prowed ships
That could supply all their wants, crossing the sea To other cities, visiting each other as other men do. These same craftsmen would have made this island Into a good settlement. It's not a bad place at all And would bear everything in season. Meadows Lie by the seashore, lush and soft,
Where vines would thrive. It has level plowland
With deep, rich soil that would produce bumper crops Season after season. The harbor's good, too,
No need for moorings, anchor-stones, or tying up. Just beach your ship until the wind is right
And you're ready to sail. At the harbor's head A spring flows clear and bright from a cave
 




110










115








120








125








130








135
 
Surrounded by poplars.
There we sailed in,
 
Some god guiding us through the murky night. We couldn't see a thing. A thick fog Enveloped the ships, and the moon
Wasn't shining in the cloud-covered sky.
None of us could see the island, or the long waves Rolling toward the shore, until we ran our ships Onto the sandy beach. Then we lowered sail, Disembarked, and fell asleep on the sand.

Dawn came early, with palmettoes of rose, And we explored the island, marveling at it. The spirit-women, daughters of Zeus, Roused the mountain goats so that my men Could have a meal. We ran to the ships,
Got our javelins and bows, formed three groups And started to shoot. The god let us bag our game, Nine goats for each of the twelve ships,
Except for my ship, which got ten.

So all day long until the sun went down We feasted on meat and sweet wine.
The ships had not yet run out of the dark red Each crew had taken aboard in large jars When we ransacked the Cicones' sacred city. And we looked across at the Cyclopes' land. We could see the smoke from their fires
And hear their voices, and their sheep and goats. When the sun set, and darkness came on
 




140








145










150










155








160
 
We went to sleep on the shore of the sea. As soon as dawn brightened in the rosy sky,
I assembled all the crews and spoke to them:

'The rest of you will stay here while I go With my ship and crew on reconnaissance. I want to find out what those men are like,
Wild savages with no sense of right or wrong Or hospitable folk who fear the gods.'

With that, I boarded ship and ordered my crew
To get on deck and cast off. They took their places And were soon whitening the sea with their oars. As we pulled in over the short stretch of water, There on the shoreline we saw a high cave Overhung with laurels. It was a place
Where many sheep and goats were penned at night. Around it was a yard fenced in by stones
Set deep in the earth, and by tall pines and crowned oaks. This was the lair of a huge creature, a man
Who pastured his flocks off by himself,
And lived apart from others and knew no law.
He was a freak of nature, not like men who eat bread, But like a lone wooded crag high in the mountains.

I ordered part of my crew to stay with the ship And counted off the twelve best to go with me. I took along a goatskin filled with red wine,
A sweet vintage I had gotten from Maron,
Apollo's priest on Ismaros, when I spared both him
 



165










170










175








180








185










190
 
And his wife and child out of respect for the god. He lived in a grove of Phoebus Apollo
And gave me splendid gifts: seven bars of gold, A solid-silver bowl, and twelve jars of wine, Sweet and pure, a drink for the gods.
Hardly anyone in his house, none of the servants, Knew about this wine—just Maron, his wife, And a single housekeeper. Whenever he drank
This sweet dark red wine, he would fill one goblet And pour it into twenty parts of water,
And the bouquet that spread from the mixing bowl Was so fragrant no one could hold back from drinking. I had a large skin of this wine, a sack
Of provisions—and a strong premonition
That we had a rendezvous with a man of great might, A savage with no notion of right and wrong.

We got to the cave quickly. He was out, Tending his flocks in the rich pastureland. We went inside and had a good look around.
There were crates stuffed with cheese, and pens Crammed with lambs and kids—firstlings, Middlings, and newborns in separate sections. The vessels he used for milking—pails and bowls
Of good workmanship—were brimming with whey. My men thought we should make off with some cheese And then come back for the lambs and kids,
Load them on board, and sail away on the sea. But I wouldn't listen. It would have been far better If I had! But I wanted to see him, and see
 








195








200








205










210








215
 
If he would give me a gift of hospitality.
When he did come he was not a welcome sight.

We lit a fire and offered sacrifice
And helped ourselves to some of the cheese. Then we sat and waited in the cave
Until he came back, herding his flocks. He carried a huge load of dry wood
To make a fire for his supper and heaved it down With a crash inside the cave. We were terrified And scurried back into a corner.
He drove his fat flocks into the wide cavern,
At least those that he milked, leaving the males— The rams and the goats—outside in the yard.
Then he lifted up a great doorstone,
A huge slab of rock, and set it in place.
Two sturdy wagons—twenty sturdy wagons— Couldn't pry it from the ground—that's how big The stone was he set in the doorway. Then,
He sat down and milked the ewes and bleating goats, All in good order, and put the sucklings
Beneath their mothers. Half of the white milk He curdled and scooped into wicker baskets, The other half he let stand in the pails
So he could drink it later for his supper. He worked quickly to finish his chores,
And as he was lighting the fire he saw us and said:

'Who are you strangers? Sailing the seas, huh? Where from, and what for? Pirates, probably,
 

220










225








230








235








240








245
 
Roaming around causing people trouble.'

 
He spoke, and it hit us like a punch in the gut—
His booming voice and the sheer size of the monster— But even so I found the words to answer him:

'We are Greeks, blown off course by every wind
In the world on our way home from Troy, traveling Sea routes we never meant to, by Zeus' will no doubt. We are proud to be the men of Agamemnon,
Son of Atreus, the greatest name under heaven, Conqueror of Troy, destroyer of armies.
Now we are here, suppliants at your knees, Hoping you will be generous to us
And give us the gifts that are due to strangers. Respect the gods, sir. We are your suppliants, And Zeus avenges strangers and suppliants, Zeus, god of strangers, who walks at their side.'

He answered me from his pitiless heart:

'You're dumb, stranger, or from far away, If you ask me to fear the gods. Cyclopes Don't care about Zeus or his aegis
Or the blessed gods, since we are much stronger. I wouldn't spare you or your men
Out of fear of Zeus. I would spare them only If I myself wanted to. But tell me,
Where did you leave your ship? Far
Down the coast, or close? I'd like to know.'
 



250










255








260











265








270
 

Nice try, but I knew all the tricks and said:

 
'My ship? Poseidon smashed it to pieces Against the rocks at the border of your land.
He pushed her in close and the wind did the rest. These men and I escaped by the skin of our teeth.'

This brought no response from his pitiless heart But a sudden assault upon my men. His hands
Reached out, seized two of them, and smashed them To the ground like puppies. Their brains spattered out And oozed into the dirt. He tore them limb from limb To make his supper, gulping them down
Like a mountain lion, leaving nothing behind— Guts, flesh, or marrowy bones.
Crying out, we lifted our hands to Zeus At this outrage, bewildered and helpless.
When the Cyclops had filled his huge belly With human flesh, he washed it down with milk, Then stretched out in his cave among his flocks. I crept up close and was thinking about
Drawing my sharp sword and driving it home Into his chest where the lungs hide the liver.
I was feeling for the spot when another thought Checked my hand: we would die to a man in that cave, Unable to budge the enormous stone
He had set in place to block the entrance. And so, Groaning through the night, we waited for dawn.
 

275










280








285








290








295
 
As soon as dawn came, streaking the sky red, He rekindled the fire and milked his flocks, All in good order, and placing the sucklings Beneath their mothers. His chores done,
He seized two of my men and made his meal. After he had fed he drove his flocks out, Easily lifting the great stone, which he then set Back in place as lightly as if he were setting
A lid upon a quiver. And then, with loud whistling, The Cyclops turned his fat flocks toward the mountain, And I was left there, brooding on how
I might make him pay and win glory from Athena.

This was the best plan I could come up with: Beside one of the sheep pens lay a huge pole Of green olive which the Cyclops had cut
To use as a walking stick when dry. Looking at it We guessed it was about as large as the mast
Of a black ship, a twenty-oared, broad-beamed Freighter that crosses the wide gulfs.
That's how long and thick it looked. I cut off About a fathom's length from this pole
And handed it over to my men. They scraped it And made it smooth, and I sharpened the tip And took it over to the fire and hardened it.
Then I hid it, setting it carefully in the dung That lay in piles all around the cave.
And I told my men to draw straws to decide
Which of them would have to share the risk with me— Lift that stake and grind it in his eye
 

300








305








310










315








320








325
 
While he was asleep. They drew straws and came up with The very men I myself would have chosen.
There were four of them, and I made five.

At evening he came, herding his fleecy sheep. He drove them straight into the cave, drove in All his flocks in fact. Maybe he had some Foreboding, or maybe some god told him to. Then he lifted the doorstone and set it in place,
And sat down to milk the goats and bleating ewes, All in good order, and setting the sucklings Beneath their mothers. His chores done,
Again he seized two of my men and made his meal. Then I went up to the Cyclops and spoke to him, Holding an ivy-wood bowl filled with dark wine.

'Cyclops, have some wine, now that you have eaten Your human flesh, so you can see what kind of drink Was in our ship's hold. I was bringing it to you
As an offering, hoping you would pity me And help me get home. But you are a raving Maniac! How do you expect any other man Ever to visit you after acting like this?'

He took the bowl and drank it off, relishing
Every last, sweet drop. And he asked me for more:

'Be a pal and give me another drink. And tell me Your name, so I can give you a gift you'll like. Wine grapes grow in the Cyclopes' land, too.
 



330










335








340










345










350
 
Rain from the sky makes them grow from the earth. But this—this is straight ambrosia and nectar.'

So I gave him some more of the ruby-red wine. Three times the fool drained the bowl dry,
And when the wine had begun to work on his mind, I spoke these sweet words to him:

'Cyclops,
You ask me my name, my glorious name, And I will tell it to you. Remember now, To give me the gift just as you promised.
Noman is my name. They call me Noman— My mother, my father, and all my friends, too.'

He answered me from his pitiless heart:

'Noman I will eat last after his friends. Friends first, him last. That's my gift to you.'

He listed as he spoke and then fell flat on his back, His thick neck bent sideways. He was sound asleep, Belching out wine and bits of human flesh
In his drunken stupor. I swung into action, Thrusting the stake deep in the embers,
Heating it up, and all the while talking to my men To keep up their morale. When the olivewood stake Was about to catch fire, green though it was,
And was really glowing, I took it out And brought it right up to him. My men
 

355










360











365













370








375
 
Stood around me, and some god inspired us. My men lifted up the olivewood stake
And drove the sharp point right into his eye,
While I, putting my weight behind it, spun it around The way a man bores a ship's beam with a drill, Leaning down on it while other men beneath him Keep it spinning and spinning with a leather strap. That's how we twirled the fiery-pointed stake
In the Cyclops' eye. The blood formed a whirlpool Around its searing tip. His lids and brow
Were all singed by the heat from the burning eyeball And its roots crackled in the fire and hissed
Like an axe-head or adze a smith dips into water When he wants to temper the iron—that's how his eye Sizzled and hissed around the olivewood stake.
He screamed, and the rock walls rang with his voice. We shrank back in terror while he wrenched
The blood-grimed stake from his eye and flung it Away from him, blundering about and shouting To the other Cyclopes, who lived around him
In caverns among the windswept crags.
They heard his cry and gathered from all sides Around his cave and asked him what ailed him:

'Polyphemus, why are you hollering so much And keeping us up the whole blessed night ? Is some man stealing your flocks from you, Or killing you, maybe, by some kind of trick?'

And Polyphemus shouted out to them:
 



380








385








390








395








400










405
 

'Noman is killing me by some kind of trick!' They sent their words winging back to him:
 
'If no man is hurting you, then your sickness Comes from Zeus and can't be helped.
You should pray to your father, Lord Poseidon.'

They left then, and I laughed in my heart
At how my phony name had fooled them so well. Cyclops meanwhile was groaning in agony.
Groping around, he removed the doorstone
And sat in the entrance with his hands spread out To catch anyone who went out with the sheep— As if I could be so stupid. I thought it over, Trying to come up with the best plan I could
To get us all out from the jaws of death. I wove all sorts of wiles, as a man will When his life is on the line. My best idea
Had to do with the sheep that were there, big, Thick-fleeced beauties with wool dark as violets. Working silently, I bound them together
With willow branches the Cyclops slept on. I bound them in threes. Each middle sheep Carried a man underneath, protected by
The two on either side: three sheep to a man.
As for me, there was a ram, the best in the flock. I grabbed his back and curled up beneath
His shaggy belly. There I lay, hands twined
 


410










415








420








425








430
 
Into the marvelous wool, hanging on for dear life. And so, muffling our groans, we waited for dawn.

 
When the first streaks of red appeared in the sky, The rams started to bolt toward the pasture.
The unmilked females were bleating in the pens, Their udders bursting. Their master,
Worn out with pain, felt along the backs
Of all of the sheep as they walked by, the fool, Unaware of the men under their fleecy chests. The great ram headed for the entrance last, Heavy with wool—and with me thinking hard.
Running his hands over the ram, Polyphemus said:

'My poor ram, why are you leaving the cave Last of all? You've never lagged behind before. You were always the first to reach the soft grass With your big steps, first to reach the river, First to want to go back to the yard
At evening. Now you're last of all. Are you sad About your master's eye? A bad man blinded me, Him and his nasty friends, getting me drunk, Noman—but he's not out of trouble yet!
If only you understood and could talk,
You could tell me where he's hiding. I would Smash him to bits and spatter his brains
All over the cave. Then I would find some relief From the pain this no-good Noman has caused me.'

He spoke, and sent the ram off through the door.
 

435








440










445








450








455
 
When we had gone a little way from the cave, I first untangled myself from the ram
And then untied my men. Then, moving quickly, We drove those fat, long-shanked sheep
Down to the ship, keeping an eye on our rear. We were a welcome sight to the rest of the crew,
But when they started to mourn the men we had lost I forbade it with an upward nod of my head, Signaling each man like that and ordering them
To get those fleecy sheep aboard instead, On the double, and get the ship out to sea.
Before you knew it they were on their benches Beating the sea to white froth with their oars. When we were offshore but still within earshot, I called out to the Cyclops, just to rub it in:

'So, Cyclops, it turns out it wasn't a coward Whose men you murdered and ate in your cave, You savage! But you got yours in the end, Didn't you? You had the gall to eat the guests
In your own house, and Zeus made you pay for it.'

He was even angrier when he heard this. Breaking off the peak of a huge crag
He threw it toward our ship, and it carried To just in front of our dark prow. The sea Billowed up where the rock came down,
And the backwash pushed us to the mainland again, Like a flood tide setting us down at the shore.
I grabbed a long pole and shoved us off,
 

460








465








470










475










480








485
 
Nodding to the crew to fall on the oars
And get us out of there. They leaned into it,
And when we were twice as far out to sea as before I called to the Cyclops again, with my men Hanging all over me and begging me not to:

'Don't do it, man! The rock that hit the water Pushed us in and we thought we were done for. If he hears any sound from us, he'll heave
Half a cliff at us and crush the ship and our skulls With one throw. You know he has the range.'

They tried, but didn't persuade my hero's heart— I was really angry—and I called back to him:

'Cyclops, if anyone, any mortal man, Asks you how you got your eye put out,
Tell him that Odysseus the marauder did it, Son of Laertes, whose home is on Ithaca.'

He groaned, and had this to say in response:

'Oh no! Now it's coming to me, the old prophecy. There was a seer here once, a tall handsome man, Telemos Eurymides. He prophesied well
All his life to the Cyclopes. He told me That all this would happen some day,
That I would lose my sight at Odysseus' hands. I always expected a great hero
Would come here, strong as can be.
 




490










495











500











505








510
 
Now this puny, little, good-for-nothing runt Has put my eye out—because he got me drunk.
But come here, Odysseus, so I can give you a gift, And ask Poseidon to help you on your way.
I'm his son, you know. He claims he's my father. He will heal me, if he wants. But none
Of the other gods will, and no mortal man will.'

He had his say and then prayed to Poseidon, Stretching his arms out to starry heaven:

'Hear me, Poseidon, blue-maned Earth-Holder, If you are the father you claim to be.
Grant that Odysseus, son of Laertes, May never reach his home on Ithaca. But if he is fated to see his family again,
And return to his home and own native land, May he come late, having lost all companions, In another's ship, and find trouble at home.'

He prayed, and the blue-maned sea-god heard him. Then he broke off an even larger chunk of rock, Pivoted, and threw it with incredible force.
It came down just behind our dark-hulled ship, Barely missing the end of the rudder. The sea Billowed up where the rock hit the water,
And the wave pushed us forward all the way To the island where our other ships waited Clustered on the shore, ringed by our comrades Sitting on the sand, anxious for our return.
 




515










520










525










530








535
 
We beached the ship and unloaded the Cyclops' sheep, Which I divided up as fairly as I could
Among all hands. The veterans gave me the great ram, And I sacrificed it on the shore of the sea
To Zeus in the dark clouds, who rules over all.
I burnt the thigh pieces, but the god did not accept My sacrifice, brooding over how to destroy
All my benched ships and my trusty crews.

So all the long day until the sun went down
We sat feasting on meat and drinking sweet wine. When the sun set and darkness came on
We lay down and slept on the shore of the sea.
Early in the morning, when the sky was streaked red, I roused my men and ordered the crews
To get on deck and cast off. They took their places And were soon whitening the sea with their oars.

We sailed on in shock, glad to get away alive But grieving for the comrades we had lost."
 

540








545










550








555
 

BOOK 10

"We came next to the island of Aeolia, Home of Aeolus, son of Hippotas,
Dear to the immortals. Aeolia
Is a floating island surrounded by a wall
Of indestructible bronze set on sheer stone.	5
Aeolus' twelve children live there with him, Six daughters and six manly sons.
He married his daughters off to his boys, And they all sit with their father and mother
Continually feasting on abundant good cheer	10
Spread out before them. Every day The house is filled with steamy savor
And the courtyard resounds. Every night The men sleep next to their high-born wives
On blankets strewn on their corded beds.	15
We came to their city and their fine palace, And for a full month he entertained me.
He questioned me in great detail about Troy, The Greek fleet, and the Greeks' return home.
I told him everything, from beginning to end.	20
And when I, in turn, asked if I might leave And requested him to send me on my way, He did not refuse, and this was his send-off:
He gave me a bag made of the hide of an ox
Nine years old, which he had skinned himself,	25
 
And in this bag he bound the wild winds' ways, For Zeus had made him keeper of the winds, To still or to rouse whichever he will.
He tied this bag down in the hold of my ship
With a bright silver cord, so that not a puff	30
Could escape. But he let the West Wind out To blow my ships along and carry us home. It was not to be. Our own folly undid us.
For nine days and nights we sailed on.
On the tenth day we raised land, our own	35
Native fields, and got so close we saw men Tending their fires. Then sleep crept up on me, Exhausted from minding the sail the whole time By myself. I wouldn't let any of my crew
Spell me, because I wanted to make good time.	40
As soon as I fell asleep, the men started to talk, Saying I was bringing home for myself
Silver and gold as gifts from great Aeolus. You can imagine the sort of things they said:
'This guy gets everything wherever he goes.	45
First, he's freighting home his loot from Troy, Beautiful stuff, while we, who made the same trip, Are coming home empty-handed. And now Aeolus has lavished these gifts upon him.
Let's have a quick look, and see what's here,	50
How much gold and silver is stuffed in this bag.'
All malicious nonsense, but it won out in the end,
 
And they opened the bag. The winds rushed out And bore them far out to sea, weeping
As their native land faded on the horizon.	55
When I woke up and saw what had happened
I thought long and hard about whether I should Just go over the side and end it all in the sea
Or endure in silence and remain among the living.
In the end I decided to bear it and live.	60
I wrapped my head in my cloak and lay down on the deck While an evil wind carried the ships
Back to Aeolia. My comrades groaned.

We went ashore and drew water
And the men took a meal beside the swift ships.	65
When we had tasted food and drink I took a herald and one man
And went to Aeolus' glorious palace.
I found him feasting with his wife and children,
And when we came in and sat on the threshold	70
They were amazed and questioned me:

'What happened, Odysseus? What evil spirit Abused you? Surely we sent you off
With all you needed to get back home
Or anywhere else your heart desired.'	75

I answered them from the depths of my sorrow:

'My evil crew ruined me, that and stubborn sleep. But make it right, friends, for you have the power.'
 

 
I made my voice soft and tried to persuade them, But they were silent. And then their father said:

'Begone from this island instantly!
You are the most cursed of all living things. It would go against all that is right
For me to help or send on his way
A man so despised by the blessed gods. Begone! You are cursed by heaven!'

And with that he sent me from his house, Groaning heavily. We sailed on from there With grief in our hearts. Because of our folly There was no breeze to push us along,
And our morale sank because the rowing was hard. We sailed on for six solid days and nights,
And on the seventh we came to Lamus, The lofty city of Telepylus
In the land of the Laestrygonians,
Where a herdsman driving in his flocks at dusk Calls to another driving his out at dawn.
A man could earn a double wage there If he never slept, one by herding cattle And another by pasturing white sheep,
For night and day make one twilight there. The harbor we came to is a glorious place, Surrounded by sheer cliffs. Headlands
Jut out on either side to form a narrow mouth, And there all the others steered in their ships
 



80










85










90








95








100








105
 
And moored them close together in the bay. No wave, large or small, ever rocks a boat
In that silvery calm. I alone moored my black ship Outside the harbor, tying her up
On the rocks that lie on the border of the land. Then I climbed to a rugged lookout point
And surveyed the scene. There was no sign
Of plowed fields, only smoke rising up from the land.

I sent out a team—two picked men and a herald— To reconnoiter and find out who lived there.
They went ashore and followed a smooth road Used by wagons to bring wood from the mountains Down to the city. In front of the city
They met a girl drawing water. Her father
Was named Antiphates, and she had come down To the flowing spring Artacia,
From which they carried water to the town. When my men came up to her and asked her
Who the people there were and who was their king, She showed them her father's high-roofed house. They entered the house and found his wife inside,
A woman, to their horror, as huge as a mountain top. At once she called her husband, Antiphates,
Who meant business when he came. He seized One of my men and made him into dinner.
The other two got out of there and back to the ships, But Antiphates had raised a cry throughout the city, And when they heard it, the Laestrygonians
Came up on all sides, thousands of them,
 








110










115








120








125








130
 
Not like men but like the Sons of the Earth, The Giants. They pelted us from the cliffs With rocks too large for a man to lift.
The sounds that came from the ships were sickening, Sounds of men dying and boats being crushed.
The Laestrygonians speared the bodies like fish, And carried them back for their ghastly meal. While this was happening I drew my sword And cut the cables of my dark-prowed ship, Barking out orders for the crew to start rowing
And get us out of there. They rowed for their lives, Ripping the sea, and my ship sped joyfully
Out and away from the beetling rocks,
But all of the others were destroyed as they lay.

We sailed on in shock, glad to get out alive But grieving for the comrades we'd lost.
And we came to Aeaea, the island that is home To Circe, a dread goddess with richly coiled hair And a human voice. She is the sister
Of dark-hearted Aeetes, and they are both sprung From Helios and Perse, daughter of Ocean.
Some god guided us into a harbor
And we put in to shore without a sound.
We disembarked and lay there for two days and nights, Eating our hearts out with weariness and grief.
But when Dawn combed her hair in the third day's light, I took my sword and spear and went up
From the ship to open ground, hoping to see
 

135








140








145










150








155








160
 
Plowed fields, and to hear human voices. So I climbed to a rugged lookout point
And surveyed the scene. What I saw was smoke Rising up from Circe's house. It curled up high Through the thick brush and woods, and I wondered Whether I should go and have a closer look.
I decided it was better to go back to the ship And give my crew their meal, and then Send out a party to reconnoiter.
I was on my way back and close to the ship When some god took pity on me,
Walking there alone, and sent a great antlered stag Right into my path. He was on his way
Down to the river from his pasture in the woods, Thirsty and hot from the sun beating down,
And as he came out I got him right on the spine In the middle of his back. The bronze spear bored All the way through, and he fell in the dust
With a groan, and his spirit flew away.
Planting my foot on him, I drew the bronze spear Out of the wound and laid it down on the ground. Then I pulled up a bunch of willow shoots
And twisted them together to make a rope About a fathom long. I used this to tie
The stag's feet together so I could carry him Across my back, leaning on my spear
As I went back to the ship. There was no way
An animal that large could be held on one shoulder. I flung him down by the ship and roused my men, Going up to each in turn and saying to them:
 




165








170








175








180








185








190
 

 
'We're not going down to Hades, my friends, Before our time. As long as there is still Food and drink in our ship, at least
We don't have to starve to death.'

When they heard this, they drew their cloaks From their faces, and marveled at the size Of the stag lying on the barren seashore.
When they had seen enough, they washed their hands And prepared a glorious feast. So all day long
Until the sun went down we sat there feasting On all that meat, washing it down with wine. When the sun set and darkness came on,
We lay down to sleep on the shore of the sea.

When Dawn brushed the eastern sky with rose, I called my men together and spoke to them:

'Listen to me, men. It's been hard going. We don't know east from west right now,
But we have to see if we have any good ideas left. We may not. I climbed up to a lookout point.
We're on an island, ringed by the endless sea. The land lies low, and I was able to see Smoke rising up through the brushy woods.'

This was too much for them. They remembered What Antiphates, the Laestrygonian, had done, And how the Cyclops had eaten their comrades.
 





195










200








205











210










215
 
They wailed and cried, but it did them no good. I counted off the crew into two companies
And appointed a leader for each. Eurylochus Headed up one group and I took the other, And then we shook lots in a bronze helmet. Out jumped the lot of Eurylochus, brave heart, And so off he went, with twenty-two men,
All in tears, leaving us behind in no better mood.

They went through the woods and found Circe's house In an upland clearing. It was built of polished stone And surrounded by mountain lions and wolves, Creatures Circe had drugged and bewitched.
These beasts did not attack my men, but stood On their hind legs and wagged their long tails,
Like dogs fawning on their master who always brings Treats for them when he comes home from a feast.
So these clawed beasts were fawning around my men, Who were terrified all the same by the huge animals. While they stood like this in the gateway
They could hear Circe inside, singing in a lovely voice As she moved about weaving a great tapestry,
The unfading handiwork of an immortal goddess, Finely woven, shimmering with grace and light. Polites, a natural leader, and of all the crew
The one I loved and trusted most, spoke up then:

'Someone inside is weaving a great web,
And singing so beautifully the floor thrums with the sound. Whether it's a goddess or a woman, let's call her out now.'
 




220








225










230








235








240










245
 

 
And so they called to her, and she came out
And flung open the bright doors and invited them in. They all filed in naively behind her,
Except Eurylochus, who suspected a trap. When she had led them in and seated them She brewed up a potion of Pramnian wine With cheese, barley, and pale honey stirred in, And she laced this potion with insidious drugs
That would make them forget their own native land. When they had eaten and drunk, she struck them With her wand and herded them into the sties outside. Grunting, their bodies covered with bristles,
They looked just like pigs, but their minds were intact. Once in the pens, they squealed with dismay,
And Circe threw them acorns and berries— The usual fare for wallowing swine.

Eurylochus at once came back to the ship To tell us of our comrades' unseemly fate,
But, hard as he tried, he could not speak a word. The man was in shock. His eyes welled with tears, And his mind was filled with images of horror.
Finally, under our impatient questioning, He told us how his men had been undone:

'We went through the woods, as you told us to, Glorious Odysseus, and found a beautiful house In an upland clearing, built of polished stone. Someone inside was working a great loom
 








250








255








260










265










270
 
And singing in a high, clear voice, some goddess Or a woman, and they called out to her,
And she came out and opened the bright doors And invited them in, and they naively
Filed in behind her. But I stayed outside, Suspecting a trap. And they all disappeared, Not one came back. I sat and watched
For a long, long time, and not one came back.'

He spoke, and I threw my silver-studded sword Around my shoulders, slung on my bow,
And ordered Eurylochus to retrace his steps
And lead me back there. But he grabbed me by the knees And pleaded with me, wailing miserably:

'Don't force me to go back there. Leave me here, Because I know that you will never come back yourself Or bring back the others. Let's just get out of here
With those that are left. We might still make it.' Those were his words, and I answered him:
'All right, Eurylochus, you stay here by the ship. Get yourself something to eat and drink.
I'm going, though. We're in a really tight spot.'

And so I went up from the ship and the sea Into the sacred woods. I was closing in
On Circe's house, with all its bewitchment,
When I was met by Hermes. He had a golden wand
 




275








280










285











290











295
 
And looked like a young man, a hint of a moustache Above his lip—youth at its most charming.
He clasped my hand and said to me:

'Where are you off to now, unlucky man, Alone, and in rough, uncharted terrain? Those men of yours are up in Circe's house, Penned like pigs into crowded little sties.
And you've come to free them? I don't think so. You'll never return; you'll have to stay there, too. Oh well, I will keep you out of harm's way.
Take this herb with you when you go to Circe, And it will protect you from her deadly tricks. She'll mix a potion and spike it with drugs, But she won't be able to cast her spell
Because you'll have a charm that works just as well— The one I'll give you—and you'll be forewarned.
When Circe strikes you with her magic wand, Draw your sharp sword from beside your thigh And rush at her with murder in your eye.
She'll be afraid and invite you to bed. Don't turn her down—that's how you'll get
Your comrades freed and yourself well loved. But first make her swear by the gods above She will not unsex you when you are nude, Or drain you of your manly fortitude.'

So saying, Hermes gave me the herb,
Pulling it out of the ground, and showed it to me. It was black at the root, with a milk-white flower.
 




300










305








310








315








320










325
 
Moly, the gods call it, hard for mortal men to dig up, But the gods can do anything. Hermes rose
Through the wooded island and up to Olympus, And I went on to Circe's house, brooding darkly On many things. I stood at the gates
Of the beautiful goddess' house and gave a shout. She heard me call and came out at once, Opening the bright doors and inviting me in.
I followed her inside, my heart pounding. She seated me on a beautiful chair
Of finely wrought silver, and prepared me a drink In a golden cup, and with evil in her heart
She laced it with drugs. She gave me the cup And I drank it off, but it did not bewitch me. So she struck me with her wand and said:

'Off to the sty, with the rest of your friends.'

At this, I drew the sharp sword that hung by my thigh And lunged at Circe as if I meant to kill her.
The goddess shrieked and, running beneath my blade, Grabbed my knees and said to me wailing:

'Who are you, and where do you come from? What is your city and who are your parents? I am amazed that you drank this potion
And are not bewitched. No other man
Has ever resisted this drug once it's past his lips. But you have a mind that cannot be beguiled.
You must be Odysseus, the man of many wiles,
 








330








335








340











345










350
 
Who Quicksilver Hermes always said would come here In his swift black ship on his way home from Troy.
Well then, sheath your sword and let's Climb into my bed and tangle in love there, So we may come to trust each other.'

She spoke, and I answered her:

'Circe, how can you ask me to be gentle to you After you turned my men into swine?
And now you have me here and want to trick me Into going to bed with you, so that you can Unman me when I am naked. No, Goddess,
I'm not getting into any bed with you
Unless you agree first to swear a solemn oath
That you're not planning some new trouble for me.'

Those were my words, and she swore an oath at once Not to do me any harm, and when she finished
I climbed into Circe's beautiful bed.

Meanwhile, her serving women were busy, Four maidens who did all the housework, Spirit women born of the springs and groves And of the sacred rivers that flow to the sea. One of them brought rugs with a purple sheen
And strewed them over chairs lined with fresh linen. Another drew silver tables up to the chairs
And set golden baskets upon them. The third
 




355











360








365












370








375
 
Mixed honey-hearted wine in a silver bowl And set out golden cups. The fourth
Filled a cauldron with water and lit a great fire Beneath it, and when the water was boiling
In the glowing bronze, she set me in a tub
And bathed me, mixing in water from the cauldron Until it was just how I liked it, and pouring it over
My head and shoulders until she washed from my limbs The weariness that had consumed my soul.
When she had bathed me and rubbed me With rich olive oil, and had thrown about me
A beautiful cloak and tunic, she led me to the hall And had me sit on a silver-studded chair,
Richly wrought and with a matching footstool. A maid poured water from a silver pitcher Over a golden basin for me to wash my hands And then set up a polished table nearby.
And the housekeeper, grave and dignified, Set out bread and generous helpings
From all the dishes she had. She told me to eat,
But nothing appealed. I sat there with other thoughts Occupying my mind, and my mood was dark.
When Circe noticed I was just sitting there, Depressed, and not reaching out for food, She came up to me and spoke winged words:

'Why are you just sitting there, Odysseus,
Eating your heart out and not touching your food? Are you afraid of some other trick? You need not be. I have already sworn I will do you no harm.'
 




380








385








390








395








400










405
 

So she spoke, and I answered her:

 
'Circe, how could anyone bring himself— Any decent man—to taste food and drink Before seeing his comrades free?
If you really want me to eat and drink, Set my men free and let me see them.'

So I spoke, and Circe went outside Holding her wand and opened the sty
And drove them out. They looked like swine Nine or ten years old. They stood there before her
And she went through them and smeared each one With another drug. The bristles they had grown After Circe had given them the poisonous drug All fell away, and they became men again, Younger than before, taller and far handsomer.
They knew me, and they clung to my hands,
And the house rang with their passionate sobbing. The goddess herself was moved to pity.
Then she came to my side and said: 'Son of Laertes in the line of Zeus,
My wily Odysseus, go to your ship now Down by the sea and haul it ashore.
Then stow all the tackle and gear in caves
And come back here with the rest of your crew.'
 





410










415








420










425










430
 
So she spoke, and persuaded my heart.
I went to the shore and found my crew there Wailing and crying beside our sailing ship.
When they saw me they were like farmyard calves Around a herd of cows returning to the yard.
The calves bolt from their pens and run friskily Around their mothers, lowing and mooing.
That's how my men thronged around me When they saw me coming. It was as if They had come home to their rugged Ithaca, And wailing miserably they said so to me:

'With you back, Zeus-born, it is just as if We had returned to our native Ithaca.
But tell us what happened to the rest of the crew.' So they spoke, and I answered them gently:
'First let's haul our ship onto dry land
And then stow all the tackle and gear in caves. Then I want all of you to come along with me So you can see your shipmates in Circe's house, Eating and drinking all they could ever want.'

They heard what I said and quickly agreed. Eurylochus, though, tried to hold them back, Speaking to them these winged words:

'Why do you want to do this to yourselves,
Go down to Circe's house? She will turn all of you
 








435








440











445










450











455
 
Into pigs, wolves, lions, and make you guard her house. Remember what the Cyclops did when our shipmates Went into his lair? It was this reckless Odysseus
Who led them there. It was his fault they died.'

 
When Eurylochus said that, I considered Drawing my long sword from where it hung By my thigh and lopping off his head,
Close kinsman though he was by marriage.
But my crew talked me out of it, saying things like:

'By your leave, let's station this man here To guard the ship. As for the rest of us, Lead us on to the sacred house of Circe.'

And so the whole crew went up from the sea, And Eurylochus did not stay behind with the ship But went with us, in mortal fear of my temper.

Meanwhile, back in Circe's house, the goddess Had my men bathed, rubbed down with oil, And clothed in tunics and fleecy cloaks.
We found them feasting well in her halls.
When they recognized each other, they wept openly And their cries echoed throughout Circe's house.
Then the shining goddess stood near me and said:

'Lament no more. I myself know
All that you have suffered on the teeming sea And the losses on land at your enemies' hands.
 

460










465










470










475










480
 
Now you must eat, drink wine, and restore the spirit You had when you left your own native land,
Your rugged Ithaca. You are skin and bones now And hollow inside. All you can think of
Is your hard wandering, no joy in your heart, For you have, indeed, suffered many woes.'

She spoke, and I took her words to heart. So we sat there day after day for a year, Feasting on abundant meat and sweet wine.
But when a year had passed, and the seasons turned, And the moons waned and the long days were done, My trusty crew called me out and said:

'Good god, man, at long last remember your home, If it is heaven's will for you to be saved
And return to your house and your own native land.'

They spoke, and I saw what they meant.
So all that long day until the sun went down We sat feasting on meat and sweet red wine. When the sun set and darkness came on,
My men lay down to sleep in the shadowy hall, But I went up to Circe's beautiful bed
And touching her knees I beseeched the goddess:

'Circe, fulfill now the promise you made To send me home. I am eager to be gone
And so are my men, who are wearing me out Sitting around whining and complaining
 








485










490










495










500










505
 
Whenever you happen not to be present.'

So I spoke, and the shining goddess answered:

 
'Son of Laertes in the line of Zeus,
My wily Odysseus—you need not stay Here in my house any longer than you wish.
But there is another journey you must make first— To the house of Hades and dread Persephone,
To consult the ghost of Theban Tiresias,
The blind prophet, whose mind is still strong. To him alone Persephone has granted Intelligence even after his death.
The rest of the dead are flitting shadows.'

This broke my spirit. I sat on the bed
And wept. I had no will to live, nor did I care If I ever saw the sunlight again.
But when I had my fill of weeping and writhing, I looked at the goddess and said:

'And who will guide me on this journey, Circe? No man has ever sailed his black ship to Hades.'
And the goddess, shining, answered at once: 'Son of Laertes in the line of Zeus,
My wily Odysseus—do not worry about
A pilot to guide your ship. Just set up the mast, Spread the white sail, and sit yourself down.
 



510








515










520










525











530
 
The North Wind's breath will bear her onwards. But when your ship crosses the stream of Ocean
You will see a shelving shore and Persephone's groves, Tall poplars and willows that drop their fruit.
Beach your ship there by Ocean's deep eddies, And go yourself to the dank house of Hades. There into Acheron flow Pyriphlegethon
And Cocytus, a branch of the water of Styx. And there is a rock where the two roaring rivers Flow into one. At that spot, hero, gather yourself And do as I say.
 








535








540
 
Dig an ell-square pit, And around it pour libation to all the dead,
First with milk and honey, then with sweet wine, And a third time with water. Then sprinkle barley And pray to the looming, feeble death-heads, Vowing sacrifice on Ithaca, a barren heifer,
The herd's finest, and rich gifts on the altar, And to Tiresias alone a great black ram.
After these supplications to the spirits,
Slaughter a ram and a black ewe, turning their heads Toward Erebus, yourself turning backward
And leaning toward the streams of the river. Then many ghosts of the dead will come forth. Call to your men to flay the slaughtered sheep And burn them as a sacrifice to the gods below, To mighty Hades and dread Persephone.
You yourself draw your sharp sword and sit there, Keeping the feeble death-heads from the blood Until you have questioned Tiresias.
 








545








550








555
 
Then, and quickly, the great seer will come.
He will tell you the route and how long it will take For you to reach home over the teeming deep.'

Dawn rose in gold as she finished speaking. Circe gave me a cloak and tunic to wear And the nymph slipped on a long silver robe
Shimmering in the light, cinched it at the waist With a golden belt and put a veil on her head.
I went through the halls and roused my men, Going up to each with words soft and sweet:

'Time to get up! No more sleeping late.
We're on our way. Lady Circe has told me all.'

So I spoke, and persuaded their heroes' hearts.
But not even from Circe's house could I lead my men Unscathed. One of the crew, Elpenor, the youngest, Not much of a warrior nor all that smart,
Had gone off to sleep apart from his shipmates, Seeking the cool air on Circe's roof
Because he was heavy with wine.
He heard the noise of his shipmates moving around And sprang up suddenly, forgetting to go
To the long ladder that led down from the roof. He fell headfirst, his neck snapped at the spine, And his soul went down to the house of Hades.

As my men were heading out I spoke to them:
 

560










565










570










575








580
 
'You think, no doubt, that you are going home, But Circe has plotted another course for us, To the house of Hades and dread Persephone, To consult the ghost of Theban Tiresias.'

This broke their hearts. They sat down
Right where they were and wept and tore their hair, But no good came of their lamentation.

While we were on our way to our swift ship On the shore of the sea, weeping and crying,
Circe had gone ahead and tethered a ram and a black ewe By our tarred ship. She had passed us by
Without our ever noticing. Who could see A god on the move against the god's will?"
 

585










590










595
 

BOOK 11

"When we reached our black ship
We hauled her onto the bright saltwater, Set up the mast and sail, loaded on
The sheep, and boarded her ourselves,
Heartsick and weeping openly by now.	5
The dark prow cut through the waves And a following wind bellied the canvas, A good sailing breeze sent by Circe,
The dread goddess with a human voice.
We lashed everything down and sat tight,	10
Leaving the ship to the wind and helmsman. All day long she surged on with taut sail; Then the sun set, and the sea grew dark.
The ship took us to the deep, outermost Ocean
And the land of the Cimmerians, a people	15
Shrouded in mist. The sun never shines there, Never climbs the starry sky to beam down at them, Nor bathes them in the glow of its last golden rays;
Their wretched sky is always racked with night's gloom.
We beached our ship there, unloaded the sheep,	20
And went along the stream of Ocean
Until we came to the place spoken of by Circe.

There Perimedes and Eurylochus held the victims
 
While I dug an ell-square pit with my sword,
And poured libation to all the dead,	25
First with milk and honey, then with sweet wine, And a third time with water. Then I sprinkled White barley and prayed to the looming dead, Vowing sacrifice on Ithaca—a barren heifer,
The herd's finest, and rich gifts on the altar,	30
And to Tiresias alone a great black ram. After these supplications to the spirits, I cut the sheeps' throats over the pit, And the dark blood pooled there.
Then out of Erebus
The souls of the dead gathered, the ghosts	35
Of brides and youths and worn-out old men And soft young girls with hearts new to sorrow, And many men wounded with bronze spears, Killed in battle, bearing blood-stained arms.
They drifted up to the pit from all sides	40
With an eerie cry, and pale fear seized me.
I called to my men to flay the slaughtered sheep And burn them as a sacrifice to the gods,
To mighty Hades and dread Persephone.
Myself, I drew my sharp sword and sat,	45
Keeping the feeble death-heads from the blood Until I had questioned Tiresias.

First to come was the ghost of Elpenor, Whose body still lay in Circe's hall,
Unmourned, unburied, since we'd been hard pressed.	50
I wept when I saw him, and with pity in my heart
 
Spoke to him these feathered words:

'Elpenor, how did you get to the undergloom Before me, on foot, outstripping our black ship?'

I spoke, and he moaned in answer:	55

'Bad luck and too much wine undid me.
I fell asleep on Circe's roof. Coming down I missed my step on the long ladder
And fell headfirst. My neck snapped
At the spine and my ghost went down to Hades.	60
Now I beg you—by those we left behind, By your wife and the father who reared you, And by Telemachus, your only son,
Whom you left alone in your halls—
When you put the gloom of Hades behind you	65
And beach your ship on the Isle of Aeaea, As I know you will, remember me, my lord. Do not leave me unburied, unmourned, When you sail for home, or I might become
A cause of the gods' anger against you.	70
Burn me with my armor, such as I have, Heap me a barrow on the grey sea's shore, In memory of a man whose luck ran out. Do this for me, and fix in the mound the oar
I rowed with my shipmates while I was alive.'	75

Thus Elpenor, and I answered him:
 
'Pitiful spirit, I will do this for you.'

 
Such were the sad words we exchanged
Sitting by the pit, I on one side holding my sword Over the blood, my comrade's ghost on the other.

Then came the ghost of my dead mother, Anticleia, daughter of the hero Autolycus. She was alive when I left for sacred Ilion. I wept when I saw her, and pitied her,
But even in my grief I would not allow her
To come near the blood until I had questioned Tiresias.

And then he came, the ghost of Theban Tiresias, Bearing a golden staff. He knew me and said:

'Odysseus, son of Laertes, master of wiles, Why have you come, leaving the sunlight To see the dead and this joyless place?
Move off from the pit and take away your sword, So I may drink the blood and speak truth to you.'

I drew back and slid my silver-studded sword Into its sheath. After he had drunk the dark blood The flawless seer rose and said to me:

'You seek a homecoming sweet as honey, Shining Odysseus, but a god will make it bitter, For I do not think you will elude the Earthshaker, Who has laid up wrath in his heart against you,
 





80










85











90










95










100
 
Furious because you blinded his son. Still,
You just might get home, though not without pain, You and your men, if you curb your own spirit, And theirs, too, when you beach your ship
On Thrinacia. You will be marooned on that island In the violet sea, and find there the cattle
Of Helios the Sun, and his sheep, too, grazing.
Leave these unharmed, keep your mind on your homecoming, And you may still reach Ithaca, though not without pain.
But if you harm them, I foretell doom for you, Your ship, and your crew. And even if you Yourself escape, you will come home late And badly, having lost all companions
And in another's ship. And you shall find Trouble in your house, arrogant men Devouring your wealth and courting your wife.
Yet vengeance will be yours, and when you have slain The suitors in your hall, by ruse or by sword,
Then you must go off again, carrying a broad-bladed oar, Until you come to men who know nothing of the sea, Who eat their food unsalted, and have never seen
Red-prowed ships or oars that wing them along.
And I will tell you a sure sign that you have found them, One you cannot miss. When you meet another traveler Who thinks you are carrying a winnowing fan,
Then you must fix your oar in the earth And offer sacrifice to Lord Poseidon, A ram, a bull, and a boar in its prime. Then return to your home and offer Perfect sacrifice to the immortal gods
 








105








110








115








120








125








130
 
Who hold high heaven, to each in turn. And death will come to you off the sea, A death so gentle, and carry you off When you are worn out in sleek old age, Your people prosperous all around you.
All this will come true for you as I have told.' Thus Tiresias. And I answered him:
'All that, Tiresias, is as the gods have spun it. But tell me this: I see here the ghost
Of my dead mother, sitting in silence
Beside the blood, and she cannot bring herself To look her son in the eye or speak to him.
How can she recognize me for who I am?' And Tiresias, the Theban prophet:
'This is easy to tell you. Whoever of the dead You let come to the blood will speak truly to you. Whoever you deny will go back again.'

With that, the ghost of Lord Tiresias
Went back into Hades, his soothsaying done. But I stayed where I was until my mother Came up and drank the dark blood. At once
She knew me, and her words reached me on wings:

'My child, how did you come to the undergloom While you are still alive? It is hard for the living
 








135











140











145










150
 
To reach these shores. There are many rivers to cross, Great bodies of water, nightmarish streams,
And Ocean itself, which cannot be crossed on foot But only in a well-built ship. Are you still wandering On your way back from Troy, a long time at sea
With your ship and your men? Have you not yet come To Ithaca, or seen your wife in your halls?'
So she spoke, and I answered her: 'Mother, I came here because I had to,
To consult the ghost of the prophet Tiresias. I have not yet come to the coast of Achaea
Or set foot on my own land. I have had nothing But hard travels from the day I set sail
With Lord Agamemnon to go to Ilion, Famed for its horses, to fight the Trojans. But tell me truly, how did you die?
Was it a long illness, or did Artemis
Shoot you suddenly with her gentle arrows? And tell me about my father and my son, Whom I left behind. Does the honor I had Still remain with them, or has it passed
To some other man, and do they all say
I will never return? And what about my wife? What has she decided, what does she think? Is she still with my son, keeping things safe? Or has someone already married her, Whoever is now the best of the Achaeans?'
 

155








160











165








170








175








180
 
So I spoke, and my mother answered at once:

 
'Oh, yes indeed, she remains in your halls, Her heart enduring the bitter days and nights. But the honor that was yours has not passed To any man. Telemachus holds your lands Unchallenged, and shares in the feasts
To which all men invite him as the island's lawgiver. Your father, though, stays out in the fields
And does not come to the city. He has no bed Piled with bright rugs and soft coverlets
But sleeps in the house where the slaves sleep, In the ashes by the fire, and wears poor clothes. In summer and autumn his vineyard's slope
Is strewn with beds of leaves on the ground, Where he lies in his sorrow, nursing his grief, Longing for your return. His old age is hard.
I died from the same grief. The keen-eyed goddess Did not shoot me at home with her gentle shafts, Nor did any long illness waste my body away.
No, it was longing for you, my glorious Odysseus, For your gentle heart and your gentle ways,
That robbed me of my honey-sweet life.'

So she spoke, and my heart yearned
To embrace the ghost of my dead mother. Three times I rushed forward to hug her, And three times she drifted out of my arms Like a shadow or a dream. The pain
That pierced my heart grew ever sharper,
 





185








190








195








200










205
 
And my words rose to my mother on wings:

'Mother, why do you slip away when I try
To embrace you? Even though we are in Hades, Why can't we throw our arms around each other And console ourselves with chill lamentation? Are you a phantom sent by Persephone
To make me groan even more in my grief?' And my mother answered me at once:
'O my child, most ill-fated of men,
It is not that Persephone is deceiving you. This is the way it is with mortals.
When we die, the sinews no longer hold
Flesh and bones together. The fire destroys these As soon as the spirit leaves the white bones,
And the ghost flutters off and is gone like a dream. . Hurry now to the light, and remember these things, So that later you may tell them all to your wife.'

That was the drift of our talk.

Then the women came, Sent by Persephone, all those who had been
The wives and daughters of the heroes of old. They flocked together around the dark blood, But I wanted to question them one at a time. The best way I could think of to question them
 

210










215











220








225














230
 
Was to draw the sharp sword from beside my thigh, And keep them from drinking the blood all at once. They came up in procession then, and one by one They declared their birth, and I questioned them all. The first one I saw was highborn Tyro,
Who said she was born of flawless Salmoneus And was wed to Cretheus, a son of Aeolus.
She fell in love with a river, divine Enipeus, The most beautiful of all the rivers on earth, And she used to play in his lovely streams. But the Earthshaker took Enipeus' form And lay with her in the swirling eddies Near the river's mouth. And an indigo wave, Towering like a mountain, arched over them
And hid the god and the mortal woman from view. He unbound the sash that had kept her virgin
And shed sleep upon her. And when the god Had finished his lovemaking, he took her hand And called her name softly and said to her:

'Be happy in this love, woman. As the year turns You will bear glorious children, for a god's embrace Is never barren. Raise them and care for them.
Now go to your house and say nothing of this, But I am Poseidon, who makes the earth tremble.'

With that he plunged into the surging sea.
And Tyro conceived and bore Pelias and Neleus, Who served great Zeus as strong heroes both, Pelias with his flocks in Iolcus' grasslands,
 




235








240








245








250










255










260
 
And Neleus down in sandy Pylos.
She bore other children to Cretheus: Aeson, Pheres, and the charioteer Amythaon.

 
Then I saw Antiope, daughter of Asopus,
Who boasted she had slept in the arms of Zeus And bore two sons, Amphion and Zethus,
Who founded seven-gated Thebes and built its walls, Since they could not live in the wide land of Thebes Without walls and towers, mighty though they were.

Next I saw Alcmene, Amphitryon's wife, Who bore Heracles, the lionhearted battler, After lying in Zeus' almighty embrace.
And I saw Megara, too, wife of Heracles, The hero whose strength never wore out.

I saw Oedipus' mother, beautiful Epicaste, Who unwittingly did a monstrous deed, Marrying her son, who had killed his father. The gods soon brought these things to light; Yet, for all his misery, Oedipus still ruled
In lovely Thebes, by the gods' dark designs. But Epicaste, overcome by her grief,
Hung a deadly noose from the ceiling rafters And went down to implacable Hades' realm, Leaving behind for her son all of the sorrows A mother's avenging spirits can cause.

And then I saw Chloris, the great beauty
 



265










270










275








280








285
 
Whom Neleus wedded after courting her
With myriad gifts. She was the youngest daughter Of Amphion, king of Minyan Orchomenus.
As queen of Pylos, she bore glorious children, Nestor, Chromius, and lordly Periclymenus, And magnificent Pero, a wonder to men.
Everyone wanted to marry her, but Neleus Would only give her to the man who could drive The cattle of mighty Iphicles to Pylos,
Spiral-horned, broad-browed, stubborn cattle, Difficult to drive. Only Melampus,
The flawless seer, rose to the challenge,
But he was shackled by Fate. Country herdsmen Put him in chains, and months went by
And the seasons passed and the year turned Before he was freed by mighty Iphicles, After he had told him all of his oracles, And so the will of Zeus was fulfilled.

I saw Leda also, wife of Tyndareus, Who bore to him two stout-hearted sons,
Castor the horseman and the boxer Polydeuces. They are under the teeming earth though alive, And have honor from Zeus in the world below, Living and dying on alternate days.
Such is the honor they have won from the gods.

After her I saw Iphimedeia,
Aloeus' wife. She made love to Poseidon And bore two sons, who did not live long,
 






290








295








300










305








310
 
Godlike Otus and famed Ephialtes, The tallest men ever reared upon earth
And the handsomest after gloried Orion.
At nine years old they measured nine cubits Across the chest, and were nine fathoms tall. They threatened to wage a furious war Against the immortal Olympian gods,
And were bent on piling Ossa on Olympus, And forested Pelion on top of Ossa
And so reach the sky. And they would have done it, But the son of Zeus and fair-haired Leto
Destroyed them both before the down blossomed Upon their cheeks and their beards had come in.

And I saw Phaedra and Procnis
And lovely Ariadne, whom Theseus once Tried to bring from Crete to sacred Athens But had no joy of her. Artemis first
Shot her on Dia, the seagirt island,
After Dionysus told her he saw her there.

And I saw Maera and Clymene
And hateful Eriphyle, who valued gold More than her husband's life.
But I could not tell you All the wives and daughters of heroes I saw.
It would take all night. And it is time
To sleep now, either aboard ship with the crew Or here in this house. My journey home
Is up to you, and to the immortal gods."
 

315








320








325










330










335










340
 

He paused, and they sat hushed in silence, Spellbound throughout the shadowy hall. And then white-armed Arete began to speak:

 
"Well, Phaeacians, does this man impress you With his looks, stature, and well-balanced mind? He is my guest, moreover, though each of you Shares in that honor. Do not send him off, then, Too hastily, and do not stint your gifts
To one in such need. You have many treasures Stored in your halls by grace of the gods."
Then the old hero Echeneus spoke up: "Friends, the words of our wise queen
Are not wide of the mark. Give them heed.
But upon Alcinous depend both word and deed." And Alcinous answered:
"Arete's word will stand, as long as I live And rule the Phaeacians who love the oar.
But let our guest, though he longs to go home, Endure until tomorrow, until I have time
To make our gift complete. We all have a stake In getting him home, but mine is greatest,
For mine is the power throughout the land."
 

345








350











355











360
 
And Odysseus, who missed nothing:

 
"Lord Alcinous, most renowned of men, You could ask me to stay for even a year
While you arranged a send-off with glorious gifts, And I would assent. Better far to return
With a fuller hand to my own native land. I would be more respected and loved by all Who saw me come back to Ithaca."

Alcinous answered him:

"Odysseus, we do not take you
For the sort of liar and cheat the dark earth breeds Among men everywhere, telling tall tales
No man could ever test for himself.
Your words have outward grace and wisdom within, And you have told your tale with the skill of a bard— All that the Greeks and you yourself have suffered. But tell me this, as accurately as you can:
Did you see any of your godlike comrades
Who went with you to Troy and met their fate there? The night is young—and magical. It is not yet time To sleep in the hall. Tell me these wonders.
Sit in our hall and tell us of your woes
For as long as you can bear. I could listen until dawn." And Odysseus, his mind teeming:
"Lord Alcinous, most glorious of men,
 

365








370











375








380








385
 
There is a time for words and a time for sleep. But if you still yearn to listen, I will not refuse To tell you of other things more pitiable still,
The woes of my comrades who died after the war, Who escaped the Trojans and their battle-cry
But died on their return through a woman's evil.

When holy Persephone had scattered
The women's ghosts, there came the ghost Of Agamemnon, son of Atreus,
Distraught with grief. Around him were gathered Those who died with him in Aegisthus' house.
He knew me as soon as he drank the dark blood. He cried out shrilly, tears welling in his eyes,
And he stretched out his hands, trying to touch me, But he no longer had anything left of the strength He had in the old days in those muscled limbs.
I wept when I saw him, and with pity in my heart I spoke to him these winged words:

'Son of Atreus, king of men, most glorious Agamemnon—what death laid you low? Did Poseidon sink your fleet at sea,
After hitting you hard with hurricane winds? Or were you killed by enemy forces on land, As you raided their cattle and flocks of sheep Or fought to capture their city and women?'

And Agamemnon answered at once:
 



390










395








400








405










410
 
'Son of Laertes in the line of Zeus, My crafty Odysseus—No,
Poseidon did not sink my fleet at sea
After hitting us hard with hurricane winds, Nor was I killed by enemy forces on land. Aegisthus was the cause of my death.
He killed me with the help of my cursed wife After inviting me to a feast in his house, Slaughtered me like a bull at a manger.
So I died a most pitiable death,
And all around me my men were killed Relentlessly, like white-tusked swine For a wedding banquet or dinner party In the house of a rich and powerful man.
You have seen many men cut down, both In single combat and in the crush of battle, But your heart would have grieved
As never before at the sight of us lying Around the wine-bowl and the laden tables
In that great hall. The floor steamed with blood. But the most piteous cry I ever heard
Came from Cassandra, Priam's daughter.
She had her arms around me down on the floor When Clytemnestra ran her through from behind. I lifted my hands and beat the ground
As I lay dying with a sword in my chest,
But that bitch, my wife, turned her back on me And would not shut my eyes or close my lips As I was going down to Death. Nothing
Is more grim or more shameless than a woman
 

415








420








425








430








435








440
 
Who sets her mind on such an unspeakable act As killing her own husband. I was sure
I would be welcomed home by my children
And all my household, but she, with her mind set On stark horror, has shamed not only herself
But all women to come, even the rare good one.'

Thus Agamemnon, and I responded:
'Ah, how broad-browed Zeus has persecuted The house of Atreus from the beginning, Through the will of women. Many of us died For Helen's sake, and Clytemnestra
Set a snare for you while you were far away.' And Agamemnon answered me at once:
'So don't go easy on your own wife either, Or tell her everything you know.
Tell her some things, but keep some hidden. But your wife will not bring about your death, Odysseus. Icarius' daughter,
Your wise Penelope, is far too prudent. She was newly wed when we went to war.
We left her with a baby boy still at the breast, Who must by now be counted as a man,
And prosperous. His father will see him
When he comes, and he will embrace his father, As is only right. But my wife did not let me Even fill my eyes with the sight of my son.
She killed me before I could do even that.
 

445








450










455











460








465








470
 
But let me tell you something, Odysseus: Beach your ship secretly when you come home. Women just can't be trusted any more.
And one more thing. Tell me truthfully If you've heard anything about my son
And where he is living, perhaps in Orchomenus, Or in sandy Pylos, or with Menelaus in Sparta. For Orestes has not yet perished from the earth.'

So he spoke, and I answered him:

'Son of Atreus, why ask me this?
I have no idea whether he is alive or dead,
And it is not good to speak words empty as wind.'

Such were the sad words we had for each other As we stood there weeping, heavy with grief.

Then came the ghost of Achilles, son of Peleus, And those of Patroclus and peerless Antilochus And Ajax, who surpassed all the Danaans, Except Achilles, in looks and build.
Aeacus' incomparable grandson, Achilles, knew me, And when he spoke his words had wings:

'Son of Laertes in the line of Zeus, Odysseus, you hard rover, not even you Can ever top this, this bold foray
Into Hades, home of the witless dead And the dim phantoms of men outworn.'
 






475










480











485










490










495
 

So he spoke, and I answered him:

 
'Achilles, by far the mightiest of the Achaeans, I have come here to consult Tiresias,
To see if he has any advice for me
On how I might get back to rugged Ithaca.
I've had nothing but trouble, and have not yet set foot On my native land. But no man, Achilles,
Has ever been as blessed as you, or ever will be. While you were alive the army honored you Like a god, and now that you are here
You rule the dead with might. You should not Lament your death at all, Achilles.'

I spoke, and he answered me at once:

'Don't try to sell me on death, Odysseus. I'd rather be a hired hand back up on earth, Slaving away for some poor dirt farmer, Than lord it over all these withered dead. But tell me about that boy of mine.
Did he come to the war and take his place As one of the best? Or did he stay away?
And what about Peleus? What have you heard? Is he still respected among the Myrmidons,
Or do they dishonor him in Phthia and Hellas, Crippled by old age in hand and foot?
And I'm not there for him up in the sunlight With the strength I had in wide Troy once
 





500








505











510








515








520
 
When I killed Ilion's best and saved the army. Just let me come with that kind of strength To my father's house, even for an hour,
And wrap my hands around his enemies' throats. They would learn what it means to face my temper.'

Thus Achilles, and I answered him:

'I have heard nothing of flawless Peleus, But as for your son, Neoptolemus,
I'll tell you all I know, just as you ask.
I brought him over from Scyros myself, In a fine vessel, to join the Greek army
At Troy, and every time we held council there, He was always the first to speak, and his words Were never off the mark. Godlike Nestor and I Alone surpassed him. And every time we fought On Troy's plain, he never held back in the ranks But charged ahead to the front, yielding
To no one, and he killed many in combat. I could not begin to name them all,
All the men he killed when he fought for us, But what a hero he dismantled in Telephus' son, Eurypylus, dispatching him and a crowd
Of his Ceteian compatriots. Eurypylus
Came to Troy because Priam bribed his mother. After Memnon, I've never seen a handsomer man. And then, too, when all our best climbed
Into the wooden horse Epeius made,
And I was in command and controlled the trapdoor,
 




525











530








535








540








545








550
 
All the other Danaan leaders and counselors Were wiping away tears from their eyes
And their legs shook beneath them, but I never saw Neoptolemus blanch or wipe away a tear.
No, he just sat there handling his sword hilt And heavy bronze spear, and all he wanted
Was to get out of there and give the Trojans hell. And after we had sacked Priam's steep city,
He boarded his ship with his share of the loot And more for valor. And not a scratch on him. He never took a hit from a spear or sword
In close combat, where wounds are common. When Ares rages anyone can be hit.'

So I spoke, and the ghost of swift-footed Achilles
Went off with huge strides through the fields of asphodel, Filled with joy at his son's preeminence.

The other ghosts crowded around in sorrow,
And each asked about those who were dear to him. Only the ghost of Telamonian Ajax
Stood apart, still furious with me
Because I had defeated him in the contest at Troy To decide who would get Achilles' armor.
His goddess mother had put it up as a prize, And the judges were the sons of the Trojans And Pallas Athena. I wish I had never won. That contest buried Ajax, that brave heart, The best of the Danaans in looks and deeds, After the incomparable son of Peleus.
 








555








560










565










570








575
 
I tried to win him over with words like these:

 
'Ajax, son of flawless Telamon,
Are you to be angry with me even in death Over that accursed armor? The gods
Must have meant it to be the ruin of the Greeks. We lost a tower of strength to that armor.
We mourn your loss as we mourn the loss Of Achilles himself. Zeus alone
Is to blame. He persecuted the Greeks Terribly, and he brought you to your doom. No, come back, Lord Ajax, and listen!
Control your wrath and rein in your proud spirit.'

I spoke, but he said nothing. He went his way To Erebus, to join the other souls of the dead. He might yet have spoken to me there, or I Might yet have spoken to him, but my heart Yearned to see the other ghosts of the dead.

There I saw Minos, Zeus' glorious son, Scepter in hand, judging the dead
As he sat in the wide-gated house of Hades;
And the dead sat, too, and asked him for judgments.

And then Orion loomed up before me, Driving over the fields of asphodel
The beasts he had slain in the lonely hills,
In his hands a bronze club, forever unbroken.
 

580








585








590










595











600
 
And I saw Tityos, a son of glorious Earth, Lying on the ground, stretched over nine acres, And two vultures sat on either side of him And tore at his liver, plunging their beaks
Deep into his guts, and he could not beat them off. For Tityos had raped Leto, a consort of Zeus,
As she went to Pytho through lovely Panopeus.

And I saw Tantalus there in his agony, Standing in a pool with water up to his chin. He was mad with thirst, but unable to drink, For every time the old man bent over
The water would drain away and vanish, Dried up by some god, and only black mud Would be left at his feet. Above him dangled Treetop fruits, pears and pomegranates, Shiny apples, sweet figs, and luscious olives. But whenever Tantalus reached up for them,
The wind tossed them high to the shadowy clouds.

And I saw Sisyphus there in his agony, Pushing a monstrous stone with his hands. Digging in hard, he would manage to shove it To the crest of a hill, but just as he was about To heave it over the top, the shameless stone
Would teeter back and bound down to the plain.
Then he would strain every muscle to push it back up, Sweat pouring from his limbs and dusty head.

And then mighty Heracles loomed up before me—
 



605








610










615








620










625










630
 
His phantom that is, for Heracles himself Feasts with the gods and has as his wife Beautiful Hebe, daughter of great Zeus And gold-sandaled Hera. As he moved
A clamor arose from the dead around him, As if they were birds flying off in terror.
He looked like midnight itself. He held his bow
With an arrow on the string, and he glared around him As if he were always about to shoot. His belt,
A baldric of gold crossing his chest, Was stark horror, a phantasmagoria
Of Bears, and wild Boars, and green-eyed Lions, Of Battles, and Bloodshed, Murder and Mayhem. May this be its maker's only masterpiece,
And may there never again be another like it. Heracles recognized me at once,
And his words beat down on me like dark wings:

'Son of Laertes in the line of Zeus, Crafty Odysseus—poor man, do you too Drag out a wretched destiny
Such as I once bore under the rays of the sun? I was a son of Zeus and grandson of Cronus, But I had immeasurable suffering,
Enslaved to a man who was far less than I And who laid upon me difficult labors.
Once he even sent me here, to fetch The Hound of Hell, for he could devise
No harder task for me than this. That hound I carried out of the house of Hades,
 








635








640








645










650








655
 
With Hermes and grey-eyed Athena as guides.'

And Heracles went back into the house of Hades. But I stayed where I was, in case any more
Of the heroes of yesteryear might yet come forth. And I would have seen some of them—
Heroes I longed to meet, Theseus and Peirithous, Glorious sons of the gods—but before I could, The nations of the dead came thronging up
With an eerie cry, and I turned pale with fear That Persephone would send from Hades' depths The pale head of that monster, the Gorgon.

I went to the ship at once and called to my men To get aboard and untie the stern cables.
They boarded quickly and sat at their benches. The current bore the ship down the River Ocean.
We rowed at first, and then caught a good tailwind."
 

660










665








670










675
 

BOOK 12

"Our ship left the River Ocean
And came to the swell of the open sea And the Island of Aeaea,
Where Dawn has her dancing grounds
And the Sun his risings. We beached our ship	5
On the sand, disembarked, and fell asleep On the shore, waiting for daybreak.
Light blossomed like roses in the eastern sky, And I sent some men to the house of Circe
To bring back the body of Elpenor.	10
We cut wood quickly, and on the headland's point We held a funeral, shedding warm tears.
When the body was burned, and the armor with it, We heaped up a mound, dragged a stone onto it,
And on the tomb's very top we planted his oar.	15
While we were busy with these things, Circe, aware that we had come back
From the Underworld, put on her finest clothes And came to see us. Her serving women
Brought meat, bread, and bright red wine,	20
And the goddess shone with light as she spoke:
'So you went down alive to Hades' house.
 
Most men die only once, but you twice. Come, though, eat and drink wine
The whole day through. You sail at dawn.	25
I will tell you everything on your route, So that you will not come to grief
In some web of evil on land or sea.'

She spoke, and our proud hearts consented.
All day long until the sun went down	30
We sat feasting on meat and good red wine. When the sun set and darkness came on
My men went to sleep beside the ship's stern-cables. But Circe took me by the hand and had me sit
Away from my men. And she lay down beside me	35
And asked me about everything. I told her all Just as it happened, and then the goddess spoke:

'So all that is done. But now listen
To what I will tell you. One day a god
Will remind you of it. First, you will come	40
To the Sirens, who bewitch all men
Who come near. Anyone who approaches Unaware and hears their voice will never again Be welcomed home by wife and children
Dancing with joy at his return—	45
Not after the Sirens bewitch him with song.
They loll in a meadow, and around them are piled The bones of shriveled and moldering bodies.
Row past them, first kneading sweet wax
And smearing it into the ears of your crew	50
 
So they cannot hear. But if you yourself Have a mind to listen, have them bind you Hand and foot upright in the mast-step And tie the ends of the rope to the mast.
Then you can enjoy the song of the Sirens.	55
If you command your crew and plead with them To release you, they should tie you up tighter. After your men have rowed past the Sirens,
I will not prescribe which of two ways to go.
You yourself must decide. I will tell you both.	60
'One route takes you past beetling crags Pounded by blue-eyed Amphitritê's seas.
The blessed gods call these the Wandering Rocks. Not even birds can wing their way through.
Even the doves that bring ambrosia to Zeus	65
Crash and perish on that slick stone,
And the Father has to replenish their numbers. Ships never get through. Whenever one tries, The sea is awash with timbers and bodies
Blasted by the waves and the fiery winds.	70
Only one ship has ever passed through,
The famous Argo as she sailed from Aeetes,
And even she would have been hurled onto those crags Had not Hera loved Jason and sent his ship through.

'On the other route there are two rocks.	75
One stabs its peak into the sky
And is ringed by a dark blue cloud. This cloud Never melts, and the air is never clear
 
During summer or autumn. No mortal man Could ever scale this rock, not even if he had Twenty hands and feet. The stone is as smooth As if it were polished. Halfway up the cliff
Is a misty cave facing the western gloom. It is there you will sail your hollow ship If you listen to me, glorious Odysseus.
The strongest archer could not shoot an arrow Up from his ship all the way to the cave, Which is the lair of Scylla. She barks and yelps Like a young puppy, but she is a monster,
An evil monster that not even a god
Would be glad to see. She has—listen to this— Twelve gangly legs and six very long necks,
And on each neck is perched a bloodcurdling head, Each with three rows of close-set teeth
Full of black death. Up to her middle
She is concealed in the cave, but her heads dangle Into the abyss, and she fishes by the rock
For dolphins and seals or other large creatures That the moaning sea breeds in multitudes.
No crew can boast to have sailed past Scylla Unscathed. With each head she carries off a man, Snatching him out of his dark-prowed vessel.

'The other rock, as you will see, Odysseus, Lies lower—the two are close enough That you could shoot an arrow across— And on this rock is a large, leafy fig tree. Beneath this tree the divine Charybdis
 



80








85








90








95








100










105
 
Sucks down the black water. Three times a day She belches it out and three times a day
She sucks it down horribly. Don't be there
When she sucks it down. No one could save you, Not even Poseidon, who makes the earth tremble. No, stay close to Scylla's rock, and push hard.
Better to mourn six than the whole crew at once.' Thus Circe. And I, in a panic:
'I beg you, goddess, tell me, is there Any way I can escape from Charybdis
And still protect my men from the other?' And the goddess, in a nimbus of light:
'There you go again, always the hero. Won't you yield even to the immortals? She's not mortal, she's an immortal evil, Dread, dire, ferocious, unfightable.
There is no defense. It's flight, not fight.
If you pause so much as to put on a helmet She'll attack again with just as many heads And kill just as many men as before.
Just row past as hard as you can. And call upon Crataiïs, the mother who bore her as a plague to men. She will stop her from attacking a second time.

'Then you will come to Thrinacia,
An island that pastures the cattle of the Sun,
 




110










115













120








125








130
 
Seven herds of cattle and seven flocks of sheep, Fifty in each. They are immortal.
They bear no young and they never die off, And their shepherds are goddesses, Nymphs with gorgeous hair, Phaethusa And Lampetiê, whom gleaming Neaera Bore to Helios, Hyperion the Sun.
When she had borne them and reared them She sent them to Thrinacia, to live far away And keep their father's spiral-horned cattle.
If you leave these unharmed and keep your mind On your journey, you might yet struggle home To Ithaca. But if you harm them, I foretell Disaster for your ship and crew, and even if you Escape yourself, you shall come home late
And badly, having lost all your companions.'

Dawn rose in gold as she finished speaking, And light played about her as she disappeared Up the island.
 




135








140








145










150
 
I went to the ship And got my men going. They loosened
The stern cables and were soon in their benches, Beating the water white with their oars.
A following wind rose in the wake
Of our dark-prowed ship, a sailor's breeze Sent by Circe, that dread, beautiful goddess. We tied down the tackling and sat tight, Letting the wind and the helmsman take over.
 








155
 

 
Then I made a heavy-hearted speech to my men:

'Friends, it is not right that one or two alone Should know what the goddess Circe foretold. Better we should all know, live or die.
We may still beat death and get out of this alive. First, she told us to avoid the eerie voices
Of the Sirens and sail past their soft meadows. She ordered me alone to listen. Bind me
Hand and foot upright in the mast-step And tie the ends of the rope to the mast. If I command you and plead with you To release me, just tie me up tighter.'

Those were my instructions to the crew. Meanwhile, our good ship was closing fast
On the Sirens' island, when the breeze we'd had Tailed off, and we were becalmed—not a breath Of wind left—some spirit lulled the waves.
My men got up and furled the sails,
Stowed them in the ship's hold, then sat down At their oars and whitened the water with pine. Myself, I got out a wheel of wax, cut it up With my sharp knife, and kneaded the pieces Until they were soft and warm, a quick job With Lord Helios glaring down from above.
Then I went down the rows and smeared the wax Into all my men's ears. They in turn bound me Hand and foot upright to the mast,
 

160










165








170










175








180








185
 
Tied the ends of the rope to the mast, and then Sat down and beat the sea white with their oars.
We were about as far away as a shout would carry, Surging ahead, when the Sirens saw our ship Looming closer, and their song pierced the air:

'Come hither, Odysseus, glory of the Achaeans,
Stop your ship
so you can hear our voices.
No one has ever sailed
his black ship past here Without listening to the honeyed
sound from our lips.
He journeys on delighted
and knows more than before.
For we know everything
that the Greeks and Trojans Suffered in wide Troy
by the will of the gods.
We know all that happens on the teeming earth.'

They made their beautiful voices carry,
And my heart yearned to listen. I ordered my men To untie me, signaling with my brows,
But they just leaned on their oars and rowed on. Perimedes and Eurylochus jumped up,
Looped more rope around me, and pulled tight. When we had rowed past, and the Sirens' song
 






190















195



















200








205
 
Had faded on the waves, only then did my crew Take the wax from their ears and untie me.

 
We had no sooner left the island when I saw The spray from an enormous wave
And heard its booming. The oars flew From my men's frightened hands
And shirred in the waves, stopping the ship Dead in the water. I went down the rows And tried to boost the crew's morale:

'Come on, men, this isn't the first time We've run into trouble. This can't be worse
Than when the Cyclops with his brute strength Had us penned in his cave. We got out
By my courage and fast thinking. One day We'll look back on this. Now let's do as I say, Every man of you! Stay on your benches And beat the deep surf with your oars!
Zeus may yet deliver us from death. Helmsman, here's my command to you, And make sure you remember it, since You're steering this vessel: Keep the ship Away from this heavy surf. Hug the cliff, Or before you know it she'll swerve
To starboard and you'll send us all down.'

I spoke, they obeyed. But I didn't mention
Scylla. There was nothing we could do about that, And I didn't want the crew to freeze up,
 



210








215










220








225








230
 
Stop rowing, and huddle together in the hold. Then I forgot Circe's stern warning
Not to arm myself no matter what happened.
I strapped on my bronze, grabbed two long spears And went to the foredeck, where I thought
Scylla would first show herself from the cliff. But I couldn't see her anywhere, and my eyes Grew weary scanning the misty rock face.
We sailed on up the narrow channel, wailing, Scylla on one side, Charybdis on the other Sucking down saltwater. When she belched it up She seethed and bubbled like a boiling cauldron And the spray would reach the tops of the cliffs. When she sucked it down you could see her Churning within, and the rock bellowed
And roared, and you could see the sea floor Black with sand. My men were pale with fear. While we looked at her, staring death in the eyes, Scylla seized six of my men from our ship,
The six strongest hands aboard. Turning my eyes To the deck and my crew, I saw above me
Their hands and feet as they were raised aloft. They cried down to me, calling me by name That one last time in their agony.
You know How a fisherman on a jutting rock
Casts his bait with his long pole. The horned hook Sinks into the sea, and when he catches a fish
He pulls it writhing and squirming out of the water. Writhing like that my men were drawn up the cliff.
 



235








240








245








250








255










260
 
And Scylla devoured them at her door, as they shrieked And stretched their hands down to me
In their awful struggle. Of all the things That I have borne while I scoured the seas, I have seen nothing more pitiable.

When we had fled Charybdis, the rocks, And Scylla, we came to the perfect island
Of Hyperion the Sun, where his herds ranged And his flocks browsed. While our black ship Was still out at sea I could hear the bleating Of the sheep and the lowing of the cattle
As they were being penned, and I remembered The words of the blind seer, Theban Tiresias, And of Circe, who gave me strict warnings
To shun the island of the warmth-giving Sun. And so I spoke to my crew with heavy heart:

'Hear my words, men, for all your pain. So I can tell you Tiresias' prophecies
And Circe's, too, who gave me strict warnings To shun the island of the warmth-giving Sun, For there she said was our gravest peril.
No, row our black ship clear of this island.'

This broke their spirits, and at once Eurylochus answered me spitefully:

'You're a hard man, Odysseus, stronger Than other men, and you never wear out,
 




265










270








275










280










285
 
A real iron-man, who won't allow his crew, Dead tired from rowing and lack of sleep, To set foot on shore, where we might make
A meal we could enjoy. No, you just order us To wander on through the swift darkness Over the misty deep, and be driven away From the island. It is at night that winds rise That wreck ships. How could we survive
If we were hit by a South Wind or a West,
Which sink ships no matter what the great gods want? No, let's give in to black night now
And make our supper. We'll stay by the ship, Board her in the morning, and put out to sea.'

Thus Eurylochus, and the others agreed.
I knew then that some god had it in for us, And my words had wings:

'Eurylochus, It's all of you against me alone. All right,
But swear me a great oath, every last man: If we find any cattle or sheep on this island, No man will kill a single cow or sheep
In his recklessness, but will be content To eat the food immortal Circe gave us.' They swore they would do just as I said,
And when they had finished the words of the oath, We moored our ship in a hollow harbor
Near a sweet-water spring. The crew disembarked And skillfully prepared their supper.
 



290








295








300













305








310








315
 
When they had their fill of food and drink, They fell to weeping, remembering how Scylla
Had snatched their shipmates and devoured them. Sweet sleep came upon them as they wept.
Past midnight, when the stars had wheeled around, Zeus gathered the clouds and roused a great wind Against us, an ungodly tempest that shrouded Land and sea and blotted out the night sky.
At the first blush of Dawn we hauled our ship up And made her fast in a cave where you could see The nymphs' beautiful seats and dancing places. Then I called my men together and spoke to them:

'Friends, there is food and drink in the ship. Let's play it safe and keep our hands
Off those cattle, which belong to Helios, A dread god who hears and sees all.'

So I spoke, and their proud hearts consented.

Then for a full month the South Wind blew, And no other wind but the East and the South. As long as my men had grain and red wine
They didn't touch the cattle—life was still worth living. But when all the rations from the ship were gone,
They had to roam around in search of game— Hunting for birds and whatever they could catch With fishing hooks. Hunger gnawed at their bellies.

I went off by myself up the island
 








320








325










330











335








340
 
To pray to the gods to show me the way. When I had put some distance between myself And the crew, and found a spot
Sheltered from the wind, I washed my hands And prayed to the gods, but all they did
Was close my eyelids in sleep.

Meanwhile, Eurylochus was giving bad advice to the crew:

'Listen to me, shipmates, despite your distress. All forms of death are hateful, but to die
Of hunger is the most wretched way to go. What are we waiting for? Let's drive off
The prime beef in that herd and offer sacrifice To the gods of broad heaven. If we ever Return to Ithaca, we will build a rich temple To Hyperion the Sun, and deposit there
Many fine treasures. If he becomes angry Over his cattle and gets the other gods' consent To destroy our ship, well, I would rather
Gulp down saltwater and die once and for all Than waste away slowly on a desert island.'

Thus Eurylochus, and the others agreed. In no time they had driven off the best
Of Helios' cattle, pretty, spiral-horned cows
That were grazing close to our dark-prowed ship. They surrounded these cows and offered prayers To the gods, plucking off tender leaves
 






345













350








355








360










365
 
From a high-crowned oak in lieu of white barley, Of which there was none aboard our benched ship. They said their prayers, cut the cows' throats, Flayed the animals and carved out the thigh joints, Wrapped these in a double layer of fat
And laid all the raw bits upon them.
They had no wine to pour over the sacrifice And so used water as they roasted the entrails.
When the thighs were burned and the innards tasted, They carved up the rest and skewered it on spits.

That's when I awoke, bolting upright.
I started down to the shore, and as I got near the ship The aroma of sizzling fat drifted up to me.
I groaned and cried out to the undying gods:

'Father Zeus, and you other immortals, You lulled me to sleep—and to my ruin—
While my men committed this monstrous crime!'

Lampetiê rushed in her long robes to Helios And told him that we had killed his cattle. Furious, the Sun God addressed the immortals:

'Father Zeus, and you other gods eternal,
Punish Odysseus' companions, who have insolently Killed the cattle I took delight in seeing
Whenever I ascended the starry heaven
And whenever turned back from heaven to earth. If they don't pay just atonement for the cows
 




370








375










380











385










390
 
I will sink into Hades and shine on the dead.'

 
And Zeus, who masses the clouds, said:

'Helios, you go on shining among the gods And for mortal men on the grain-giving earth.
I will soon strike their ship with sterling lightning And shatter it to bits on the wine-purple sea.'

All this I heard from rich-haired Calypso, Who said she heard it from Hermes the Guide.

When I reached the ship I chewed out my men, Giving each one an earful. But there was nothing We could do. The cattle were already dead.
Then the gods showed some portents Directed at my men. The hides crawled, And the meat, both roasted and raw, Mooed on the spits, like cattle lowing.

Each day for six days my men slaughtered oxen From Helios' herd and gorged on the meat.
But when Zeus brought the seventh day, The wind tailed off from gale force.
We boarded ship at once and put out to sea As soon as we had rigged the mast and sail. When we left the island behind, there was No other land in sight, only sea and sky.
Then Zeus put a black cloud over our ship And the sea grew dark beneath it. She ran on
 

395











400










405










410








415
 
A little while, and then the howling West Wind Blew in with hurricane force. It snapped
Both forestays, and the mast fell backward Into the bilge with all of its tackle.
On its way down the mast struck the helmsman And crushed his skull. He fell from the stern Like a diver, and his proud soul left his bones. In the same instant, Zeus thundered
And struck the ship with a lightning bolt.
She shivered from stem to stern and was filled With sulfurous smoke. My men went overboard, Bobbing in the waves like sea crows
Around the black ship, their day of return Snuffed out by the Sun God.
I kept pacing the deck until the sea surge Tore the sides from the keel. The waves Drove the bare keel on and snapped the mast From its socket; the leather backstay
Was still attached, and I used this to lash
The keel to the mast. Perched on these timbers I was swept along by deathly winds.

Then the West Wind died down,
And, to my horror, the South Wind rose. All that way, back to the whirlpool,
I was swept along the whole night through And at dawn reached Scylla's cliff
And dread Charybdis. She was sucking down Seawater, and I leapt up
To the tall fig tree, grabbed hold of it
 



420








425








430








435










440








445
 
And hung on like a bat. I could not
Plant my feet or get myself set on the tree Because its roots spread far below
And its branches were high overhead, Long, thick limbs that shaded Charybdis. I just grit my teeth and hung on
Until she spat out the mast and keel again. It seemed like forever. Finally,
About the hour a man who has spent the day Judging quarrels that young men bring to him Rises from the marketplace and goes to dinner, My ship's timbers surfaced again from Charybdis. I let go with my hands and feet
And hit the water hard beyond the spars. Once aboard, I rowed away with my hands. As for Scylla, Zeus never let her see me,
Or I would have been wiped out completely.


I floated on for nine days. On the tenth night The gods brought me to Ogygia
And to Calypso, the dread, beautiful goddess, Who loved me and took care of me.
But I have told that tale only yesterday, Here in your hall, to yourself and your wife, And I wouldn't bore you by telling it again."
 




450








455








460











465








470
 

BOOK 13

Odysseus finished his story,
And they were all spellbound, hushed To silence throughout the shadowy hall, Until Alcinous found his voice and said:

"Odysseus, now that you have come to my house,	5
High-roofed and founded on bronze, I do not think You will be blown off course again
Before reaching home.
Hear now my command, All who drink the glowing wine of Elders
Daily in my halls and hear the harper sing:	10
Clothes for our guest lie in a polished sea-chest, Along with richly wrought gold and all the other gifts The Phaeacian lords have brought to the palace.
But now each man of us gives him a cauldron, too.
We will recoup ourselves later with a general tax.	15
It is hard to make such generous gifts alone."

They were all pleased with what Alcinous said. Each man went to his own house to sleep,
And when Dawn's rosy fingers appeared in the sky
They hurried to the ship with their gifts of bronze.	20
Alcinous, the sacred king himself, went on board And stowed them away beneath the benches
 
Where they would not hinder the rowers' efforts. Then they all went back to feast in the palace.

In their honor Alcinous sacrificed an ox	25
To Zeus, the Dark Cloud, who rules over all. They roasted the haunches and feasted gloriously While the godlike harper, honored Demodocus, Sang in their midst.
But Odysseus
Kept turning his head toward the shining sun,	30
Urging it down the sky. He longed to set forth.
A man who has been in the fields all day With his wooden plow and wine-faced oxen Longs for supper and welcomes the sunset
That sends him homeward with weary knees.	35
So welcome to Odysseus was the evening sun. As soon as it set he addressed the Phaeacians, Alcinous especially, and his words had wings:
"Lord Alcinous, I bid you and your people
To pour libation and send me safely on my way.	40
And I bid you farewell. All is now here That my heart has desired—passage home And cherished gifts that the gods in heaven Have blessed me with. When I reach home
May I find my wife and loved ones unharmed.	45
May you enjoy your wife and children here, May the gods send you everything good,
 
And may harm never come to your island people."
They all cheered this speech, and demanded
That the stranger and guest be given passage home.	50
Alcinous then nodded to his herald:
"Pontonous, mix a bowl of wine and serve Cups to all, that we may pray to Lord Zeus And send our guest to his own native land."
Thus the King, and Pontonous mixed	55
The mellow-hearted wine and served it to all. Still seated, they tipped their cups to the gods Who possess wide heaven. Then Odysseus Stood up and placed a two-handled cup
In Arete's hands, and his words rose on wings:	60
"Be well, my queen, all of your days, until age And death come to you, as they come to all.
I am leaving now. But you, Lady—enjoy this house, Your children, your people, and Lord Alcinous."
And godlike Odysseus stepped over the threshold.	65
Alcinous sent a herald along
To guide him to the shore and the swift ship there, And Arete sent serving women with him,
One carrying a cloak and laundered shirt,
And another to bring the strong sea-chest.	70
A third brought along bread and red wine. They came down to the sea, and the ship's crew
 
Stowed all these things away in the hold,
The food and drink, too. Then they spread out
A rug and a linen sheet on the stern deck	75
For Odysseus to sleep upon undisturbed.
He climbed on board and lay down in silence While they took their places upon the benches And untied the cable from the anchor stone.
As soon as they dipped their oars in the sea,	80
A deep sleep fell on his eyelids, a sleep Sound, and sweet, and very much like death.
And as four yoked stallions spring all together Beneath the lash, leaping high,
And then eat up the dusty road on the plain,	85
So lifted the keel of that ship, and in her wake An indigo wave hissed and roiled
As she ran straight ahead. Not even a falcon, Lord of the skies, could have matched her pace,
So light her course as she cut through the waves,	90
Bearing a man with a mind like the gods', A man who had suffered deep in his heart, Enduring men's wars and the bitter sea— But now he slept, his sorrows forgotten.
The sea turned silver	95
Under the star that precedes the dawn, And the great ship pulled up to Ithaca.
 
Phorcys, the Old Man of the Sea,
Has a harbor there. Two fingers of rock Curl out from the island, steep to seaward But sloping down to the bay they protect
From hurricane winds and high waves outside. Inside, ships can ride without anchor
In the still water offshore.
At the harbor's head a slender-leaved olive Stands near a cave glimmering through the mist And sacred to the nymphs called Naiades.
Inside are bowls and jars of stone
Where bees store honey, and long stone looms Where the nymphs weave shrouds as dark as the sea. Waters flow there forever, and there are two doors, One toward the North Wind, by which humans
Go down, the other toward the South Wind, A door for the gods. No men enter there:
It is the Way of Immortals.

The Phaeacians Had been here before. In they rowed,
And with such force that their ship was propelled Half of its length onto the shelving shore.
The crew disembarked, lifting Odysseus Out of the ship—sheet, carpet, and all—
And laying him down, sound asleep, on the sand. Then they hauled from the ship all of the goods The Phaeacian lords had given him
As he was going home—all thanks to Athena. They piled these together near the bole of the olive,
 




100








105








110








115











120








125
 
Away from the path, fearing that someone Might come along before Odysseus awoke And rob him blind.

 
Then the Phaeacians went home.
But the Earthshaker did not forget the threats He had leveled against Odysseus,
And he asked Zeus what he intended to do:

"I lose face among the gods, Zeus,
When I'm not respected by mortal men— The Phaeacians yet, my own flesh and blood! I swore that Odysseus would have to suffer Before getting home—I didn't say
He would never get home, because you had already Agreed that he would—and now they've brought him Over the sea while he napped on their ship,
And set him down in Ithaca, and given him Gifts of bronze and clothing and gold,
More than he ever would have taken out of Troy Had he come home safely with his share of the loot."

And Zeus, clouds scudding around him:

"What a thing for you to say—you, the Temblor! Dishonored by the gods? It would be hard for us To sling insults at our eldest and best.
And if some over-confident hero fails
To pay you respect, you can always pay him back. Do as you please, and as your heart desires."
 





130










135








140











145








150
 

And Poseidon, the Lord of Earthquake:

 
"I would do just that, Dark Cloud,
But I like to keep an eye on your temper.
I want to smash that beautiful Phaeacian ship As it sails for home over the misty sea, Smash it, so that they will stop this nonsense Once and for all, giving men safe passage! And I'll hem their city in with a mountain."
And Zeus, from out of his nimbus of cloud: "Well, now, this is what I would do:
Wait until all of the people in the city see her Pulling in to port, and then turn her to stone, Stone shaped like a ship, a marvel for all men. And then hem their city in with a mountain."

When he heard this, the Lord of Earthquake Went to Schería, where the Phaeacians live, And waited. The great seafaring ship
Was closing in fast when Poseidon slapped it With the flat of his hand and turned it to stone Rooted in the seafloor. Then the god was gone.

The Phaeacians, men who understood the sea, Kept turning to each other, saying things like:

"Who did that?"
 







155











160










165








170
 
"Stopped her dead in the water When she was at top speed, pulling in home."

 
"She was in plain view, from stem to stern!"

Winged words, But they had no idea what had happened.

Then Alcinous spoke to his people:

"Alas for the prophecy of old that I heard From my father. He said that Poseidon
Would be angry with us for giving safe passage And that one day he would wreck a beautiful ship As it sailed for home over the misty sea.
And he would hem our city in with a mountain. What the old man said is all coming true.
Now hear what I have to say. Let us all agree Never again to provide safe escort
To any man who comes to our city.
And we will sacrifice twelve chosen bulls To Lord Poseidon, so may he pity us
And not enclose our town with a mountain."

Trembling with fear they prepared the bulls, And soon all the Phaeacian leaders and lords Were standing around Poseidon's altar Saying their prayers.
 

175















180








185








190
 
Odysseus, meanwhile, Awoke from sleep in his ancestral land—
And did not recognize it. He had been gone so long, And Pallas Athena had spread haze all around.
The goddess wanted to explain things to him,
And to disguise him, so that his wife and dear ones Would not know who he was until he had made The arrogant suitors pay for their outrage.
So everything on Ithaca now looked different To its lord—the winding trails, the harbors, The towering rocks and the trees. Odysseus Sprang to his feet and gazed at his homeland. He groaned, smacked his thighs with his hands, And in a voice choked with tears, said:

"What land have I come to now? Who knows What kind of people live here—lawless savages, Or godfearing men who take kindly to strangers? Where am I going to take all these things? Where Am I going to go myself? I should have stayed With the Phaeacians until I could go on from there To some other powerful king who would have Entertained me and sent me off homeward bound. Now I don't even know where to put this stuff.
I can't leave it here as easy pickings for a thief. Those Phaeacian lords were not as wise
As they seemed, nor as just, bringing me here
To this strange land. They said they would bring me To Ithaca's shore, but that's not what they've done.
 



195








200








205










210








215








220
 
May Zeus pay them back, Zeus, god of suppliants, Who spots transgressors and punishes them.
Well, I'd better count my goods and go over them.
Those sailors may have made off with some in their ship."

And he set about counting the hammered tripods, The cauldrons, the gold, the finely woven clothes. Nothing was missing. It was his homeland he missed As he paced along the whispering surf-line,
Utterly forlorn.
And then Athena was beside him In the form of a young man out herding sheep.
She had the delicate features of a prince,
A fine-spun mantle folded over her shoulders, Sandals on her glistening feet, a spear in her hand. Odysseus' spirits soared when he saw her,
And he turned to her with these words on his lips:

"Friend—you are the first person I've met here— I wish you well. Now don't turn on me.
Help me keep these things safe, and keep me safe, I beg you at your knees as if you were a god.
And tell me this, so I will know:
What land is this, who are the people here? Is this an island, or a rocky arm
Of the mainland shore stretching out to sea?" Athena's eyes glinted with azure light:
"Where in the world do you come from, stranger,
 






225










230










235










240










245
 
That you have to ask what land this is?
It's not exactly nameless! Men from all over Know this land, sailing in from the sunrise And from far beyond the evening horizon. It's got rough terrain, not for driving horses,
But it's not at all poor even without wide open spaces. There's abundant grain here, and wine-grapes,
Good rainfalls, and rich, heavy dews. Good pasture, too, for goats and for cattle,
And all sorts of timber, and year-round springs. That's why Ithaca is a name heard even in Troy, Which they say is far from any Greek land."

And Odysseus, who had borne much,
Felt joy at hearing his homeland described By Pallas Athena, Zeus' own daughter.
His words flew out as if on wings—
But he did not speak the truth. He checked that impulse, And, jockeying for an advantage, made up this story:

"I've heard of Ithaca, of course—even in Crete, Far over the sea, and now I've just come ashore With my belongings here. I left as much
To my sons back home. I've been on the run Since killing a man, Orsilochus, Idomeneus' son, the great sprinter.
No one in all Crete could match his speed. He wanted to rob me of all of the loot
I took out of Troy—stuff I had sweated for
In hand-to-hand combat in the war overseas—
 






250








255










260










265








270
 
Because I wouldn't serve under his father at Troy But led my own unit instead. I ambushed him With one of my men, got him with a spear
As he came back from the fields. It was night, Pitch-black. No one saw us, and I got away With a clean kill with sharp bronze. Then,
I found a ship, Phoenician, and made it Worth the crew's while to take me to Pylos,
Or Elis maybe, where the Epeans are in power. Well, the wind pushed us back from those shores— It wasn't their fault, they didn't want to cheat me— And we were driven here in the middle of the night And rowed like hell into the harbor. Didn't even
Think of chow, though we sure could have used some, Just got off the boat and lay down, all of us.
I slept like a baby, dead to the world,
And they unloaded my stuff from the ship's hold And set it down next to me where I lay on the sand. Then off they went to Sidonia, the big city,
And I was left here, stranded, just aching inside."

Athena smiled at him, her eyes blue as the sea, And her hand brushed his cheek. She was now A tall, beautiful woman, with an exquisite touch For handiwork, and her words had wings:

"Only a master thief, a real con artist, Could match your tricks—even a god Might come up short. You wily bastard, You cunning, elusive, habitual liar!
 

275








280








285








290










295










300
 
Even in your own land you weren't about To give up the stories and sly deceits That are so much a part of you.
Never mind about that though. Here we are, The two shrewdest minds in the universe, You far and away the best man on earth
In plotting strategies, and I famed among gods For my clever schemes. Not even you Recognized Pallas Athena, Zeus' daughter,
I who stand by you in all your troubles
And who made you dear to all the Phaeacians. And now I've come here, ready to weave
A plan with you, and to hide the goods
The Phaeacians gave you—which was my idea— And to tell you what you still have to endure
In your own house. And you do have to endure, And not tell anyone, man or woman,
That you have come home from your wanderings. No, you must suffer in silence, and take a beating."

And Odysseus, his mind teeming:

"It would be hard for the most discerning man alive To see through all your disguises, Goddess.
I know this, though: you were always kind to me When the army fought at Troy.
But after we plundered Priam's steep city,
And boarded our ships, and a god scattered us, I didn't see you then, didn't sense your presence Aboard my ship or feel you there to help me.
 




305








310








315








320











325








330
 
No, and I suffered in my wanderings
Until the gods released me from my troubles. It wasn't until I was on Phaeacia
That you comforted me—and led me to the city. Now I beg you, by your Father—I don't believe I've come to sunlit Ithaca, but to some other land. I think you're just giving me a hard time,
And trying to put one over on me. Tell me If I've really come to my own native land."

And Athena, her eyes glinting blue:

"Ah, that mind of yours! That's why
I can't leave you when you're down and out: Because you're so intelligent and self-possessed. Any other man come home from hard travels
Would rush to his house to see his children and wife. But you don't even want to hear how they are
Until you test your wife, who,
As a matter of fact, just sits in the house, Weeping away the lonely days and nights.
I never lost faith, though. I always knew in my heart You'd make it home, all your companions lost,
But I couldn't bring myself to fight my uncle, Poseidon, who had it in for you,
Angry because you blinded his son.
And now, so you will believe, I will show you Ithaca from the ground up: There is the harbor Of Phorcys, the Old Man of the Sea, and here, At its head, is the slender-leaved olive tree
 








335










340










345








350








355
 
Standing near a cave that glimmers in the mist And is sacred to the nymphs called Naiades. Under that cavern's arched roof you sacrificed Many a perfect victim to the nymphs.
And there stands Mount Neriton, mantled in forest."

As she spoke, the goddess dispelled the mist. The ground appeared, and Odysseus,
The godlike survivor, felt his mind soar
At the sight of his land. He kissed the good earth, And with his palms to the sun, Odysseus prayed:

"Nymphs, Naiades, daughters of Zeus! I never thought I would see you again. Take pleasure in my whispered prayers And we will give you gifts as before, If Zeus' great daughter Athena
Allows me to live and my son to reach manhood." And Athena, her eyes glinting blue:
"You don't have to worry about that.
Right now, let's stow these things in a nook
Of the enchanted cave, where they'll be safe for you. Then we can talk about a happy ending."

With that, the goddess entered the shadowy cave And searched out its recesses while Odysseus Brought everything closer—the gold, the bronze,
The well-made clothes the Phaeacians had given him.
 



360










365










370










375











380
 
And Zeus' own daughter stored them away
And blocked the entrance to the cave with a stone. Then, sitting at the base of the sacred olive,
The two plotted death for the insolent suitors. Athena began their discussion this way:

"Son of Laertes in the line of Zeus,
Odysseus, the master tactician—consider how
You're going to get your hands on the shameless suitors, Who for three years now have taken over your house, Proposing to your wife and giving her gifts.
She pines constantly for your return,
But she strings them along, makes little promises, Sends messages—while her intentions are otherwise."

And Odysseus, his mind teeming:

"Ah, I'd be heading for the same pitiful death That Agamemnon met in his house
If you hadn't told me all this, Goddess. Weave a plan so I can pay them back!
And stand by me yourself, give me the spirit I had When we ripped down Troy's shining towers!
With you at my side, your eyes glinting
And your mind fixed on battle—I would take on Three hundred men if your power were with me."

And Athena, eyes reflecting the blue sea-light:

"Oh, I'll be there all right, and I'll keep my eye on you
 



385










390








395











400








405
 
When we get down to business. And I think
More than one of these suitors destroying your home Will spatter the ground with their blood and brains. Now let's see about disguising you. First,
I'll shrivel the skin on your gnarly limbs,
And wither that tawny hair. A piece of sail-cloth Will make a nice, ugly cloak. Then
We'll make those beautiful eyes bleary and dim. You'll look disgusting to all the suitors, as well as to The wife and child you left behind in your halls.
But you should go first to your swineherd.
He may only tend your pigs, but he's devoted to you, And he loves your son and Penelope.
You'll find him with the swine. They are feeding By Raven's Rock and Arethusa's spring, Gorging on acorns and drinking black water, Which fattens swine up nicely. Stay with him,
Sit with him a while and ask him about everything, While I go to Lacedaemon, land of lovely women, To summon Telemachus. Your son, Odysseus, Went to Menelaus' house in Sparta
Hoping for news that you are still alive." And Odysseus, his mind teeming:
"You knew. Why didn't you tell him?
So he could suffer too, roving barren seas
While my wife's suitors eat him out of house and home?"

Athena answered, her eyes glinting blue:
 



410








415








420








425








430













435
 

 
"You needn't worry too much about him.
I accompanied him in person. I wanted him
To make a name for himself by traveling there. He's not exactly laboring as he takes his ease In Menelaus' luxurious palace.
Sure, these young louts have laid an ambush for him In a ship out at sea, meaning to kill him
Before he reaches home. But I don't think they will. These suitors who have been destroying your home Will be six feet under before that'll ever happen."

So saying, Athena touched him with a wand. She shriveled the flesh on his gnarled limbs,
And withered his tawny hair. She wrinkled the skin All over his body so he looked like an old man, And she made his beautiful eyes bleary and dim. Then she turned his clothes into tattered rags,
Dirty and smoke-grimed, and cast about him A great deerskin cloak with the fur worn off. And she gave him a staff and a ratty pouch All full of holes, slung by a twisted cord.

Having laid their plans, they went their own ways, The goddess off to Sparta to fetch Telemachus.
 








440








445










450








455
 

BOOK 14

Odysseus went up from the harbor
Along a rough path until he reached a high, Wooded area where Athena had told him
He would find the noble swineherd. This man
Cared for his master's property	5
Better than any other slave Odysseus had.

He found him sitting in front of his house,
Which had a high-fenced yard with a view all around. It was a fine, spacious yard, built by the herdsman
For his absent master's swine. Neither Penelope	10
Nor old Laertes knew anything of it.
He had built it with huge stones coped with thorns And wedged on the outside with close-set stakes Of split, black heart-oak. Inside the yard
He had made twelve sties, one next to the other,	15
As beds for the swine, and in each were penned Fifty wallowing swine—breeding females.
The boars slept outside, and were far scarcer, Their numbers depleted by the godlike suitors
Who feasted on them. The swineherd was always	20
Sending the best of all the fatted hogs. There were three hundred and sixty in all.

Close by,
 
The dogs slept, four of them, wild as beasts, Reared by the swineherd, who was a man
Who could have commanded a platoon in war.	25
At the moment, he was fitting sandals to his feet,
Cutting the tanned leather to size.
The other herdsman had gone off with the swine, One here, one there, one to drive a boar to town
So that the insolent suitors could sacrifice it	30
And satisfy their hunger for meat.

Suddenly,
The baying hounds caught sight of Odysseus And rushed at him barking and snarling.
Odysseus, remembering his tricks, sat down
And let the staff fall from his hand. Even so,	35
He would have been mauled on his own farmstead, But the swineherd was hot on the dogs' heels, Dropping the leather as he ran through the gate And calling aloud to the dogs. He scattered them
With a shower of stones, and then addressed	40
The man who was his master, saying:

"Another moment, old man, and the dogs Would have ripped you open, and it's me You would have blamed for it, as if the gods
Haven't given me enough grief already.	45
It's for my master, a man like a god, I grieve As I stay out here raising fat hogs
For other men to eat, while he wanders hungry In some foreign land, if he's still alive, that is,
 
And still sees the sunlight. But come with me.	50
Let's go to my hut, old man, so that you,
When you have had your fill of food and wine, Can tell me your story—where you are from, And all the suffering you have endured."
So the godlike swineherd led him into his hut.	55
Once inside, he had him sit down on a pile Of thick brushwood over which he spread
The skin of a shaggy wild goat, a large, thick hide On which he usually slept. Odysseus was glad
That he welcomed him like this, and said so:	60
"May Zeus and all the gods bless you, stranger, For welcoming me with such an open heart."
And you answered him, Eumaeus, my swineherd: "It would not be right for me to show less respect
Even to someone less worthy than you.	65
All strangers and beggars come from Zeus,
And our gifts to them are welcome though small, Since this is how it is with slaves, always fearful Of the masters over them, especially
Young masters. Yes, and the gods have blocked	70
The return of the master who would have treated me With kindness, given me possessions of my own,
A house, some land, and a wife courted by many, The things a kind master gives to his servant
Whose long, hard work a god has made prosper,	75
 
As the work I have done has come to prosper.
My master would have rewarded me richly for this, Had he grown old here. But he's gone, perished— As I wish Helen and all her clan had perished, Since she has unstrung the knees of many heroes. Yes, he too went to Ilion, land of fine horses,
To fight the Trojans on Agamemnon's account."

So saying, he tucked his tunic up in his belt
And went to the sties where the swine were penned. He picked out two and slaughtered them both, Singed them, butchered them, and put them on spits. When he had roasted everything, he brought it out Hot on the spits and served it to Odysseus, Sprinkling the pork with white barley meal.
Then he mixed sweet wine in an ivy-wood bowl, Sat down across from Odysseus, and said:

"Eat now, stranger, such food as slaves eat, Young porkers. The fatted hogs the suitors eat,
Men who have no fear of the gods, and feel no pity. The blessed ones do not love wickedness
But honor justice and repay righteousness! Even men who wage war in a foreign land
And sail for home with their ships filled with loot— Even men like that fear the wrath of the gods.
But these men here must know something,
Must have heard from a god that my master is dead, Since they are so unwilling to conduct their courtship
 








80










85








90










95








100
 
In a way that is just, or to return to their homes. They just lounge about squandering our goods, Sparing nothing in their insolence.
Every day and night they slaughter our animals— Not just one or two, either—and waste our wine. At least my master's holdings are huge. No hero, Either on the dark mainland or Ithaca itself,
Has nearly as much. Twenty men together
Could not match his wealth. Let me count it for you. Twelve herds of cattle over on the mainland,
And as many flocks of sheep, droves of swine,
And spreading herds of goats—all of them pastured By his own herdsmen or hired foreigners.
And more herds of goats, eleven in all,
Range our island's coasts. Good men watch them, And every day each of these men drives up
The best fatted goat in all of his flock
For the suitors to eat. Myself, I keep these swine, And always pick out the best to send to them."

As he spoke, Odysseus was silently Eating his pork and drinking wine—
And chewing on how to punish the suitors. When he had satisfied his appetite for food, The swineherd filled for him the drinking bowl He ordinarily used himself and gave it to him Brimming with wine. Odysseus gladly took it, And his words flew on wings to the swineherd:

"Well, who was it, my friend, who bought you?
 




105








110








115








120










125










130
 
Who is this rich and powerful man?
You said he died fighting on Agamemnon's account. Tell me his name. I might recognize it.
Zeus only knows who I might have met And have some news of. I've wandered far."

And the swineherd, a leader of men:

"Old man, no wanderer who came with news of him Could ever convince his wife and son. Besides,
All a needy vagabond ever does is tell lies. He has no interest at all in telling the truth. Whenever a wanderer comes to Ithaca,
He goes to my mistress with a cock and bull story. She receives him kindly and questions him closely, And tears fall from her eyes and she weeps and cries The way a woman will whose husband dies abroad. And you'd make up a story, too, old man,
In an instant, if you thought you could get A cloak and tunic out of it.
But by now,
Dogs and birds have torn the flesh from his bones, And his soul has crawled off. Or deep in the sea Fish have picked his bones clean, and they now lie On a shore somewhere, wrapped in deep sand.
No, he's dead and gone, and there is nothing left For his dear ones but grief, and for me especially, For never again will I find a master so mild, However far I go, even if I go home again
To my mother and father, where I was born
 








135











140








145










150








155
 
And where they reared me. Yet,
As much as I miss them and miss my homeland, I miss Odysseus more. There, I said his name.
I would rather not say his name when he is not here, For he loved me greatly and cared for me. Instead,
I call him my brother, though he is not here." Odysseus, who had borne much, replied:
"Well, my friend, since you refuse to believe, And since you insist he will never come home, I'll not just say it, but will solemnly swear
That Odysseus will come back. As for a reward For bringing this news, give it to me
When he does return—a tunic and cloak— And not a moment before. Until that man Is actually here, I will accept nothing, However great my need. I hate like hell
A man who caves in to his poverty And tells a batch of lies.
I swear by Zeus, Above all gods, and by this hospitable table, And the hearth of flawless Odysseus himself— That everything will happen just as I say: Before this month is out Odysseus will come,
In the dark of the moon, before the new crescent. He shall return, and take vengeance upon
All those who dishonor his wife and his son."
 




160











165








170








175










180
 
And you answered him, Eumaeus, my swineherd:

 
"I'll never be paying you any reward, Nor will Odysseus ever come home.
Now let's just drink quietly and think about Other things. Don't remind me of all this.
I feel such pain and grief in my heart Whenever anyone mentions my master. We'll just let your oath be. May Odysseus
Come back, as I desire, and as Penelope does, And the old man Laertes, and godlike Telemachus, Odysseus' son. And now he weighs on my mind, Telemachus. The gods made him grow
Like a sapling, and I thought he would be a match For his father, a splendid man to look at.
Then one of the immortals, or maybe a man, Knocked the sense out of him, and he left
For sacred Pylos, trying to track down his father. And now the suitors are ambushing him
As he sails for home, so that the line
Of godlike Arceisius may come to an end On Ithaca, and leave no name behind.
But there's nothing we can do, whether he's caught Or escapes with a helping hand from Zeus.
But tell me, old man, about your own troubles, And tell me this, so that I can be sure of it.
Who are you, and where do you come from? Where is your city, and where are your parents? On what kind of ship did you come, and how Did sailors bring you to Ithaca? Who were they?
 



185








190








195








200








205








210
 
I don't suppose you walked all the way here." And Odysseus, his mind teeming:
 
"I will tell you all of this, down to the last detail. If you and I could only have food and sweet wine For the duration, feasting on and on quietly
Here in your hut, leaving the work to others—
It would easily take me a full year, and even then I would not finish my heart's tale of sorrows,
All that I have endured by the will of the gods.
I was born in Crete, son of a wealthy man Who had many other sons born to his lawful wife. My own mother was a concubine,
But my father, Castor, son of Hylax, Treated me like one of his true-born sons. He was honored as a god by the Cretans
For his wealth, prosperity, and glorious sons. But death carried him away to Hades,
And his sons parceled out his estate
Among themselves, leaving me just a small share, And a house to live in. But I was able to marry
A wife from a propertied family
Because of my real worth. I was no weakling, And I held my own in battle. All that's gone now,
But I think you can judge the grain from the stubble. I'm overwhelmed now with aches and pains,
But back then Athena and Ares
Gave me the power to crush men in war.
 


215








220








225








230








235
 
When I set an ambush, lying in wait
With hand-picked men to give the enemy hell, I never got nervous, never saw death looming. I was the first to jump out and kill whoever Gave way before me and started to run.
I was good in war. But fieldwork
Was not to my taste, nor caring for a household
Where children are reared. Oared ships are what I liked,
And war, polished spears, and arrows,
All the grim things that make most people shudder. I suppose I liked what a god put in my heart— One man's meat is another man's poison.
Before the Greeks ever set foot in Troy, I had already led nine expeditions,
Amphibious assaults against foreign cities. I made a lot in those wars. I would cull The loot I liked best and get even more When the rest was divided later by lot.
So my house grew rich, and I became
One of the most feared and respected men in Crete.
But when thundering Zeus opened the war That unstrung the knees of many heroes,
I was urged to go with glorious Idomeneus And lead our ships to Troy. I could not refuse. The people's voice had to be heard. Nine years We Greeks waged war, and in the tenth
We sacked Priam's city and sailed for home In our ships, and a god scattered the fleet. But Zeus had more trouble in store for me.
 



240








245








250








255








260








265
 
I stayed home for only a month, enjoying
My children, my wife, and all my possessions. Then I felt an urge to voyage to Egypt
With my godlike companions. I fitted out Nine ships with care. It didn't take long For my men to gather, and when they had, I feasted them for six days, giving them All the animals they needed for sacrifice—
Enough for the gods and for their own banquets. On the seventh day we set sail from Crete Under a fresh North Wind and ran on as easily As if we were in a current. My ships sailed Without any mishap, free of disease,
Guided by the wind and the pilot's hand.
On the fifth day I moored my ships
In the river Nile, and you can be sure I ordered My trusty mates to stand by and guard them While I sent out scouts to look around.
But the crews got restless and cocky
And started pillaging the Egyptian countryside, Carrying off the women and children
And killing the men. The cry came to the city, And at daybreak troops answered the call.
The whole plain was filled with infantry, War chariots, and the glint of bronze.
Thundering Zeus threw my men into a panic, And not one had the courage to stand and fight Against odds like that. It was bad.
They killed many of us outright with bronze And led the rest to their city to work as slaves.
 




270








275








280








285








290








295
 
But Zeus put an idea into my mind.
I'm sorry I took it. It would have been better If I had died in Egypt, met my fate there— So much more suffering was waiting for me. I took off my helmet, dropped my shield,
Let the spear fall from my hands, and walked straight To the king's chariot. I clasped his knees
And kissed them. It worked. He pitied me, Took me in his chariot, and drove me weeping To his own home, warding off all the spears That were aimed at me by the angry mob,
For he respected Zeus, god of strangers, Indignant and wrathful above all other gods.
Seven years I stayed there, amassing wealth, For all the Egyptians gave me gifts.
When the eighth year rolled around, there came A man from Phoenicia, avaracious and sly, And a general scoundrel. He persuaded me
To go off with him to his house in Phoenicia, And I stayed with him there for one full year, After which he took me in a seafaring ship Bound for Libya, pretending we were taking A cargo there, when his real intent
Was to sell me there for an enormous price. I suspected treachery but had to go aboard. The ship ran on under a fresh North Wind, Staying above Crete in a mid-sea course.
Then Zeus devised the crew's utter destruction.
When we left Crete behind, there was
 




300








305








310








315








320








325
 
No other land in sight, only sea and sky. Then Zeus put a black cloud over our ship.
The sea grew dark beneath it, and Zeus thundered And struck the ship with a lightning bolt.
She shivered from stem to stern and was filled With sulfurous smoke. The men went overboard, Bobbing in the waves like sea crows
Around the black ship, their day of return Snuffed out by the god. As for me,
Zeus himself, in the midst of my distress, Put into my hands the surging mast
Of the dark-prowed ship. That saved my life. I clung to the mast as the terrible winds
Bore me along. I was out there nine days, And on the tenth black night a great wave Rolled me ashore in the Thesprotians' land. The Thesprotian king, the hero Pheidon, Took me in. There was no talk of ransom, For his son had found me, overcome
With cold and fatigue, and raised me up
By the hand, and led me to his father's palace, Where he gave me a tunic and cloak to wear.
It was there I learned of Odysseus.
The king said he had been his guest there
On his way back to his native land. He showed me All the treasure Odysseus had amassed,
Bronze, gold, and wrought iron, enough to feed His children's children for ten generations,
All stored there for him in the halls of the king.
 






330








335








340








345








350








355
 
Odysseus, he said, had gone to Dodona To consult the oak-tree oracle of Zeus And ask how he should return to Ithaca—
Openly or in secret—after being gone so long. And he swore to me, as he poured libations There in his house, that a ship was launched, And a crew standing by, to take him home.
But he sent me off first, since a Thesprotian ship Happened to be leaving for Dulichium,
Where I wanted to go. He told that crew To escort me to King Acastus there.
Somehow the crew turned against me, And I was destined for even more pain.
When the ship left land, it wasn't long before They hatched a plot to sell me as a slave.
They stripped off my clothes, the tunic and cloak, And made me wear the rags you see on me now. At evening they reached the coast of Ithaca.
They tied me up in the ship and went ashore
And got busy with their supper there on the beach. The gods themselves must have untied my bonds, They came off so easily, and wrapping my head
In the rags I wore, I slid down the smooth plank Into the sea. I started to swim a breast stroke
And was soon out of the water and away from them. I went upland a ways and found a leafy thicket
And huddled up in it. They looked all over, Moaning and groaning, but couldn't see any profit
In continuing their search, and so they went back aboard
 








360








365








370








375








380
 
Their hollow ship. The gods kept me under cover— Easy for them—and guided me to the farmstead
Of a wise man. It seems I'm still destined to live."

And you answered him, Eumaeus, my swineherd:

"You poor, wandering wretch. You've wrung my heart With all the particulars of your suffering.
But the part of your story about Odysseus Just isn't right, and I'm not buying it.
Why should a man in such a fix as you are Want to lie like that? I know all about
The return of my master—how the gods spited him In not letting him die among the Trojans
Or in his friends' arms after he had wound up the war. The entire Greek army would have buried him then, And great honor would have passed on to his son.
As it is, the whirlwinds have snatched him away. Myself, I live out here with the swine. I never go Into the city, unless Penelope asks me to
When news comes to her from somewhere. Then everyone sits around the visitor
And questions him, both those who miss Their absent lord, and those who enjoy Devouring his goods without recompense. But I don't ask anything, not since the time An Aetolian fooled me with his phony story.
He had killed a man and was wandering the earth. He came to my house, and I welcomed him.
He said he had seen Odysseus in Crete
 

385











390








395








400








405








410
 
At Idomeneus' house, repairing some of his ships
That storms had battered. And he said he would be back By summer or harvest, bringing with him
Piles of treasure and his godlike companions. And now, you woeful old man, since some god Has steered you my way, don't you try
To charm me or win me over with lies.
It's not for that I'll show you respect or kindness, But for fear of Zeus, and out of pity for you."

And Odysseus, his mind teeming:

"You have a heart that just won't believe.
Not even my oath was enough to convince you. Let's make a bet, with the gods on Olympus
As witnesses. If your master comes back, You give me a cloak and tunic to wear
And get me to Dulichium, where I want to be. But if he doesn't come back as I say he will,
Have your slaves jump me and throw me off a cliff, So that the next beggar will think twice before lying."

And the noble, godlike swineherd answered:

"And that would earn me a fine reputation, Now and forever, wouldn't it, stranger?
First I welcome you into my hut, and then I take you outside and end your sweet life.
And afterwards I'll pray to Zeus, son of Cronus, With a clear conscience!
 




415








420











425








430











435
 
It's time for supper.
I hope my men come back soon
So we can make a tasty meal here in the hut."

As they were speaking, the herders came up Driving the swine. They put the sows in the sties Where they always slept, and an amazing racket Rose from the animals as they were being penned. The swineherd called to the workers and said:

"Bring the best boar we have so I can slaughter him For the stranger here, and for us, too.
We have worked long and hard with these tuskers While others eat up our labor free of charge."

With that, he started to split wood with an axe While they brought in a five-year-old fatted boar And set him down by the hearth. The swineherd
Did not forget the immortals—he had a good mind for this— Casting into the fire as a first offering
Bristles from the head of the white-tusked boar
And praying that Odysseus would return to his home. Then he came down hard with a piece of split oak And the boar's spirit left him. They cut his throat, Singed him, and then butchered him quickly.
The swineherd cut off, as more first offerings, Bits of raw flesh from each part of the animal,
Then wrapped them in fat, sprinkled them with barley, And then threw them into the fire. The rest
They cut up and roasted with care on spits.
 





440










445











450








455








460
 
When it was done, they pulled the roast pork from the spits And piled it on platters. The swineherd carved,
For he had a good sense of fairness,
And he divided the meat into seven portions.
He set aside one for the Nymphs and for Hermes, Saying a prayer, and served the rest to the men, Honoring Odysseus with the long chine
Of the white-tusked boar, and so pleasing his master. And Odysseus, always thinking, said:

"Eumaeus, may you be as dear to Father Zeus
As you are to me, for so honoring a man like me."

And you answered him, Eumaeus, my swineherd:

"Eat, my strange guest, and enjoy what we have. God gives us one thing and holds another back, Just as he pleases, for he can do all things."

He spoke, and sacrificed the first offerings To the eternal gods, and poured libations Of sparkling wine. Then he handed the cup
To Odysseus, sacker of cities, and took his seat. The bread was served by Mesaulius,
Whom the swineherd had bought all on his own
While his master was gone, without the help of his mistress Or of old Laertes, buying him
From the Taphians with his own resources.
They reached for the good cheer spread before them, And when they had enough of food and drink,
 

465








470










475













480








485








490
 
Mesaulius took away the leftovers, and they all Longed for rest, their stomachs full of bread and meat.

 
The evening sky was foreboding and moonless, And a damp West Wind was starting to blow.
It began to rain, and it would rain all night. Odysseus spoke, testing the swineherd, Seeing if he would take off his own cloak And give it to him, or tell one of his men To do so, since he cared for him deeply:

"Hear me now, Eumaeus, and the rest of you men, While I boast a little. It must be the wine Befuddling me, which gets even sensible men Singing and laughing and up to dance,
And sometimes to say things better left unsaid. But I've cut loose now and won't hide anything. Oh, to be young again and with the strength I had When we went out on ambush under Troy's wall. Our leaders were Odysseus and Menelaus,
And I was third in command, at their request. When we had come up close to the steep city wall, We took our places on the perimeter
Down in the brush and reeds of the swampland, Lying there crouched beneath our shields.
The North Wind swooped down, and night came on Foul and bitter cold. Snow drifted down
And covered us like frost, and ice rimmed our shields. Everyone else had on cloaks and tunics
 





495










500








505








510








515
 
And slept peacefully, their shields on their shoulders. But I had stupidly left my cloak behind at camp, Because I didn't think it would be cold that night, And had come out with only my shield and belt.
During the third watch, when the stars had turned In their wheeling course, I nudged Odysseus, Who was lying next to me, and he heard me say, 'Son of Laertes in the line of Zeus,
Wily Odysseus—listen, I'm about dead over here; This cold is killing me. I don't have a cloak.
Some god talked me into coming out here
With only a tunic, and now there's no going back.' He put his mind to work and came up with a plan. That's how he was; he could think up things
As well as he could fight. He whispered to me, 'Be quiet now, or one of our men will hear you.'
Then he propped his head up on an elbow and said, 'Listen, men. I had a dream from the gods.
We've come too far from the ships. We need someone To request Agamemnon, commander-in-chief,
To send out more troops from our beach-head camp.' He had no sooner spoken than Thoas
Was on his feet. He flung aside his purple cloak
And sprinted off to the ships, and wrapped in that cloak I lay down gladly until Dawn shone with gold.
Oh, to be young again and still have my strength! Then one of the swineherds would give me a cloak, Both out of kindness and out of respect for a man. But now they scorn me because I am dressed in rags."
 




520








525








530








535








540








545
 
And you answered him, Eumaeus, my swineherd:

 
"There's nothing wrong with your story, old man, And nothing you've said is out of line
Or unprofitable. So you won't go without. You'll have clothing, yes, and everything else A suppliant in need ought to receive—
At least for tonight. But in the morning
You'll have to shake out those old rags of yours. We don't have extra tunics or cloaks
Around here. Each man has only one.
But when Odysseus' son comes, he himself Will give you a cloak and tunic to wear,
And will send you wherever your heart desires."

So saying, the swineherd sprang to his feet And started to make up a bed for Odysseus
Near the fire, spreading it with goatskins and fleeces. There Odysseus lay down, and Eumaeus
Threw over him a large, heavy cloak
That he kept as a spare for stormy weather.

So there Odysseus slept, with the young men All around him. But not the swineherd.
He would not settle for a bed inside,
Away from the boars. He got himself ready To go sleep outdoors, and Odysseus was glad That he took such good care of the property Of his absent master. First, Eumaeus
Slung his sharp sword over his sturdy shoulders
 





550








555










560








565










570
 
And put on a thick cloak to keep out the wind. Then picking up the fleece of a large, fatted goat, And grabbing a javelin to ward off dogs and men, He went out to sleep with the white-tusked boars Under a hollow rock, out of the cold North Wind.
 



575
 

BOOK 15

Pallas Athena now went to wide Lacedaemon To tell Odysseus' son it was time to return.
She found Telemachus and Nestor's noble son On the porch of Menelaus' palace.
Nestor's son was sleeping, but Telemachus	5
Had been lying awake all through the night Thinking about his father. Athena,
Her eyes flashing in the dark, said to him:

"Telemachus, you've been away too long.
Think of the wealth you left behind at home	10
And all those insolent men ready to devour it. Your journey will have been for nothing.
Hurry, now, and rouse Menelaus
To send you on your way, so you can find
Your blameless mother still at home.	15
Her father and brothers are pressuring her
To marry Eurymachus, because of all the suitors He gives the best presents, and now has Stepped up his wooing. You have to watch out
She doesn't carry off all your treasure.	20
You know what a woman's heart is like.
She wants to enrich the house of the one who weds her, Never mind about her former children
And the husband she once loved. Once he's dead,
 
She doesn't give any of them a thought.	25
No, you go, and put all your possessions
In the keeping of the best maidservant in the house, Until the gods show you your honored bride.
And one more thing for you to keep in mind.
The suitors' ringleaders have set up an ambush	30
In the strait between Ithaca and rocky Samos. They mean to kill you before you make it home. I don't think they will. Those mooching suitors Will be in their graves before they can get at you.
But keep your ship out away from the islands,	35
And sail by night as well. One of the gods
Who watches over you will put a wind at your back. When you make landfall on Ithaca,
Send your crew with the ship on to the city,
But you go first to the swineherd's hut;	40
He has a soft spot in his heart for you. Spend the night there and tell him to go Into the city and bring word to Penelope
That you are safe and have come back from Pylos."

And with that she was off to high Olympus.	45

Telemachus awoke and woke up Peisistratus With a nudge of his heel, saying to him:

"Wake up, Peisistratus. Get your horses
And yoke them up so we can get on the road."
Nestor's son Peisistraus answered:	50
 
"Telemachus, there's no way we can drive In the dark, no matter how eager we are
To get on the road. Besides, it'll be light soon, And we should wait until Menelaus comes out
And sets gifts on the chariot and sends us off	55
With a farewell speech. A guest remembers A host's hospitality for as long as he lives."
He spoke, and Dawn rose up splashed with gold. Menelaus, who had just gotten out of bed
With Helen, was coming toward them,	60
And when Telemachus saw him
The young hero quickly threw on his silky tunic, Flung a cloak on his shoulders, and went out, The true son of godlike Odysseus.
When he reached Menelaus he said to him:	65
"Menelaus, son of Atreus in the line of Zeus, Send me back home to my own native land,
For my heart is now eager to return to my home." And Menelaus, famed for his war cry:
"Telemachus, far be it from me to detain you here	70
When you yearn to go home. I no more approve Of a host who is too welcoming than of one Who is too cold. Due measure in all things.
It is just as wrong to rush a guest's departure
When he doesn't want to go, as it is	75
To hold him back when he is ready to leave.
 
Make a guest welcome for as long as he stays And send him off whenever he wants to go. But do stay until I can bring some gifts out And load them onto your chariot, fine gifts, As you will see. And I will order the women
To prepare you a meal from our well-stocked larder. It's a double honor, and sensible, too,
For the traveler to eat before setting forth
Over the boundless earth. And if you wish to go All through Hellas and into the heart of Argos, I myself will go with you. I'll yoke up horses And give you a tour of the cities of men,
And no one will send us away empty-handed. Everyone will give us at least one thing,
A fine bronze tripod or perhaps a cauldron, A team of mules or a golden cup."
And Telemachus, in his cool-headed way: "Menelaus, son of Atreus in the line of Zeus,
I would rather go straight home. I did not leave
Anyone behind to watch my possessions.
I'm afraid that in my search for my godlike father I may perish myself, or that some precious thing May be lost from my house while I am away."

When he heard this, Menelaus at once Ordered his wife and her serving women
To prepare a meal from their well-stocked larder. Then Eteoneus, just risen from bed,
 






80








85








90











95










100
 
Came up—his house was nearby—and Menelaus Had him kindle a fire and roast some of the meat. While he was doing this, Menelaus himself
Went down to his scented treasure chamber Accompanied by Helen and Megapenthes.
When they came to where the treasure was stored The son of Atreus took a two-handled cup
And had his son Megapenthes bring a mixing bowl Of solid silver. But Helen went to the chests
That held her robes, the richly embroidered robes She herself had made. And this beautiful woman, Helen of Argos, lifted out the robe
That had the finest embroideries, an ample robe That shone like starlight beneath all the rest.
Then they went back through the house and came To Telemachus, to whom Menelaus said:

"Telemachus, may Zeus, Hera's thundering lord, Bring you to your home, just as you desire.
Of all the gifts that lie stored in my house I will give you the most beautiful—
And the most valuable—a well-wrought bowl, Solid silver, with the lip finished in gold, Made by Hephaestus. The hero Phaedimus, King of the Sidonians, gave it to me
When I stayed at his house on my way home. Now I want you to take it home with you."

And the son of Atreus placed the double-handled goblet In Telemachus' hands. Then strong Megapenthes
 



105








110








115










120








125










130
 
Brought the gleaming silver mixing bowl over
And set it before him. And Helen, lovely in her bones, Came up with the robe and said to him:

 
"I, too, give you a gift, dear child, this robe, A memento from the hands of Helen,
For your bride to wear on your wedding day. Until then let it lie in your mother's keeping. And my wish for you is that you come with joy To your native land and your ancestral home."

She put the robe in his hands, and he received it With gratitude. Then Peisistratus put all of the gifts Into the chariot's trunk and looked at them a while With wonder in his heart.
Menelaus now
Led them into the house, and the two sat down. A maid poured water from a silver pitcher
Over a golden basin for them to wash their hands And then set up a polished table nearby.
Another serving woman, grave and dignified, Set out bread and generous helpings
From the other dishes she had. Boethus' son Carved the meat nearby and divided it up, And the son of Menelaus poured the wine.
They reached out to all the good cheer before them, And when they had their fill of food and drink, Telemachus and glorious Nestor's son
Yoked the horses, mounted the inlaid chariot, And drove through the gate and echoing portico.
 

135








140











145








150








155
 
And the son of Atreus, red-haired Menelaus, Went after them, holding in his right hand
A golden cup filled with honey-hearted wine So they could pour libations before setting out.
He stood before the horses, lifted the cup, and said:

"Farewell, young men, and bring my greetings To Nestor, the old commander. He was to me Kind as a father when we Greeks fought at Troy."

And Telemachus, in his clear-headed way:

"We will tell him all these things, just as you say, Zeus-born, when we come to his land,
As surely as I wish I would find Odysseus home, So I could tell him how good you have been to me During my visit with you, and tell him how
I come home myself with many a treasure."

As he spoke, a bird flew by on his right,
An eagle, clutching in his talons a silvery goose, A large, tame fowl from the yard. Men and women Ran after it shouting. The eagle got closer,
Then veered off to the right in front of the horses. This lifted everyone's spirits. Nestor's son Peisistratus was the first one to speak:

"Zeus-born Menelaus, what does this mean? Is it a sign for us two, or for yourself?"
 



160










165











170










175








180
 
Menelaus, the warlord, was thinking this over, Looking for the right way to interpret the sign,
When long-robed Helen took the words from his mouth:

"I will prophesy as the immortals prompt me And as I see it myself. Just as this eagle
Came from the mountain, where he was born and bred, And snatched up the goose bred in the house,
So shall Odysseus, after long, hard travels, Return to his home, and take vengeance. Or he is already at home and is even now
Sowing the seeds of the suitors' destruction." And Telemachus, in his spirited way:
"May Hera's thundering lord grant it, And I will pray to you as to a god."

He flicked the lash and the horses took off Through the city and out to the plain. All day long They jostled the yoke that held them together.

As the sun set and the world grew dark,
They came to Pherae and pulled up at the house Of Diodes, son of Ortilochus,
Himself a son of the river Alpheus. There they spent the night, and Diodes Gave them the hospitality due to guests.

When Dawn brushed the pale sky with rose,
 




185










190











195











200








205
 
They yoked the horses, stepped up into
The inlaid chariot and drove out through the gate And echoing portico. Peisistratus
Flicked the lash and the horses took off.
Soon after they reached the high rock of Pylos, And Telemachus had a word with Nestor's son:

"I wonder if you could do me a favor, Peisistratus? You and I go back a long way Because of our fathers' friendship. Moreover, We're the same age, and this journey together Will cement our friendship. This is what I want: Do not drive me farther than my ship.
Drop me off there. I'm afraid the old man Will keep me in his house against my will.
He means well, but I really have to get home."

Nestor's son thought it over, trying to decide
How he could rightfully do Telemachus this favor. He made up his mind and turned off to the sea And the ship there. He stowed the beautiful gifts From Menelaus—the clothes and the gold—
In the ship's stern and urged his friend on, Speaking to him words that had wings:

"Get yourself and your crew aboard quickly, Before I reach home and tell the old man.
If there's one thing I'm sure of it's this:
Once he has you in his house he won't let you go, And he'll come here to get you himself
 






210










215








220










225










230
 
If he has to, and he won't go home empty-handed. No matter what, he's going to be angry."

And he drove his horses back to the city
With their beautiful manes flowing in the wind And quickly reached his father's palace.

Meanwhile, Telemachus was urging on his crew:

"Put all the gear in order on this black ship, men, And let's go aboard and get under way."

They carried out his orders and were soon All on board and sitting on their benches.

Telemachus was busy with all of this, And was offering sacrifice to Athena
By the ship's stern, when there came up to him A traveler from a distant land. He was in exile From Argos, because he had killed a man, And he was a seer. He traced his descent
From Melampus, who had lived in Pylos In the old days as one of its wealthiest men
But left for other parts, fleeing great Neleus, That most lordly man, who had seized his wealth And kept it from him for one full year.
Melampus lay imprisoned in Phylacus' house And suffered terribly because of Neleus' daughter And the delusion which the goddess Erinys
 



235













240












245








250








255
 
Had laid upon him. He escaped, however, And drove off the lowing cattle from Phylace To Pylos, and got even with godlike Neleus, And brought Neleus' daughter home
To be his brother's wife. He himself then left
For the horse country of Argos, his destiny being To live there and rule over many Argives.
There he took a wife and built a lofty house And fathered two strong sons. These sons
Were Mantius and Antiphates, and one of them, Antiphates, sired great-hearted Oicles,
And Oicles was the father of Amphiaras, Whom Zeus and Apollo showered with love. But he did not reach the threshold of old age, Dying in Thebes because of a woman's gifts. Melampus' other son, Mantius,
Sired Polypheides and Clytius. Clytius, because he was so beautiful,
Was snatched away by gold-stitched Dawn To live with the immortals. And Apollo Made Polypheides a seer, a high-hearted man
And the best of men after Amphiaraus was dead. Eventually, he quarreled with his father
And moved to Hyperesia, and was the prophet there.

It was his son, Theoclymenus by name, Who now came up to Telemachus
As he was pouring libations by his black ship And spoke to him these winged words:
 




260








265








270








275








280










285
 
"Friend, since I find you making sacrifice here, I implore you by your sacrifice and by your god,
Then by your own life and the lives of your crew— Tell me truly what I ask and do not hide it.
Who are you, and where are you from?
Where is your city, and where do your parents live?" Telemachus answered in his clear-headed way:
"Well then, stranger, I will tell you exactly.
I was born in Ithaca, and my father is Odysseus— If he ever existed. But he has met a grim fate.
So I have taken my comrades and a black ship In search of news of my long-absent father."

And godlike Theoclymenus answered:

"I, too, have left my country, because I killed a man, one of my own clan.
He has many brothers and kinsmen left In bluegrass Argos, powerful men,
And I am on the run to escape a black fate At their hands. It seems I am doomed to be A wanderer. Take me on your ship, please, Since I have taken refuge with you now.
Don't let them kill me. I think they are coming." And Telemachus, in his cool-headed way:
"I won't push you away if you want to come.
 








290











295











300








305
 
Welcome aboard, and share whatever we have."

With that he relieved him of his bronze spear And slid it onto the deck of the ship.
They went aboard. Telemachus sat down In the stern, Theoclymenus beside him. The sailors untied the stern cables
And Telemachus called out orders to them To take hold of the tackling. They fell to, Raising the firwood mast and setting it
Into its socket. They made it fast with forestays And hauled up the white sail with rawhide ropes. And Athena, her eyes flashing with sea-light, Gave them a tailwind that ripped through the sky, Speeding the ship across the bright salt sea.
Krouni and Chalcis, with its beautiful streams, Passed by quickly, and then the sun went down And the seaways grew dark. The ship surged on With Zeus' wind behind it, on to Pheae
And past limewhite Elis, where the Epeans rule. Then Telemachus steered her out again
To the swiftly passing islands, wondering whether He would dodge death or be caught by the suitors.

Meanwhile, Odysseus and the noble swineherd Were having supper with the others in the hut. When they had satisfied their appetite
For food and drink, Odysseus spoke among them, Testing Eumaeus to see whether he would
 

310










315








320








325








330










335
 
Still take care of him there on the farmstead Or send him off to the city:

 
"Listen now, Eumaeus, and you other men, too. In the morning I'm off to beg in the city,
I don't want to eat you out of house and home.
So tell me what I need to know, and give me a guide Who can lead me there. Once in the city
I can knock about on my own, as I must, Hoping for a cup of water and a loaf of bread. And I might go up to Odysseus' house
And bring some news to Penelope.
I might make the rounds of the insolent suitors And see if they will give me some dinner From all the good food they have. I might even
Start waiting on them, doing whatever they need. I'll tell you something now. Thanks to Hermes, The Guide, who lends grace and glory
To all that men do, when it comes to serving No one can touch me, in splitting firewood, Building a fire, roasting meat and carving it, Or in pouring wine, or in any of the things Lesser men do when they wait on nobles."
And the swineherd, greatly troubled, responded: "Where did you get such a notion, stranger?
You must want to die, if you really intend To go in there with that mob of suitors, Whose arrogance reaches the iron heavens.
 



340








345








350








355











360
 
Their serving men are not at all like you.
They're young, well dressed in tunics and cloaks, Handsome and sleek. The tables are polished And piled high with bread, meat, and wine.
Stay here. You're not bothering anyone, Not me nor any other man who is here. But when Odysseus' son comes, he himself Will give you a cloak and tunic to wear,
And will send you wherever your heart desires."

And the enduring, godlike Odysseus answered:

"Eumaeus, may you be as dear to father Zeus As you are to me, for you have given me a rest From wandering the world in grief and pain. Nothing is harder on a man than homelessness.
But when it comes to feeding his belly, a man will endure Whatever hardship and sorrows he must.
But now, since you are keeping me here
A while, and asking me to wait for Telemachus, Tell me about noble Odysseus' mother,
And his father, whom he left behind
On the brink of old age when he went to Troy. Are they still alive and under the sun,
Or are they now dead and in Hades' gloom?" The noble swineherd made this response:
"I will tell you, stranger, since you ask. Laertes is still alive, but prays constantly
 



365








370











375








380








385
 
That his life will dwindle away in his halls. He grieves terribly for his missing son And for his own lady, his wedded wife.
He took her death hard, and it delivered him To an unripe old age. She herself died
Of grief for her son, a miserable death That I would wish on no one dear to me.
For as long as she lived, hard as it was for her, I always enjoyed seeing how she was,
Asking about her health, for she herself
Had brought me up with long-robed Ctimene, Her youngest child. I was brought up with her, Almost as if I were one of the family.
When we reached that lovely time of our youth, They sent her to Same, sent her off to be married, And got themselves countless gifts in exchange.
As for me, my lady clothed me in a cloak and tunic, Very fine ones, and gave me sandals for my feet, And sent me off to the fields. But in her heart
She loved me more than that. I do without now, But the blessed gods make my work prosper.
I stay busy with it, and it gives me enough To eat and drink and give some to beggars.
From my mistress now I get nothing pleasant, Word or deed. Trouble has come to the house— These overbearing men. But servants still need To speak to their mistress face to face,
Hear all the gossip, eat and drink,
And afterward take something back to the fields, The sort of thing that warms a servant's heart."
 

390








395








400








405








410








415
 

 
Odysseus, his mind teeming, responded:

"You must have been awfully young, Eumaeus, When you were forced to travel so far away From your parents and home. How did it happen? Did your parents live in a broad-wayed city
That was ransacked in war? Or were you alone Out in the fields with your cattle and sheep
When raiders grabbed you and took you in their ship And sold you for a good price to your master here?"

Then the swineherd Eumaeus told his story:

"Well, stranger, since you're curious about this, Sit back and relax and drink your wine.
These nights are ungodly long. There's time to sleep And to enjoy stories both. You shouldn't lie down Too early. Too much sleep can leave a man tired.
If any of the rest of you would like,
You can go sleep outside. Just eat something
At daybreak and go out with our master's swine. We two are going to stay here in the hut,
Eating and drinking and swapping stories About each others' hard times. Past sorrows Can comfort a man, especially one
Who has suffered much and wandered far. But on to what you asked me about.
There is an island called Syria—
You may have heard of it—above Ortygia
 

420










425











430








435








440








445
 
And off toward the setting of the summer sun. It doesn't have many people, but it's good land,
Rich in flocks and herds, full of grapes and wheat. There's never any famine, and no disease.
When folks grow old, Apollo and Artemis Come to town with their silver bows
And shoot them dead with their gentle arrows. There are two cities that take up the island, And my father Ctesius, son of Ormenus, Ruled over both, a man like a god.
One day some Phoenician traders arrived, Greedy men, with a shipload of baubles.
In my father's house was a Phoenician woman, Tall and beautiful and skilled at crafts.
One of the craggy Phoenicians seduced her
As she was washing her clothes, lying with her In their hollow ship—the sort of thing
That will gull the mind of any woman. Afterward, he asked her who she was
And where she came from. She promptly pointed To the high roof of my father's house:

'I am proud to say I am from bronze-rich Sidon And am a daughter of Arybas, a wealthy man. But Taphian pirates abducted me
As I came from the fields, and brought me here And sold me to the master of that house over there, Who paid a small fortune for me.'

"The man who had lain with her in secret said:
 








450








455








460








465










470
 

 
'Would you like to return with us to your home
And see your high-roofed house, and your parents, too? They are still alive and said to be rich.'
"And the Phoenician woman responded: 'Perhaps, if you sailors will swear an oath
That you will bring me home without harming me.'
"When they had sworn the oath, the woman said: 'Be quiet now, and if any of you sees me
In the street or at the well, don't speak to me, Or someone may tell the old king in the palace
And he might suspect something and lock me up In painful bonds and sentence you to death.
Don't forget this. Just sell all your merchandise, And as soon as your ship is laden with goods, Send a messenger to me up in the palace.
I'll bring whatever gold I can lay my hands on.
And there's something else I can put up for my passage. I'm the nurse of one of my master's children,
A clever boy who always tags along with me. I'll bring him on board. He'll get a good price In whatever foreign land you sell him off.'

"And with that she went off to the beautiful palace. The Phoenicians stayed in our land for a full year And filled their ship through all the trade they did.
 



475













480










485








490










495
 
When their ship was loaded for their voyage home, They sent a messenger to tip off the woman.
A cunning man came to my father's house With a golden necklace strung with amber.
While the women in the hall, and my noble mother, Were looking it over and offering a price,
The man nodded to the woman in silence, Nodded and went back to his hollow ship. She took me by the hand and led me outside, Stopping on the porch to scoop up three
Of the golden goblets left on the tables
By retainers of my father who had banqueted there And then gone off to debate in the council.
She tucked these goblets into her bosom And bore them off. I innocently followed.
The sun went down and the streets grew dark. We hurried on to the glimmering harbor Where the Phoenician ship was moored.
They had us board, and the ship set sail Over the water with a following wind.
We sailed on for six solid days and nights, But when Zeus put a seventh day in the sky, Artemis came with her showering arrows And shot the woman. She fell with a thud Into the hold, like a tern plunging down.
They threw her overboard for the seals and fish, And there I was, with a broken heart.
The wind and the waves bore the ship along To Ithaca, where Laertes bought me.
And that was how I first saw this land."
 




500








505








510








515








520








525
 

Then Zeus-bred Odysseus said to him:

 
"Eumaeus, your story, with its tale
Of your painful ordeal, has touched my heart. But in your case Zeus has set some good Alongside the evil, since after all your suffering You wound up at the house of a kindly man
Who gives you food and drink and treats you well. You have a good life. But as for me, I came here While wandering around from city to city."

They spoke to one another in this way
And then lay down to sleep, but not for long, For Dawn soon rose in the blossoming sky.

Telemachus and his crew were now near to shore And furling the sails in the early light.
They struck the mast quickly and rowed the ship
Up to her mooring. They threw out the anchor-stones, Made the stern cables fast, and then disembarked Onto the beach, where they prepared their meal
And mixed the glinting wine. After they had eaten, Telemachus, clear-headed as ever, spoke to them:

"You men row the black ship to the town While I go visit the fields and the herdsmen. Around dusk, after I've looked over my lands, I'll come to the city, and tomorrow morning
 



530








535












540








545










550
 
I'll set before you, as wages for your journey, An excellent feast of meat and fine wine."

Then godlike Theoclymenus put in:

 
"And where shall I go, dear child? To whose house, Of all those who are lords in rocky Ithaca?
Or should I go straight to yours and your mother's house?" And Telemachus, in his clear-headed way:
"Ordinarily I would say go to our house, For it has everything needed for hospitality. But it wouldn't work out for you right now
Since I'll be away, and my mother won't see you. She doesn't appear often before the suitors
But weaves at her loom in an upper chamber. I'll tell you, though, whom you can go to: Eurymachus, son of Polybus, whom now The Ithacans look to as if he were a god.
He's the best man and is the most eager To marry my mother and take over
My father's position. Only Olympian Zeus, High in the air, knows if their doom will come
Crashing down on them before any wedding day."

As he spoke a bird flew by on the right, A hawk, swift herald of Apollo, clutching
A dove in his talons, plucking her as he flew And shedding her feathers down to the ground
 

555











560








565








570










575
 
Between the ship and Telemachus himself. Theoclymenus called him aside
And, clasping his hand, said to him:

 
"Telemachus, that bird did not fly by on our right Without a god sending it. I knew when I saw it That it was a bird of omen. Your lineage
Is Ithaca's most royal. You will rule forever." And Telemachus, clear-headed and calm:
"Would that what you say come true, stranger. Then you would have from me such gifts
That whoever met you would call you blessed." Then he said to Peiraeus, his trusted companion:
"Peiraeus, you have always come through for me, And you went with me to Pylos. So now,
I ask you to show this stranger hospitality
In your house. Take good care of him until I come."

And Peiraeus, a spearman in his own right, said:

"Telemachus, no matter how long you stay out here, I'll take care of him and give him my hospitality."

Then Peiraeus boarded the ship and gave the order For the crew to board and untie the stern cables. They were soon at their places. Telemachus, though,
 

580











585











590











595
 
Put on his fine sandals, took his bronze-tipped spear From the ship's deck, and stood by as the crew Untied the cables and shoved off.
Then Odysseus' son Stepped out with swift strides until he reached
The farmstead where his countless swine were kept By a servant whose heart was loyal and true.
 



600
 

BOOK 16

Meanwhile, in the hut, Odysseus
And the noble swineherd had kindled a fire And were making breakfast in the early light. They had already sent the herdsmen out
With the droves of swine.	5
The dogs fawned Around Telemachus and did not bark at him As he approached. Odysseus noticed
The dogs fawning and heard footsteps. His words flew fast to Eumaeus:
"Eumaeus, one of your men must be coming,	10
Or at least someone you know. The dogs aren't barking And are fawning around him. I can hear his footsteps."

His words weren't out when his own son
Stood in the doorway. Up jumped the swineherd
In amazement, and from his hands fell the vessels	15
He was using to mix the wine. He went To greet his master, kissing his head And his shining eyes and both his hands.

And as a loving father embraces his own son
Come back from a distant land after ten long years,	20
His only son, greatly beloved and much sorrowed for—
 

So did the noble swineherd clasp Telemachus
And kiss him all over—he had escaped from death— And sobbing he spoke to him these winged words:

"You have come, Telemachus, sweet light!	25
I thought I would never see you again
After you left in your ship for Pylos. But come in, Dear child, let me feast my eyes on you
Here in my house, come back from abroad!
You don't visit the farm often, or us herdsmen,	30
But stay in town. It must do your heart good To look at that weeviling crowd of suitors."

And Telemachus, in his clear-headed way:

"Have it your way, Papa. But it's for your sake I've come,
To see you with my own eyes, and to hear from you	35
Whether my mother is still in our house, Or someone else has married her by now,
And Odysseus' bed, with no one to sleep in it, Has become a nest of spider webs."

The swineherd answered him:	40

"Yes, she's in your house, waiting and waiting With an enduring heart, poor soul,
Weeping away the lonely days and nights."

He spoke, and took the young man's spear.
 
Telemachus went in, and as he crossed	45
The stone threshold, Odysseus stood up To offer him his seat, but Telemachus,
From across the room, checked him and said:

"Keep your seat, stranger. We'll find another one
Around the place. Eumaeus here can do that."	50

He spoke, and Odysseus sat down again.
The swineherd piled up some green brushwood And covered it with a fleece, and upon this The true son of Odysseus sat down.
Then the swineherd set out platters of roast meat—	55
Leftovers from yesterday's meal—
And hurried around heaping up bread in baskets And mixing sweet wine in an ivy-wood bowl. Then he sat down opposite godlike Odysseus,
And they helped themselves to the fare before them.	60
When they had enough to eat and drink, Telemachus spoke to the godlike swineherd:

"Where did this stranger come from, Papa? What kind of sailors brought him to Ithaca?
I don't suppose he walked to our island."	65
And you answered, Eumaeus, my swineherd: "I'll tell you everything plainly, child.
He says he was born somewhere in Crete And that it has been his lot to be a roamer
 
And wander from city to city. But now	70
He has run away from a Thesprotian ship
And come to my farmstead. I put him in your hands. Do as you wish. He declares he is your suppliant."

And Telemachus, wise beyond his years:

"This makes my heart ache, Eumaeus.	75
How can I welcome this guest in my house?
I am still young, and I don't have the confidence To defend myself if someone picks a fight.
As for my mother, her heart is torn.
She can't decide whether to stay here with me	80
And keep the house, honoring her husband's bed And the voice of the people, or to go away
With whichever man among her suitors
Is the best of the Achaeans, and offers the most gifts.
But as to our guest—now that he's come to your house,	85
I will give him a tunic and cloak, fine clothes, And a two-edged sword, and sandals for his feet, And passage to wherever his heart desires.
Or keep him here if you wish, at your farmstead
And take care of him. I'll send the clothes	90
And all of his food, so it won't be a hardship For you or your men. What I won't allow
Is for him to come up there among the suitors. They are far too reckless and arrogant,
And I fear they will make fun of him, mock him,	95
And it would be hard for me to take that.
But what could I do? One man, however powerful,
 
Can't do much against superior numbers." Then Odysseus, who had borne much, said:
 
"My friend—surely it is right for me to speak up— It breaks my heart to hear you talk about
The suitors acting like this in your house
And going against the will of a man as great as you. It is against your will, isn't it? What happened?
Do the people up and down the land all hate you? Has a god turned them against you? Or do you blame Your brothers, whom a man has to rely upon
In a fight, especially if a big fight comes up? I wish I were as vigorous as I am angry,
Or were a son of flawless Odysseus, or Odysseus himself! Then I would put my neck on the chopping block
If I did not give them hell when I came into The halls of Odysseus, son of Laertes!
But if they overwhelmed me with superior numbers, I would rather be dead, killed in my own halls,
Than have to keep watching these disgraceful deeds, Strangers mistreated, men dragging the women Through the beautiful halls, wine spilled,
Bread wasted, and all with no end in sight." Telemachus answered in his clear-headed way:
"Well, stranger, I'll tell you the whole story. It's not that the people have turned against me, Nor do I have any brothers to blame. Zeus
 
100








105








110








115










120
 
Has made our family rim in a single line. Laertes was the only son of Arcesius, And Laertes had only one son, Odysseus, Who only had me, a son he never knew.
And so now our house is filled with enemies, All of the nobles who rule the islands— Dulichium, Same, wooded Zacynthus—
And all of those with power on rocky Ithaca Are courting my mother and ruining our house.
She neither refuses to make a marriage she hates Or is able to stop it. They are eating us
Out of house and home, and will come after me soon. But all of this rests on the knees of the gods.
Eumaeus, go tell Penelope right away That I'm safe and back from Pylos.
I'll wait for you here. Tell only her
And don't let any of the suitors find out. Many of them are plotting against me."
And you answered him, Eumaeus, my swineherd: "I follow you, Telemachus, I understand.
But tell me this. Should I go the same way
To Laertes also, and tell him the news?
Poor man, for a while he still oversaw the fields, Although he was grieving greatly for Odysseus,
And would eat and drink with the slaves in the house Whenever he had a notion. But now, since the very day You sailed to Pylos, they say he hasn't been
Eating or drinking as before, or overseeing the fields.
 



125








130








135








140











145








150
 
He just sits and groans, weeping his heart out, And the flesh is wasting away from his bones."

And Telemachus, in his clear-headed way:

 
"That's hard, but we will let him be, despite our pain. If mortals could have all their wishes granted,
We would choose first the day of my father's return. No, just deliver your message and come back,
And don't go traipsing all through the countryside Looking for Laertes. But tell my mother
To send the housekeeper as soon as she can, Secretly. She could bring the old man the message."

So the swineherd got going. He tied on his sandals And was off to the city.
 

155








160
 
The swineherd's departure Was not unnoticed by Athena. She approached
The farmstead in the likeness of a woman, Beautiful, tall, and accomplished in handiwork, And stood in the doorway of Eumaeus' hut, Showing herself to Odysseus. Telemachus
Did not see her before him or notice her presence, For the gods are not visible to everyone.
But Odysseus saw her, and the dogs did, too, And they did not bark, but slunk away whining To the other side of the farmstead. The goddess Lifted her brows, and Odysseus understood.
He went out of the hut, past the courtyard's great wall, And stood before her. Athena said to him:
 


165








170








175
 

 
"Son of Laertes in the line of Zeus,
Tell your son now and do not keep him in the dark, So that you two can plan the suitors' destruction And then go into town. As for myself,
I will not be gone long. No, I am eager for battle."

With this, she touched him with her golden wand. A fresh tunic and cloak replaced his rags,
And he was taller and younger, his skin tanned, His jawline firm, and his beard glossy black. Having worked her magic, the goddess left, And Odysseus went back into the hut.
His son was astounded. Shaken and flustered, He turned away his eyes for fear it was a god, And words fell from his lips in nervous flurries:

"You look different, stranger, than you did before, And your clothes are different, and your complexion. You must be a god, one of the immortals
Who hold high heaven. Be gracious to us So we can offer you acceptable sacrifice
And finely wrought gold. And spare us, please." And godlike Odysseus, who had borne much:
"I am no god. Why liken me to the deathless ones?
No, I am your father, on whose account you have suffered Many pains and endured the violence of men."
 





180










185








190










195











200
 
Saying this, he kissed his son, and let his tears Fall to the ground. He had held them in until now. But Telemachus could not believe
That this was his father, and he blurted out:

"You cannot be my father Odysseus. You must be some spirit, enchanting me Only to increase my grief and pain later.
No mortal man could figure out how to do this All on his own. Only a god could so easily Transform someone from old to young.
A while ago you were old and shabbily dressed,
And now you are like the gods who hold high heaven." And Odysseus, from his mind's teeming depths:
"Telemachus, it does not become you to be so amazed That your father is here in this house. You can be sure That no other Odysseus will ever come.
But I am here, just as you see, home at last After twenty years of suffering and wandering. So you will know, this is Athena's doing.
She can make me look like whatever she wants: A beggar sometimes, and sometimes a young man Wearing fine clothes. It's easy for the gods
To glorify a man or to make him look poor."

He spoke, and sat down. And Telemachus Threw his arms around his wonderful father And wept. And a longing arose in both of them
 






205










210











215








220










225
 
To weep and lament, and their shrill cries Crowded the air

 
like the cries of birds— Sea-eagles or taloned vultures—
Whose young chicks rough farmers have stolen Out of their nests before they were fledged.

Their tears were that piteous. And the sun,
Its light fading, would have set on their weeping, Had not Telemachus suddenly said to his father:

"What ship brought you here, Father,
And where did the crew say they were from? I don't suppose you came here on foot."
And Odysseus, the godlike survivor: "I'll tell you the truth about this, son.
The Phaeacians brought me, famed sailors Who give passage to all who come their way. They brought me over the sea as I slept
In their swift ship, and set me ashore on Ithaca With donations of bronze and clothing and gold, Splendid treasures that are now stored in caves By grace of the gods. I have come here now
At Athena's suggestion. You and I must plan How to kill our enemies. List them for me now So I can know who they are, and how many, And so I can weigh the odds and decide whether
 



230










235













240








245








250
 
You and I can go up against them alone Or whether we have to enlist some allies."

Telemachus took a deep breath and said:

 
"Father, look now, I know your great reputation,
How you can handle a spear and what a strategist you are, But this is too much for me. Two men
Simply cannot fight against such superior numbers And superior force. There are not just ten suitors,
Or twice that, but many times more. Here's the count: From Dulichium there are fifty-two—
The pick of their young men—and six attendants. From Same there are twenty-four,
From Zacynthus there are twenty,
And from Ithaca itself, twelve, all the noblest, And with them are Medon the herald,
The divine bard, and two attendants who carve. If we go up against all of them in the hall,
I fear your vengeance will be bitter indeed. Please try to think of someone to help us, Someone who would gladly be our ally."

And Odysseus, who had borne much:

"I'll tell you who will help. Do you think That Athena and her father, Zeus,
Would be help enough? Or should I think of more?"

Telemachus answered in his clear-headed way:
 

255








260








265








270











275
 

"You're talking about two excellent allies, Although they do sit a little high in the clouds
And have to rule the whole world and the gods as well."

 
And Odysseus, who had borne much:

"Those two won't hold back from battle for long. They'll be here, all right, when the fighting starts Between the suitors and us in my high-roofed halls. For now, go at daybreak up to the house,
And keep company with these insolent hangers-on. The swineherd will lead me to the city later Looking like an old, broken-down beggar.
If they treat me badly in the house, Just endure it. Even if they drag me
Through the door by my feet, or throw things at me, Just bear it patiently. Try to dissuade them,
Try to talk them out of their folly, sure, But they won't listen to you at all, Because their day of reckoning is near.
And here's something else for you to keep in mind: When Athena in her wisdom prompts me,
I'll give you a signal. When you see me nod, Take all the weapons that are in the hall
Into the lofted storeroom and stow them there. When the suitors miss them and ask you Where they are, set their minds at ease, saying: 'Oh, I have stored them out of the smoke.
They're nothing like they were when Odysseus
 

280










285








290








295








300
 
Went off to Troy, but are all grimed with soot. Also, a god put this thought into my head, That when you men are drinking, you might Start quarreling and someone could get hurt, Which would ruin your feasting and courting. Steel has a way of drawing a man to it.'
But leave behind a couple of swords for us, And two spears and oxhide shields—leave them Where we can get to them in a hurry.
Pallas Athena and Zeus in his cunning Will keep the suitors in a daze for a while.
And one more thing before you go.
If you are really my son and have my blood In your veins, don't let anyone know
That Odysseus is at home—not Laertes, Not the swineherd, not anyone in the house, Not even Penelope. You and I by ourselves
Will figure out which way the women are leaning. We'll test more than one of the servants, too,
And see who respects us and fears us,
And who cares nothing about either one of us And fails to honor you. You're a man now."

And Odysseus' resplendent son answered:

"You'll soon see what I'm made of, Father, And I don't think you'll find me lacking. But I'm not sure your plan will work
To our advantage. Think about it.
It'll take forever for you to make the rounds
 



305








310








315








320








325











330
 
Testing each man, while back in the house
The high-handed suitors are having a good time Eating their way through everything we own.
I agree you should find out which of the women Dishonor you, and which are innocent.
But as for testing the men in the fields, Let's do that afterward, if indeed you know
Something from Zeus, who holds the aegis."

While these two were speaking to each other, The sturdy ship that brought Telemachus
And his crew from Pylos was pulling in To Ithaca. They sailed into the deep harbor
And hauled the black ship up onto the shore. Porters in high spirits relieved them of their gear And carried the beautiful gifts to Clytius' house. They sent a herald ahead to Odysseus' palace
To tell Penelope that Telemachus
Was out in the country and had ordered the ship To sail on to the city so that she, the queen, Would not fall to weeping with worry.
So it happened that the swineherd and herald Met while they were bringing the same message
To Odysseus' wife. When they reached the palace, The herald spoke out in the women's presence:
"As of now, Lady, your son has returned." But the swineherd went up to Penelope
 






335










340








345








350








355
 
And told her all that her son had asked him to. His message delivered, he left the hall
And went through the courtyard and back to his swine.

This was bad news for the suitors.
They filed out of the hall and past the great wall Of the courtyard and sat down before the gates. Eurymachus, Polybus' son, was first to speak:

"Damn it! Telemachus has some nerve, Pulling off this voyage. We never thought We'd see it happen. Well, let's get a tarred ship Out on the water, the best we have, and a crew To man the oars and tell our men out at sea
To get back here as soon as they can."

He was still speaking when Amphinomus, Turning around, saw a ship in the harbor,
Sails being furled, the crew with oars in their hands. He chuckled softly and said to his companions:

"Well, so much for a message. Here they are. Either some god told them, or they spotted Telemachus' ship sailing by but couldn't catch her."

They trooped down to the shore and made quick work Of hauling the black ship onto the beach.
Attendants relieved the crew of their gear,
And the whole company went off to the assembly. They wouldn't allow anyone else, young or old,
 




360











365








370











375










380
 
To sit with them. Antinous rose to speak:

 
"Just look at how the gods have saved this man! Day after day watchmen sat on the windy heights, Relieving each other until the sun went down.
And we never spent the night on the shore
But were out at sea all night, waiting for dawn, Waiting for Telemachus, out for his blood— And now some god has delivered him home. We'll have to find a way to do him in here.
We can't let him slip through our hands again. As long as Telemachus is still alive
I don't like our odds in what we're trying to do. He's shrewd and he's smart, and the people Aren't on our side at all any more.
We have to act before he calls an assembly. I don't think he's going to let things slide. He's going to be angry, and he'll stand up And tell everyone how we plotted his death
But could not catch him. They won't approve When they hear of our crimes, and there's a danger They'll do something to us, drive us out
Of our land, and we'll wind up in exile. No, we have to beat him to it, jump him Out in the fields away from the city,
Or on the road. We'll keep all his possessions, Dividing them fairly among us. His house, though, We'll give to his mother and whoever weds her.
But if you don't like this plan, if you'd rather He stay alive and keep his ancestral wealth,
 



385








390








395








400








405








410
 
We shouldn't keep gathering here any more And devouring all this pleasant fare.
Each man will have to court her from his own house, Sending her gifts and trying to win her hand,
And she will marry the man who offers the most And comes to her as her fated husband."

He spoke, and they all sat there in silence Until Amphinomus stood up to speak.
Son of Nisus and grandson of Aretias,
He led the suitors who came from Dulichium, With its grassy meadows and rich wheatfields. Penelope liked him, for the way he spoke
And the good sense he showed, and now
He spoke to the suitors with good will to all:

"Friends, I would not willingly choose to kill Telemachus. It is a serious matter to murder Someone of royal stock. We should first consult The will of the gods. If great Zeus ordains it,
I will kill him myself, and urge on others.
But if the gods are against it, I urge you to stop."

Amphinomus' speech carried the day. The suitors Stood up and went back to Odysseus' house, Entered and sat on their polished chairs.

Penelope now had a notion to come out Among her overbearing, insolent suitors.
 






415










420








425










430












435
 
She had learned of the plot to kill her son
In his own house—the herald Medon told her After he overheard the suitors talking—
And so the beautiful lady came
Into the hall with her serving women. When she had come among the suitors She stood shawled in light by a column That supported the roof of the great house. Hiding her cheeks behind her silken veils, She spoke these harsh words to Antinous:

"Antinous, you are a haughty and evil man. They say you are the best of your generation In all of Ithaca in counsel and in speech,
But you don't measure up to your reputation. You must be mad. Plotting Telemachus' death! Don't you care at all that your father was once A suppliant here? Zeus witnesses this,
And it is unholy for suppliants and hosts To harm each other. Or haven't you heard Of the time your father came to this house
As a fugitive? The people were angry with him Because he had joined up with the Taphian pirates And harassed our allies, the Thesprotians.
The citizens wanted to beat him to death And gobble up his large and pleasant estate, But they were held in check by Odysseus. It is his house that you are now gobbling up
Without atonement, his wife you are wooing, His son you are trying to kill—and as for me,
 






440








445










450








455








460








465
 
You are causing me unspeakable distress. Stop it, I tell you, and tell the others to stop."

Then Eurymachus, son of Polybus, answered:

 
"Penelope, Icarius' wise daughter, Cheer up. Don't be so upset by all this.
There's not a man alive, nor will there ever be, Who will lay hands on your son, Telemachus, While I still breathe and look upon this earth. Anyone who tries, I give you my solemn assurance,
Will spill his black blood around the point of my spear. No, I, too, often sat on Odysseus' knees,
And the great hero would put roast meat in my hands And make me sip red wine. And so Telemachus
Is the dearest of all men to me, and I guarantee He need have no fear of death—from the suitors, That is. From the gods there is no avoiding it."

A heart-warming speech, but he was still planning To kill her son.
 



470








475








480
 
Penelope went upstairs To her softly lit rooms and wept for Odysseus, Her beloved husband, until grey-eyed Athena Cast sweet sleep upon the woman's eyelids.

Evening fell, and the swineherd came back To Odysseus and his son, who had slaughtered A yearling boar and were busy making supper.
 




485
 
Athena drew near to Odysseus and tapped him With her wand, making him into an old man again, Clothed in rags. She was afraid the swineherd
Would recognize him and, unable to keep the secret, Go bring the news to Penelope.

Telemachus looked up and said to the swineherd:

"You're back, Eumaeus. What news from town? Have the suitors returned from their ambush, Or are they still looking for me to sail past?"

And you answered him, Eumaeus, my swineherd:

"It wasn't my business to nose around town Asking about that, and I wanted to come back As soon as I had delivered my message.
On the way in, though, I met up with a herald Sent by your shipmates. He was fast
And got there first to tell your mother the news. I know one more thing, for I saw it myself.
I was above the city, by the hill of Hermes, On my way back, when I saw a sailing ship Pull into our harbor. She had a large crew
And was loaded with shields and bladed spears. I thought it was them, but I don't really know."

Telemachus smiled, feeling his ancestors' blood,
And glanced at Odysseus, avoiding the swineherd's eye When they had finished preparing the meal,
 

490










495













500








505








510
 
They fell to feasting. There was plenty for everyone, And when they all had enough of food and drink,
Their minds turned toward rest, and they took the gift of sleep.
 

515
 

BOOK 17

When Dawn brushed the early sky with rose Odysseus' son bound on his beautiful sandals And hefted his spear. He was in a hurry
To get to the city, and he said to his swineherd:

"I'm off to the town, Eumaeus. My mother	5
Won't stop crying until she sees me again, In person. But this is what I want you to do.
Take this down-and-out stranger into the city So that he can beg for food. Whoever wants to
Can give him some bread and a cup of water.	10
There's no way I can worry about everyone, I have too much on my mind. If the stranger Gets upset about this, it's just too bad.
I'm the sort of person who likes to talk straight."
And Odysseus, his mind teeming, said:	15

"Friend, don't think I'm eager myself
To be left behind here. For a beggar like me, It's better to beg for food in the town
Than out in the fields, and whoever wants to
Can give me something. I'm past the age	20
Where I can stay on a farm and have to do Everything some foreman tells me.
 
You go on. This man here will lead me to town As soon as I have warmed myself by the fire
And the sun is higher. These clothes I'm wearing	25
Are not so good, and the morning frost
Might do me in. You say the city is pretty far."

Thus Odysseus, and Telemachus strode quickly Out of the farmstead, sowing death for the suitors
With every step he took.	30
When he came to the house He leaned his spear against a tall pillar
And went in over the stone threshold.
Eurycleia
Spotted him first, as she was spreading fleeces Over finely wrought chairs. She burst into tears
And ran straight over to him. The other maids	35
Of Odysseus' household gathered around
And kissed his head and shoulders in welcome.

Then from her bedroom came wise Penelope, Looking like Artemis or golden Aphrodite.
She burst into tears and threw her arms around him	40
And kissed his head and both his shining eyes, And through her sobs spoke these winged words:

"You have come, Telemachus, sweet light! I thought I would never see you again
After you left in your ship for Pylos—	45
Behind my back—for news of your father.
But tell me, what did you find out about him?"
 

Telemachus answered her coolly:

"Don't make me weep, mother, or get me
All worked up. I barely escaped with my life.	50
Now bathe yourself and put on clean clothes, Then go to your bedroom upstairs with your maids And vow formal sacrifice to the immortal gods
In the hope that Zeus will grant us vengeance.
I'm going to town so I can invite to our house	55
A stranger who came here with me from Pylos. I sent him on ahead with some of my crew, And I told Peiraeus to take him home
And show him hospitality until I arrived."
Penelope's response to this died on her lips.	60
She bathed, and dressed herself in clean clothes, And vowed sacrifices to the immortal gods,
Praying that Zeus would grant them vengeance some day.

Telemachus went out through the hall
Holding a spear, two lean hounds at his side.	65
Athena shed a silver grace upon him,
And everyone marveled at him as he passed. The haughty suitors crowded around him,
Fine words on their lips, and evil in their hearts.
Telemachus slipped away from the throng	70
And went to sit down over to one side With Mentor, Antiphus, and Halitherses,
Old friends of his father. They wanted to know
 
Everything Telemachus had done. And then
Peiraeus came up, leading the stranger, Theoclymenus,	75
Up through the city to where the men were gathered. Telemachus did not keep his back to him long
But went up to the stranger, who was his guest. It was Peiraeus who spoke first, saying:
"Telemachus, get some women over to my house,	80
So I can send you the gifts Menelaus gave you." And Telemachus, in his clear-headed way:
"Peiraeus, we don't know how things will turn out. Should the suitors treacherously kill me at home
And divide among them my family's wealth,	85
I would rather that you keep all these gifts And enjoy them, rather than any of that crowd. But if I manage to sow the seeds of their death,
I'll be glad to have all of it back from you then."
Saying that, Telemachus led the stranger,	90
Who had endured much in life, to his house. They went inside and laid their cloaks on chairs, And then went into the polished tubs and bathed.
When the maids had bathed them and rubbed them
With oil, and flung upon them fleecy cloaks and tunics,	95
They came out of the baths and sat down on chairs. A maid poured water from a golden pitcher
Into a silver basin for them to wash their hands And then set up a polished table nearby.
 
Another serving woman, grave and dignified, Set out bread and generous helpings
From the other dishes she had.
Penelope
Sat opposite her son by the doorpost of the hall, Leaning back on a chair and spinning fine yarn.
The two men reached for the good cheer before them, And when they had their fill of food and drink, Penelope was the first to speak:

"Telemachus,
I think I will go now to my room upstairs
And lie down on my bed, which has become for me A sorrowful bed, ever wet with my tears
Since the day Odysseus left for Troy
With the sons of Atreus. You do not have the heart To tell me, before the suitors come in,
Whatever you have heard about your father's return." And Telemachus, in his clear-headed way:
"Rest assured I will tell you now, mother. We went to Pylos, and Nestor, the king there, Took me into his house. He welcomed me As a father might welcome his long-lost son,
And he put me up with his own glorious sons. But he said he had heard nothing from anyone About whether Odysseus was dead or alive. He sent me in a chariot to visit Menelaus, Atreus' son, and there I saw Helen,
 

100










105











110










115










120
 
For whose sake the Greek and Trojan armies Suffered so much, by the will of the gods. Then Menelaus asked me why I had come To gleaming Lacedaemon. I told him why, And this is exactly what he told me then:

'Those dogs! Those puny weaklings, Wanting to sleep in the bed of a hero!
A doe might as well bed her suckling fawns In the lair of a lion, leaving them there
In the bush and then going off over the hills Looking for grassy fields. When the lion Comes back, the fawns die an ugly death. That's the kind of death these men will die When Odysseus comes back. O Father Zeus, And Athena and Apollo, bring Odysseus back With the strength he showed in Lesbos once When he wrestled a match with Philomeleides And threw him hard, making all of us cheer— That's the Odysseus I want the suitors to meet! They'd get married all right—to bitter death. But, as to what you ask me about,
I will not stray from the point or deceive you. No, I will tell you all that the infallible
Old Man of the Sea told me, and hide nothing. He said he saw him on an island, miserable, In the halls of Calypso, who keeps him there Against his will. He has no way to get home To his native land. He has no ships left,
No crew to row him over the sea's broad back.'
 

125










130








135








140








145








150
 
Those were the words of Menelaus, Atreus' son, The great spearman. When I finished up there,
I set out for home, and a fair wind from the gods Brought me back quickly to my native land."

So he spoke, and his words wrung her heart. Then Theoclymenus made his voice heard:

"Revered lady, wife of Laertes' son, Odysseus, Menelaus is in the dark about all this, but now Hear what I have to say, for I will prophesy Unerringly to you and conceal nothing.
With Zeus above all gods as my witness, I swear, by this table of hospitality,
And by Odysseus' hearth, to which I have come, That this same Odysseus, mark my words,
Is at this moment in his own native land,
Sitting still or on the move, learning of this evil, And he is sowing evil for all the suitors.
Such is the bird of omen I saw
From the ship, and I cried it out to Telemachus." And Penelope, calm and circumspect:
"Ah, stranger, may your words come true.
Then you would know my kindness, and my gifts Would make you blessed in all men's eyes."

While they spoke to each other in this way, The suitors were entertaining themselves
 



155











160








165








170











175
 
In front of Odysseus' palace again, Throwing the javelin and discus
On the level terrace, arrogant as ever. When it was time for dinner, and the flocks Were coming in from the fields, Medon, Who was the suitors' favorite herald
And was always at their feasts, called out:

"Young men, now that you have enjoyed yourselves On the field, come inside so we can prepare a feast. Dinner at dinnertime is not a bad thing at all."

It didn't take much to persuade them. Up they rose And filed into the stately house. They laid their cloaks On the chairs, and some of them got busy Slaughtering great sheep and plump goats,
Fattened hogs, too, and a heifer of the herd.

While they were making their dinner, Odysseus And the noble swineherd were getting ready
To go up from the fields to the city. The swineherd started off by saying:

"Well, stranger, since you're eager to go To the city today, as my master ordered—
Although for my part I'd rather have you here To mind the farm, but I do respect him
And fear him, and I certainly don't want
A tongue-lashing from him, which could go hard—
 



180








185











190










195










200
 
Anyway, we'd better get going. It's late
In the day, and it'll be colder toward evening." And Odysseus, his mind teeming:
"No need to tell me that. I understand. Let's go. You lead the way, all the way. But, if you have one cut, give me a staff
To lean on. You said the trail was slippery."

He spoke, and threw around his shoulders His ratty pouch, full of holes and slung
By a twisted cord. Eumaeus gave him a staff That suited him, and the two of them set out. The dogs and the herdsmen stayed behind
To guard the farmstead. And so the swineherd Led his master to the city, looking like
An old, broken-down beggar, leaning On a staff and dressed in miserable rags.

They were well along the rugged path
And near to the city when they came to a spring Where the townspeople got their water.
This beautiful fountain had been made By Ithacus, and Neritus, and Polyctor. A grove of poplars encircled it
And the cold water flowed from the rock above, On top of which was built an altar to the nymphs, Where all wayfarers made offerings.
There
 



205











210










215










220








225
 
Melanthius, son of Dolius, met them
As he was driving his she-goats, the best
In the herds, into town for the suitors' dinner. Two herdsmen trailed along behind him.
When he saw Eumaeus and his companion, He greeted them with language so ugly
It made Odysseus' blood boil to hear it:

"Well, look at this, trash dragging along trash. Birds of a feather, as usual. Where
Are you taking this walking pile of shit,
You miserable hog-tender, this diseased beggar Who will slobber all over our feasts?
How many doorposts has he rubbed with his shoulders, Begging for scraps? You think he's ever gotten
A proper present, a cauldron or sword? Ha!
Give him to me and I'll have him sweep out the pens And carry loads of shoots for the goats to eat,
Put some muscle on his thigh by drinking whey. I'll bet he's never done a hard day's work in his life. No, he prefers to beg his way through town
For food to stuff into his bottomless belly.
I'll tell you this, though, and you can count on it. If he comes to the palace of godlike Odysseus, He'll be pelted with footstools aimed at his head. If he's lucky they'll only splinter on his ribs."

And as he passed Odysseus, the fool kicked him On the hip, trying to shove him off the path.
Odysseus absorbed the blow without even quivering—
 



230








235










240








245








250










255
 
Only stood there and tried to decide whether
To jump the man and knock him dead with his staff
Or lift him by the ears and smash his head to the ground. In the end, he controlled himself and just took it.
But the swineherd looked the man in the eye And told him off, and lifted his hands in prayer:

"Nymphs of the spring, daughters of Zeus, If Odysseus ever honored you by burning
Thigh bones of lambs and kids wrapped in rich fat, Grant me this prayer:
 






260










265
 
May my master come back, May some god guide him back!
Then,
He would scatter all that puffery of yours, All the airs you put on strutting around town While bad herdsmen destroy all the flocks."

Melanthius, the goatherd, came back with this:

"Listen to the dog talk, with his big, bad notions. I'm going to take him off in a black ship someday Far from Ithaca, and sell him for a fortune.
You want my prayer? May Apollo with his silver bow Strike Telemachus dead today in his halls,
Or may the suitors kill him, as surely as Odysseus Is lost for good in some faraway land."

He left them with that. They walked on slowly, While the goatherd pushed ahead and came quickly
 









270











275










280
 
To the palace. He went right in and sat down Among the suitors, opposite Eurymachus, Whom he liked best of all. The servers
Set out for him a helping of meat,
And the grave housekeeper brought him bread.

Odysseus and the swineherd came up to the house And halted. The sound of the hollow lyre
Drifted out to them, for Phemius
Was sweeping the strings as he began his song. Odysseus took the swineherd's hand and said:

"Eumaeus, this beautiful house must be Odysseus'. It would stand out anywhere. Look at all the rooms
And stories, and the court built with wall and coping, And the well-fenced double gates. No one could scorn it. And I can tell there are many men feasting inside
From the savor of meat wafting out from it,
And the sound of the lyre, which rounds out a feast." And you answered him, swineherd Eumaeus:
"You don't miss a thing, do you? Well, Let's figure out what we should do here.
Either you go in first and mingle with the suitors, While I wait here; or you wait here,
If you'd rather, and I'll go in before you.
But don't wait long, or someone might see you And either throw something at you or smack you. Think it over. What would you like to do?"
 








285










290










295











300








305
 

And Odysseus, the godlike survivor:

 
"I understand. You don't have to prompt me. You go in before me, and I'll wait here.
I've had things thrown at me before, And I have an enduring heart, Eumaeus.
God knows I've had my share of suffering
At war and at sea. I can take more if I have to. But no one can hide a hungry belly.
It's our worst enemy. It's why we launch ships To bring war to men across the barren sea."

And as they talked, a dog that was lying there Lifted his head and pricked up his ears.
This was Argus, whom Odysseus himself Had patiently bred—but never got to enjoy— Before he left for Ilion. The young men
Used to set him after wild goats, deer, and hare. Now, his master gone, he lay neglected
In the dung of mules and cattle outside the doors, A deep pile where Odysseus' farmhands
Would go for manure to spread on his fields. There lay the hound Argus, infested with lice. And now, when he sensed Odysseus was near, He wagged his tail and dropped both ears
But could not drag himself nearer his master. Odysseus wiped away a tear, turning his head So Eumaeus wouldn't notice, and asked him:
 





310








315










320








325








330
 
"Eumaeus, isn't it strange that this dog
Is lying in the dung? He's a beautiful animal, But I wonder if he has speed to match his looks,
Or if he's like the table dogs men keep for show." And you answered him, Eumaeus, my swineherd:
"Ah yes, this dog belonged to a man who has died Far from home. He was quite an animal once.
If he were now as he was when Odysseus Left for Troy, you would be amazed
At his speed and strength. There's nothing In the deep woods that dog couldn't catch, And what a nose he had for tracking!
But he's fallen on hard times, now his master Has died abroad. These feckless women
Don't take care of him. Servants never do right When their masters aren't on top of them.
Zeus takes away half a man's worth The day he loses his freedom."

So saying, Eumaeus entered the great house
And the hall filled with the insolent suitors.
But the shadow of death descended upon Argus, Once he had seen Odysseus after twenty years.

Godlike Telemachus spotted the swineherd first Striding through the hall, and with a nod of his head
 




335











340








345








350














355
 
Signaled him to join him. Eumaeus looked around And took a stool that lay near, one that the carver Ordinarily sat on when he sliced meat for the suitors Dining in the hall. Eumaeus took this stool
And placed it at Telemachus' table, opposite him, And sat down. A herald came and served him
A portion of meat, and bread from the basket.

Soon after, Odysseus came in, looking like An old, broken-down beggar, leaning
On a staff and dressed in miserable rags. He sat down on the ashwood threshold Just inside the doors, leaning back
On the cypress doorpost, a post planed and trued By some skillful carpenter in days gone by.
Telemachus called the swineherd over
And taking a whole loaf from the beautiful basket And all the meat his hands could hold, said to him:

"Take this over to the stranger, and tell him
To go around and beg from each of the suitors. Shame is no good companion for a man in need."

Thus Telemachus. The swineherd nodded, And going over to Odysseus, said to him:

"Telemachus gives you this, and he tells you To go around and beg from each of the suitors. Shame, he says, is not good for a beggar."
 






360










365








370










375











380
 
And Odysseus, his mind teeming:

"Lord Zeus, may Telemachus be blessed among men And may he have all that his heart desires."

 
And he took the food in both his hands
And set it down at his feet on his beggar's pouch. Odysseus ate as long as the bard sang in the hall. When the song came to an end, and the suitors Began to be noisy and boisterous, Athena
Drew near to him and prompted him
To go among the suitors and beg for crusts And so learn which of them were decent men
And which were scoundrels—not that the goddess had The slightest intention of sparing any of them.

Odysseus made his rounds from right to left, Stretching his hands out to every side,
As if he had been a beggar all his life.
They all pitied him and gave him something, And they wondered out loud who he was
And where he had come from. To which questions Melanthius, the goatherd, volunteered:

"Hear me, suitors of our noble queen.
As to this stranger, I have seen him before. The swineherd brought him here, but who he is
I have no idea, or where he claims he was born."

At this, Antinous tore into the swineherd:
 

385








390










395








400










405
 

 
"Swineherd! Why did you bring this man to town? Don't we have enough tramps around here without him, This nuisance of a beggar who will foul our feast?
I suppose you don't care that these men are eating away Your master's wealth, or you wouldn't have invited him."
The swineherd Eumaeus came back with this: "You may be a fine gentleman, Antinous,
But that's an ugly thing to say. Who, indeed,
Ever goes out of his way to invite a stranger From abroad, unless it's a prophet, or healer,
Or a builder, or a singer of tales—someone like that, A master of his craft who benefits everyone.
Men like that get invited everywhere on earth. But who would burden himself with a beggar? You're just plain mean, the meanest of the suitors To Odysseus' servants, and especially to me.
But I don't care, as long as my lady Penelope Lives in the hall, and godlike Telemachus."

To which Telemachus responded coolly:

"Quiet! Don't waste your words on this man. Antinous is nasty like that—provoking people With harsh words and egging them on."

And then he had these fletched words for Antinous:
 







410











415








420










425
 
"Why, Antinous, you're just like a father to me, Kindly advising me to kick this stranger out. God forbid that should ever happen. No,
Go ahead and give him something. I want you to. Don't worry about my mother or anyone else
In this house, when it comes to giving things away. But the truth is that you're just being selfish
And would rather eat more yourself than give any away." And Antinous answered him:
"What a high and mighty speech, Telemachus! Look now, if only everyone gave him what I will, It would be months before he darkened your door."

As he spoke he grabbed the stool upon which He propped his shining feet whenever he dined And brandished it beneath the table.
But all the rest gave the beggar something And filled his pouch with bread and meat.
And Odysseus would have had his taste of the suitors Free of charge, but on his way back to the threshold He stopped by Antinous' place and said:

"Give me something, friend. You don't look like You are the poorest man here—far from it— But the most well off. You look like a king.
So you should give me more than the others.
If you did, I'd sing your praises all over the earth. I, too, once had a house of my own, a rich man
 

430








435











440










445










450








455
 
In a wealthy house, and I gave freely and often To any and everyone who wandered by.
I had slaves, too, more than I could count, And everything I needed to live the good life. But Zeus smashed it all to pieces one day— Who knows why?—when he sent me out With roving pirates all the way to Egypt
So I could meet my doom.
I moored my ships
In the river Nile, and you can be sure I ordered My trusty mates to stand by and guard them While I sent out scouts to look around.
Then the crews got cocky and overconfident And started pillaging the Egyptian countryside, Carrying off the women and children
And killing the men. The cry came to the city, And at daybreak troops answered the call.
The whole plain was filled with infantry, War chariots, and the glint of bronze.
Thundering Zeus threw my men into a panic, And not one had the courage to stand and fight Against odds like that. It was bad.
They killed many of us outright with bronze And led the rest to their city to work as slaves.
But they gave me to a friend of theirs, from Cyprus, To take me back there and give me to Dmetor,
Son of Iasus, who ruled Cyprus with an iron hand. From there I came here, with all my hard luck."

Antinous had this to say in reply:
 








460










465








470








475








480
 

 
"What god has brought this plague in here? Get off to the side, away from me,
Or I'll show you Egypt and Cyprus,
You pushy panhandler! You don't know your place. You make your rounds and everyone
Hands things out recklessly. And why shouldn't they? It's easy to be generous with someone else's wealth."

Odysseus took a step back and answered him:

"It's too bad your mind doesn't match your good looks. You wouldn't give a suppliant even a pinch of salt
If you had to give it from your own cupboard. Here you sit at another man's table
And you can't bear to give me a piece of bread From the huge pile that's right by your hand."

This made Antinous even angrier, And he shot back with a dark scowl:

"That does it. I'm not going to let you just Breeze out of here if you're going to insult me."

As he spoke he grabbed the footstool and threw it, Hitting Odysseus under his right shoulderblade. Odysseus stood there as solid as a rock
And didn't even blink. He only shook his head In silence, and brooded darkly
Then he went back to the threshold and sat down
 



485








490











495











500










505
 
With his pouch bulging and spoke to the suitors:

 
"Hear me, suitors of our glorious queen, So I can speak my mind. No one regrets
Being hit while fighting for his own possessions, His cattle or sheep. But Antinous struck me Because of my belly, that vile growling beast That gives us so much trouble. If there are gods For beggars, or avenging spirits,
May death come to Antinous before marriage does." Antinous, son of Eupeithes, answered:
"Just sit still and eat, stranger—or get the hell out. Keep talking like this and some of the young men here Will haul you by the feet all through the house
And strip the skin right off your back."

Thus Antinous. But the other suitors Turned on him, one of them saying:

"That was foul, Antinous, hitting a poor beggar. You're done for if he turns out to be a god Come down from heaven, the way they do, Disguised as strangers from abroad or whatever, Going around to different cities
And seeing who's lawless and who lives by the rules."

Antinous paid no attention to this.
Telemachus took it hard that his father was struck
 



510








515











520











525










530
 
But he kept it inside. Not a tear
Fell from his eye. He only shook his head In silence, and brooded darkly.

 
When Penelope, sitting with her maids, Heard the stranger had been struck, she said:

"So may you be struck by the Archer God." And Eurynome, the housekeeper, said to her:
"If our prayers were answered, not one of these men Would live to see Dawn take her seat in the sky."

Penelope answered in her circumspect way:

"They're all hateful, nurse, for their evil designs, But Antinous is like black death itself.
Some poor stranger makes his rounds through the house Begging alms from the men because he is in need,
And all the others fill his pouch with gifts, But Antinous throws a footstool at him
And hits him in the back beneath his shoulder."

Thus Penelope, sitting with her women, While noble Odysseus ate his dinner.
Then she called the swineherd to her and said:

"Noble Eumaeus, tell the stranger to come here So that I can greet him and ask him if perhaps
 

535













540











545










550
 
He has heard anything about Odysseus
Or seen him with his own eyes. By his looks He is a man who has wandered the world."
And you, my swineherd, answered her: "I wish the men would keep quiet, Lady,
For his speech could charm your very soul. Three nights I had him with me, and three days
I kept him in my hut, for it was to me he first came When he jumped ship—but he still did not finish The long story of all his hard times.
It was just as when men gaze at a bard
Who sings to them songs learned from the gods, Bittersweet songs, and they could listen forever— That's how he charmed me when he sat in my house. He says he's an ancestral friend of Odysseus,
And that he comes from Crete, the land of Minos. It was from Crete he came here, on a hard journey That gets ever harder as he wanders on
Like a rolling stone. He insists he has news That Odysseus is near, over in Thesprotia,
Alive and well, and bringing many treasures home." And Penelope, calm and circumspect:
"Go call him here, so he can tell me face to face. As for these men, let them play their games outside Or here in the house. They're in a good mood,
As well they might be, their own possessions
 



555











560








565








570










575
 
Lying safe at home, their bread and sweet wine Feeding only their servants, while they themselves Mob our house day after day, slaughtering
All our oxen, our sheep and fat goats, Partying and recklessly drinking our wine, Ruining everything. For there is no man here Like Odysseus to protect this house.
But if Odysseus should ever come home,
He and his son would make them pay for this outrage."

Just as she finished, Telemachus sneezed, A loud sneeze that rang through the halls. Penelope laughed and said to Eumaeus:

"Go ahead and call the stranger for me! Didn't you see my son sneeze at my words?
That means death will surely come to the suitors, One and all. Not a single man will escape.
And one more thing—what do you think of this? If I find that he speaks everything truly,
I'll clothe him in a handsome tonic and cloak."

The swineherd took this all in. He went over To Odysseus, and his words flew fast:

"Penelope, Telemachus' mother, Wants to see you. Her heart urges her,
For all her pain, to ask you about her husband. If she finds that you speak everything truly, She will give you a handsome tunic and cloak,
 

580








585










590










595










600










605
 
Which you really do need. As for your belly, You'll still have to fill it by public begging."

And Odysseus, who had borne much:

 
"Eumaeus, I will soon be telling the whole truth To Penelope, Icarius' wise daughter.
For I know Odysseus very well,
And he and I have been through much the same grief. But I'm leery of this mob of rough suitors,
Whose arrogance grates on the sky's iron dome. Just now as I was making my way through the hall, Not doing any harm to anyone, this man
Struck me—hard—and neither Telemachus Nor anyone else did anything to stop him.
So please ask Penelope, for all her eagerness, To wait in the hall until the sun goes down. Then she can ask me about her husband's return.
And she can seat me nearer the fire. These clothes I have on are not very good, as you should know, For it was to you first I came as a suppliant."

When he heard this the swineherd went off,
And when he crossed the threshold Penelope said:

"You're not bringing him with you, Eumaeus. What does he mean by this? Does he fear someone
More than he should, or is there something else here That makes him hang back? A shy beggar's a poor one."
 



610








615








620










625










630
 
And you answered her, Eumaeus, my swineherd:

 
"What he says is right, as anyone would agree, About avoiding the violence of arrogant men. He asks you to wait until the sun goes down. And it would be far seemlier for you too, Lady, If you and the stranger had your talk in private."

Penelope answered in her circumspect way:

"Our guest is no fool. He sees what could happen. These men are bent on senseless violence,
More than any mortal men I can imagine."

Thus Penelope, and the godlike swineherd, Having said his piece to her, went off
Into the throng of suitors. He found Telemachus, And with his head close to him so no one could hear, He spoke to him these feathered words:

"I am going off now, dear Telemachus, To guard the swine and all—
Your livelihood and mine. You take charge Of everything here. Take care of yourself, First and foremost, and be on the lookout So you don't get hurt. Many of these men Are up to no good. May Zeus destroy them Utterly, before any harm can come to us."

And Telemachus, in his cool-headed way:
 







635











640










645










650
 

 
"Amen to that. Go after supper. But at dawn Come back with your best boars for sacrifice. Everything here is up to me, and the gods."

So the swineherd sat down again on a polished chair. When he had eaten and drunk to his heart's content, He went off to his swine, leaving the courts and hall Full of banqueters. They were singing and dancing And having a good time, for it was evening now.
 

655










660
 

BOOK 18

And now there came the town beggar Making his rounds, known throughout Ithaca For his greedy belly and endless bouts
Of eating and drinking. He had no real strength
Or fighting power—just plenty of bulk.	5
Arnaeus was the name his mother had given him, But the young men all called him Irus
Because he was always running errands for someone. He had a mind to drive Odysseus out of his own house
And started in on him with words like this:	10
"Out of the doorway, geezer, before I throw you out On your ear! Don't you see all these people Winking at me to give you the bum's rush?
I wouldn't want to stoop so low, but if you don't
Get out now, I may have to lay hands on you."	15

Odysseus gave him a measured look and said:

"What's wrong with you? I'm not doing
Or saying anything to bother you. I don't mind
If someone gives you a handout, even a large one.
This doorway is big enough for both of us.	20
There's no need for you to be jealous of others. Now look, you're a vagrant, just like I am.
 
Prosperity is up to the gods. But if I were you,
I'd be careful about challenging me with your fists.
I might get angry, and old man though I am,	25
I just might haul off and bust you in the mouth. I'd have more peace and quiet tomorrow.
I don't think you'd come back a second time To the hall of Laertes' son, Odysseus."
This got Irus angry, and he answered:	30

"Listen to the mangy glutton run on,
Like an old kitchen woman! I'll fix him good— Hit him with a left and then a right until
I knock his teeth out onto the ground,
The way we'd do a pig caught eating the crops.	35
Put 'em up, and everybody will see how we fight. How are you going to stand up to a younger man?"

That's how they goaded each other on There on the great polished threshold.
Antinous took this in and said with a laugh:	40

"How about this, friends? We haven't had This much fun in a long time. Thank God
For a little entertainment! The stranger and Irus
Are getting into a fight. Let's have them square off!"

They all jumped up laughing and crowded around	45
The two tattered beggars. And Antinous said:
 
"Listen, proud suitors, to my proposal. We've got these goat paunches on the fire, Stuffed with fat and blood, ready for supper.
Whichever of the two wins and proves himself	50
The better man, gets the stuffed paunch of his choice. Furthermore, he dines with us in perpetuity
And to the exclusion of all other beggars."

Everyone approved of Antinous' speech.
Then Odysseus, who knew all the moves, said:	55

"Friends, there's no way a broken-down old man Can fight with a younger. Still, my belly,
That troublemaker, urges me on. So,
I'll just have to get beat up. But all of you,
Swear me an oath that no one, favoring Irus,	60
Will foul me and beat me for him."

They all swore that they wouldn't hit him, And then Telemachus, feeling his power, said:

"Stranger, if you have the heart for this fight,
Don't worry about the onlookers. If anyone	65
Strikes you, he will have to fight us all.
I guarantee this as your host, and I am joined By Antinous and Eurymachus,
Lords and men of discernment both."

Everyone praised this speech.	70
Then Odysseus
 
Tied his rags around his waist, revealing His sculpted thighs, his broad shoulders, His muscular chest and arms. Athena Stood near the hero, magnifying his build.
The suitors' jaws dropped open.	75
They looked at each other and said things like:
"Irus is history."
"Brought it on himself, too."
"Will you look at the thigh on that old man!"
So they spoke. Irus' heart was in his throat,
But some servants tucked up his clothes anyway	80
And dragged him out, his rolls of fat quivering. Antinous laid into him, saying:

"You big slob. You'll be sorry
You were ever born, if you try to duck
This woebegone, broken-down old man.	85
I'm going to give it to you straight now. If he gets the better of you and beats you, I'm going to throw you on a black ship
And send you to the mainland to King Echetus,
The maimer, who will slice off your nose and ears	90
With cold bronze, and tear out your balls And give them raw to the dogs to eat."

This made Irus tremble even more. They shoved him out into the middle,
And both men put up their fists. Odysseus,	95
 
The wily veteran, thought it over.
Should he knock the man stone cold dead,
Or ease up on the punch and just lay him out flat? Better to go easy and just flatten him, he thought, So that the crowd won't get suspicious.
The fighters stood tall, circling each other,
And as Irus aimed a punch at his right shoulder, Odysseus caught him just beneath the ear, Crushing his jawbone. Blood ran from his mouth, And he fell in the dust snorting like an ox
And gnashing his teeth, his heels kicking the ground. The suitors lifted their hands and died
With laughter. Odysseus took Irus by one fat foot And dragged him out through the doorway
All the way to the court and the portico's gates. He propped him up against the courtyard's wall, Stuck his staff in his hand, and said to him:

"Sit there now and scare off the pigs and dogs, And stop lording it over the other beggars, You sorry bastard, or things could get worse."

And he slung his old pouch over one shoulder, Walked back to the threshold, and sat down. The suitors went inside, laughing and joking, And one of them came up to Odysseus and said:

"May Zeus and the other gods grant you, stranger, Whatever your heart most dearly desires,
Since you have ended this glutton's begging career.
 








100








105








110










115











120
 
We'll ship him off to Echetus the maimer!"

 
Odysseus took heart at these auspicious words. Antinous set before him the huge paunch Stuffed with fat and blood, and Amphinomus Served him a couple of loaves from the basket, Toasted him with a golden cup, and said:

"Hail to the revered stranger. May good fortune Come to you, though you have only bad luck now."

And Odysseus, from his mind's teeming depths:

"Amphinomus, you come across as a sensible man, Just as your father was. I have heard of him,
Nisus of Dulichium, a good man, and wealthy, Known far and wide. They say you are his son, And you seem soft-spoken, a good man yourself. So I'll tell you something you should take to heart. Of all the things that breathe and move upon it, Earth nurtures nothing feebler than man.
While the gods favor him and his step is quick, He thinks he will never have to suffer in life. Then when the blessed ones bring evil his way, He bears it in sorrow with an enduring heart. Our outlook changes with the kind of day Zeus our Father decides to give us.
I, too, once got used to prosperity,
And I did many foolish things in my pride, Trusting my father and brothers would save me.
 



125










130











135








140








145
 
So I know a man should never be an outlaw, But keep in peace the gifts heaven gives him. Just look at what the suitors are doing now, Wasting the wealth and dishonoring the wife Of a man who, I tell you, will not be gone long
From his family and friends and his native land. He's very close. Better for you if some god Leads you away from here and takes you home Before you meet him upon his return.
Once he's under this roof, I do not think
The suitors will escape without blood being spilled."

He spoke, poured a libation, drank the sweet wine, And then gave the cup back to Amphinomus,
Who went away through the hall with his head bowed And his heart heavy with a sense of foreboding.
He would not escape death, though. Pallas Athena Had him pinned, and he would be killed outright By a spear from the hand of Telemachus.

And now the Grey-eyed One put into the heart Of Penelope, Icarius' wise daughter,
A notion to show herself to the suitors.
All of a sudden she wanted to make their blood pound— And to make herself more worthy than ever
In the eyes of her son, and of her husband.
With a whimsical laugh she said to the housekeeper:

"Eurynome, my heart longs, though it never has before,
 



150








155










160








165










170
 
To show myself to the suitors, hateful as they are. And I would like to say something to my son, Something that might help him—he should not Continually keep the company of the suitors, Overbearing men who speak politely to his face And plan all the while to hurt him later."

And the housekeeper Eurynome said:

"Yes indeed, child, everything you said is right. Go on then, and speak your mind to your son And don't hide anything—after you have bathed, That is, and dabbed your cheeks with ointment. Don't go like this, bleary-eyed from crying.
All this grieving only makes you look worse.
Your son is that age, you know. You prayed your heart out For the gods to let you see him as a bearded man."

And Penelope, in her circumspect way:

"Eurynome, don't try, even though you love me, To talk me into bathing and putting on makeup. Any beauty I had the Olympian gods destroyed On the day my husband left in the hollow ships. But go tell Autonoë and Hippodameia
To come stand by my side when I enter the hall.
It would be shameful for me to go alone among men."

She spoke, and the old housekeeper went off To tell the two women Penelope wanted them.
 

175








180











185










190










195
 

 
Athena's eyes glinted. She had another idea. First, she made Penelope so sweetly drowsy That she leaned back, her whole body limp, And went to sleep right there on her couch.
Then the shimmering goddess went to work on her, So that all the men would gape in wonder.
First she cleansed her lovely face, using The pure, distilled Beauty that Aphrodite
Anoints herself with when she goes garlanded Into the beguiling dance of the Graces.
Then she made her look taller, and filled out her figure, And made her skin whiter than polished ivory.
Her work done, the goddess glimmered away. Just then, some of the women came by, Talking noisily, and Penelope woke up.
She rubbed her cheeks with her hands and said:

"What a soft, sweet sleep! If only Artemis Would send as soft a death to me at once So I would no longer waste away in sorrow,
Longing for my dear husband's winning ways. He was in all ways the very best of men."

She spoke. Light from the upper rooms Flooded the stairs as Penelope came down, Not alone, two maids trailed behind— And when she had come among the suitors She stood in her glory beside a column That supported the roof of the great house,
 

200








205








210








215










220










225
 
Hiding her cheeks behind her silken veils, Grave handmaidens standing on either side.
The suitors' knees grew weak when they saw her. They were spellbound, in love, and each man prayed That he would lie beside her in bed, But,
It was to her son, Telemachus, that she spoke:

"Telemachus, what can you be thinking of? You were intelligent even as a child,
But now that you have reached manhood— So handsome and tall that any stranger
Who happened to see you would be able to tell You're a rich man's son—you're not thinking straight, Not any more. Just look at what has happened
Here in these halls! How would you like it If our guest, sitting as he is in our house,
Were to be treated roughly and come to harm?
It would be a disgrace, and the shame would be yours." And Telemachus, in his clear-headed way:
"I don't blame you for being angry, Mother, But I'm aware of all this myself. I know Everything that is going on here, good and bad. I used to think as a child, but not any more.
But I can't think clearly with all these men Sitting around driving me to distraction. They don't mean me any good, and I have No one to help me. But I can tell you this, That the fight between the stranger and Irus
 






230










235








240











245








250
 
Did not go the way the suitors wanted. Our guest proved to be the better man. O Father Zeus, and Athena and Apollo, If only the suitors were beaten like that,
Their limbs unstrung, nodding their heads, Some in the courtyard and some in the hall, Just as Irus now sits by the gate,
Lolling his head as if he were drunk, Unable to stand up or get himself home,
Wherever that is, because his limbs are like putty."

Thus mother and son. Then Eurymachus Addressed Penelope, saying to her:

"Daughter of Icarius, wise Penelope,
If all the Greeks throughout the mainland Could see you now, even more suitors
Would be here tomorrow, feasting in your hall, For you are far and away the most beautiful And most intelligent woman in the world."

And wise Penelope answered him:

"Eurymachus, the gods destroyed my beauty On the day when the Argives sailed for Ilion And with them went my husband, Odysseus. If he were to come back and be part of my life,
My fame would be greater and more resplendent. But now I grieve, so many sorrows
Has some spirit visited upon me.
 



255








260










265










270











275
 
And this much is true: when Odysseus left
He clasped my right hand in his and said to me: 'I do not think, my wife, that all the Greeks Will return from Ilion safe and sound.
They say the Trojans are real warriors, Spearmen and bowmen, and they drive chariots, Which can turn the tide in any battle.
So I do not know whether the god of war Will send me back or if I'll go down
There in Troy. So everything here is in your hands. Take care of my father and of my mother
As you do now, or even more, when I am gone. But when you see our son a bearded man, Marry whom you will, and leave this house.' So he spoke, and it's all coming true.
There will come a night when a hateful marriage Will darken my bed, cursed as I am, my happiness Destroyed by Zeus. And I have more heartache. This isn't the way suitors usually behave
When men compete for the hand of a lady,
A woman of some worth, a rich man's daughter. They bring cattle, and fat sheep,
To feast the bride's friends, and they give her Glorious gifts. They do not devour Another's livelihood without recompense."

She spoke, and Odysseus, the godlike survivor, Smiled inwardly to see how she extracted gifts From the suitors, weaving a spell upon them
With her words, while her mind was set elsewhere.
 

280








285








290








295








300










305
 

Then Antinous, Eupeithes' son, said to her:

 
"Daughter of Icarius, wise Penelope,
As far as gifts go, take whatever any man Wishes to give. It's not good to refuse gifts. But as for us, we're not going back to our lands Or anywhere else until you marry
Whoever proves to be the best of the Achaeans."

Everyone approved of what Antinous said, And each man sent a herald to fetch his gifts. Antinous' man brought a beautiful robe,
All embroidered. It had twelve golden brooches, Each of them fitted with hooked clasps.
Eurymachus' man came back right away With an intricately crafted golden chain Strung with amber and bright as the sun.
Eurydamas' attendants brought a pair of earrings, Three elegant teardrops gleaming from each.
From the house of Peisander, Polyctor's son, There came a necklace of exquisite beauty. And so it went, each man bringing
One lovely gift after another.

And Penelope,
A moving silver grace, went up to her chamber, Her women behind her bearing the beautiful gifts.

The suitors turned to amusing themselves
 

310








315










320








325











330
 
With dance and song until evening fell. When twilight shaded their merrymaking They set up three braziers in the great hall
To give them light. They stoked these with kindling, Seasoned and dry and newly split with the axe.
They set torches between the braziers,
And the household women set about lighting them. Zeus-bred Odysseus, always thinking,
Went up to these women and had a word with them:

"Maidservants of Odysseus, your long-absent lord, Go off now to where your revered queen is sitting And do your spinning, or card wool, by her side. Sit with her and keep her company. Cheer her up. I'll take care of keeping the torches lit
For these men. Even if they stay up until dawn They won't outlast me. I can put up with a lot."

The women looked at each other and laughed. Then Melantho, fair-cheeked and sassy,
Had some ugly words for him. This Melantho Was born to Dolius, but Penelope
Had reared her as her very own child,
Spoiling her with toys and whatever she wanted. Even so she had no feeling for Penelope
But loved Eurymachus and slept with him. And now she lit into Odysseus:

"You must be out of your mind, you old wreck, Unwilling to go to the blacksmith's to sleep
 




335








340










345










350








355
 
Or anywhere else. You just blabber on here, Bold as can be, with all these real men around, Feeling no fear. Are you drunk, or are you Always like this, with all your blather?
Pleased with yourself, aren't you, because you beat that bum, Irus? Someone a lot better than Irus
Might stand up to you soon and pound you Bloody with his fists as he drives you outside."

Odysseus shot her a dark look and growled:

"Just let me tell Telemachus what you are saying, You bitch. He'll cut you to ribbons on the spot."

His words scattered the women, sending them Flying through the hall in terror, convinced That he meant what he said.
Odysseus
Took his stand by the torches, keeping them lit And watching all the men. But his heart seethed With other business, soon to be finished.

Now Athena was not about to let the suitors Abstain from insults. She wanted pain
To sink deeper into Odysseus' bones. And so Eurymachus began to jeer
At him for his friends' entertainment:

"Hear me, suitors of our glorious queen, While I speak my mind. It is not without
 

360








365











370











375










380
 
The will of the gods that this man has come To Odysseus' palace. We get a nice glow Of torchlight from him—from his head, That is, since it doesn't have a hair on it!"

And then speaking directly to Odysseus, Destroyer of cities, Eurymachus said:

"I wonder if you'd like to be a hired hand, Stranger. Should I hire you to work
On one of my outlying farms gathering fieldstones And planting tall trees? Oh, I'll pay you.
I'll keep you fed the year round out there, Give you some clothes and sandals to wear. But you've never done a hard day's work
In your life, preferring to beg your way through town For food to stuff into your bottomless belly."

And Odysseus, his mind teeming:

"Eurymachus, I wish we could have a contest Working in the fields during the summertime, When the days are long, just you and I
Out in a hayfield with long, curved scythes, And plenty of grass so we could test our work, Fasting until late evening.
Or how about this? We could each drive oxen, the best there are, Big and tawny, both well fed with grass,
The same age, yoked the same way, tireless animals—
 



385











390








395











400








405
 
And each with four acres of rich soil to plow. Then you'd see if I could cut a straight furrow Clear to the end.
 



410
 
And it would be even better If Zeus brought war upon us from somewhere, Today, right now, and I had a shield, two spears, And a bronze helmet that fit close to my temples.
Then you would see me out in the front ranks, And you wouldn't stand here jeering at me Because of my belly. But you are insufferable, And you have a hard heart. No doubt you think You are some great man, a tough guy,
Because you hang out with puny weaklings. If Odysseus came back home, these doors, Wide as they are, would be far too narrow
For you to squeeze through as you made for daylight."

This made Eurymachus all the more furious. Scowling at Odysseus he said to him:

"You won't get away with this kind of talk, Bold as can be with all these real men around, Feeling no fear. Are you drunk, or are you Always like this, with all your blather?
Are you all pumped up because you beat that bum, Irus?"

And he grabbed a footstool, but Odysseus, Wary of the man, sat down at the knees
Of Amphinomus, the suitor from Dulichium, And Eurymachus' missile struck a cupbearer
 








415








420










425










430
 
On the right hand. The wine jug he held Clattered to the ground, and the man groaned And fell backward into the dust.
The suitors
Were in an uproar throughout the shadowy hall. One man would glance at his neighbor and say:

"Better if the stranger had never made it here; Then he couldn't have brought us all this trouble. Here we are, brawling about beggars. Our feasts Will be ruined if we let things turn ugly."

Then Telemachus made his voice heard:

"You are all raving now. Your drunken guzzling Is beginning to show, or some god
Is stirring you up. But now that you have feasted, Go home and get some rest—whenever you're ready, Of course. I'm not driving anyone away."

He spoke, and they all bit their lips and marveled At Telemachus for speaking so boldly.
Then Amphinomus addressed the suitors:

"Friends, no man should be angry at a thing Fairly spoken, or respond by arguing.
Do not mistreat this stranger any longer, Or any of godlike Odysseus' household. Now let the cupbearer start us off
So we can pour libation and go home to rest.
 

435











440











445










450










455
 
This stranger we will leave in Odysseus' halls— Where he landed—and in Telemachus' keeping."

Amphinomus' words pleased everyone,
And a bowl was mixed by his herald, Mulius. He served a cup to each man in turn,
And they poured libations to the blessed gods And drank sweet wine to their hearts' content. Then they all went home and took their rest.
 



460










465
 

BOOK 19

So Odysseus was left alone in the hall, Planning death for the suitors with Athena's aid. He spoke winged words to Telemachus:

"Telemachus, get all the weapons out of the hall.
When the suitors miss them and ask you	5
Where they are, set their minds at ease, saying:
'Oh, I have stored them out of the smoke. They're nothing like they were when Odysseus Went off to Troy, but are all grimed with soot.
Also, a god put this thought into my head,	10
That when you men are drinking, you might Start quarreling and someone could get hurt, Which would ruin your feasting and courting. Steel has a way of drawing a man to it.'"
Thus Odysseus. Telemachus nodded,	15
And calling Eurycleia he said to her:
"Nurse, shut the women inside their rooms While I put my father's weapons away, The beautiful weapons left out in the hall
And dulled by the smoke since he went off to war.	20
I was just a child then. But now I want
To store them away, safe from the smoke."
 
And Eurycleia, his old nurse, said:
"Yes, child, you are right
To care for the house and guard its wealth.	25
But who will fetch a light and carry it for you, Since you won't let any of the women do it?"

Telemachus coolly answered her:

"This stranger here. I won't let anyone
Who gets rations be idle, even a traveler	30
From a distant land."

Telemachus' words sank in, And the nurse locked the doors of the great hall.
Odysseus and his illustrious son sprang up
And began storing away the helmets, bossed shields,
And honed spears. And before them Pallas Athena,	35
Bearing a golden lamp, made a beautiful light. Telemachus suddenly blurted out to his father:

"Father, this is a miracle I'm seeing!
The walls of the house, the lovely panels,
The beams of fir, and the high columns	40
Are glowing like fire. Some god is inside, One of the gods from the open sky."

Odysseus, his mind teeming, replied:
 
"Hush. Don't be too curious about this.
This is the way of the gods who hold high heaven.	45
Go get some rest. I'll remain behind here And draw out the maids—and your mother, Who in her grief will ask many questions."
And Telemachus went out through the hall
By the light of blazing torches. He came	50
To his room, lay down, and waited for dawn. Odysseus again was alone in the hall,
Planning death for the suitors with Athena's aid.

Penelope, wary and thoughtful,
Now came from her bedroom, and she was like	55
Artemis or golden Aphrodite. They set a chair for her by the fire
Where she always sat, a chair inlaid With spiraling ivory and silver
Which the craftsman Icmalius had made long ago.	60
It had a footstool attached, covered now With a thick fleece.
Penelope sat down, Taking everything in. White-armed maids Came out from the women's quarters
And started to take away all of the food,	65
Clearing the tables and picking up the cups From which the men had been drinking.
They emptied the braziers, scattering the embers Onto the floor, and then stocked them up
 
With loads of fresh wood for warmth and light.	70
Then Melantho started in on Odysseus again:
"Are we going to have to put up with you all night, Roaming though the house and spying on the women? Go on outside and be glad you had supper,
Or you'll soon stagger out struck with a torch."	75

And Odysseus answered from his teeming mind:

"What's wrong with you, woman? Are you mean to me Because I'm dirty and dressed in rags
And beg through the land? I do it because I have to.
That's how it is with beggars and vagabonds.	80
You know, I too once lived in a house in a city, A rich man in a wealthy house, and I often gave Gifts to wanderers, whatever they needed.
I had servants, too, countless servants,
And plenty of everything else a man needs	85
To live the good life and be considered wealthy. But Zeus crushed me. Who knows why?
So be careful, woman. Someday you may lose
That glowing beauty that makes you stand out now.
Or your mistress may become fed up with you.	90
Or Odysseus may come. We can still hope for that. But even if, as seems likely, he is dead
And will never return, his son, Telemachus,
Is now very much like him, by Apollo's grace,
And if any of the women are behaving loosely	95
 
It won't get by him. He's no longer a child."

None of this was lost on Penelope,
And she scolded the maidservant, saying:

 
"Your outrageous conduct does not escape me, Shameless whore that you are, and it will be On your own head. You knew very well,
For you heard me say it, that I intended To question the stranger here in my halls
About my husband; for I am sick with worry." Then to Eurynome, the housekeeper, she said:
"Bring a chair here with a fleece upon it
So that the stranger can sit down and tell his tale And listen to me. I have many questions for him."

So Eurynome brought up a polished chair And threw a fleece over it, and upon it sat Odysseus, patient and godlike.
Penelope, watchful, began with a question:

"First, stranger, let me ask you this: Who are you and where are you from?"

Odysseus, his mind teeming, answered her:

"Lady, no one on earth could find fault with you, For your fame reaches the heavens above,
 



100










105











110











115
 
Just like the fame of a blameless king,
A godfearing man who rules over thousands Of valiant men, upholding justice.
His rich, black land bears barley and wheat, The trees are laden with fruit, the flocks
Are always with young, and the sea teems with fish— Because he rules well, and so his people prosper.
Ask me, therefore, about anything else, But not about my birth or my native land.
That would fill my heart with painful memories. I have many sorrows, and it wouldn't be right To sit here weeping in another's house,
Nor is it good to be constantly grieving.
I don't want one of your maids, or you yourself, To be upset with me and say I am awash with tears Because the wine has gone to my head."
And Penelope, watching, answered him: "Stranger, the gods destroyed my beauty
On the day when the Argives sailed for Ilion And with them went my husband, Odysseus. If he were to come back and be part of my life,
My fame would be greater and more resplendent so. But now I ache, so many sorrows
Has some spirit showered upon me.
All of the nobles who rule the islands— Dulichium, Same, wooded Zacynthus— And all those with power on rocky Ithaca Are courting me and ruining this house.
 




120








125








130











135








140








145
 
So I pay no attention to strangers
Or to suppliants or public heralds. No,
I just waste away with longing for Odysseus. My suitors press on, and I weave my wiles. First some god breathed into me the thought Of setting up a great loom in the main hall, And I started weaving a vast fabric
With a very fine thread, and I said to them:

'Young men—my suitors, since Odysseus is dead— Eager as you are to marry me, you must wait
Until I finish this robe—it would be a shame To waste my spinning—a shroud for the hero Laertes, when death's doom lays him low.
I fear the Achaean women would reproach me
If he should lie in death shroudless for all his wealth.'

"So I spoke, and their proud hearts consented. Every day I would weave at the great loom, And every night unweave the web by torchlight. I fooled them for three years with my craft.
But in the fourth year, as the seasons rolled by, And the moons waned, and the days dragged on, My shameless and headstrong serving women
Betrayed me. The men barged in and caught me at it, And a howl went up. So I was forced to finish the shroud. Now I can't escape the marriage. I'm at my wit's end.
My parents are pressing me to marry, And my son agonizes over the fact
That these men are devouring his inheritance.
 








150










155








160










165








170
 
He is a man now, and able to preside
Over a household to which Zeus grants honor. But tell me of your birth, for you are not sprung, As the saying goes, from stock or stone."
And Odysseus, from his mind's teeming depths: "Honored wife of Laertes' son, Odysseus,
Will you never stop asking about my lineage? All right, I will tell you, but bear in mind
You are only adding to the sorrows I have.
For so it is when a man has been away from home As long as I have, wandering from city to city And bearing hardships. Still, I will tell you.
Crete is an island that lies in the middle Of the wine-dark sea, a fine, rich land
With ninety cities swarming with people Who speak many different languages.
There are Achaeans there, and native Cretans, Cydonians, Pelasgians, and three tribes of Dorians. One of the cities is great Cnossus,
Where Minos ruled and every nine years Conversed with great Zeus. He was the father Of my father, the great hero Deucalion.
Deucalion had another son, Idomeneus, Who sailed his beaked ships to Ilion
Following the sons of Atreus. I was the younger, And he the better man. My name is Aethon.
It was in Crete that I saw Odysseus And gave him gifts of hospitality.
 



175











180








185








190








195








200
 
He had been blown off course rounding Malea On his way to Troy. He put in at Amnisus, Where the cave of Eileithyia is found.
That is a difficult harbor, and he barely escaped The teeth of the storm. He went up to the city And asked for Idomeneus, claiming to be
An old and honored friend. But Idomeneus' ships Had left for Troy ten days before, so I
Took him in and entertained him well, Drawing on the ample supplies in the house. I gathered his men and distributed to them Barley meal, wine, and bulls for sacrifice
From the public supplies, to keep them happy. They stayed for twelve days. A norther so strong You could barely stand upright in it
Had them corraled—some evil spirit had roused it.
On the thirteenth day the wind dropped, and they left."

All lies, but he made them seem like the truth, And as she listened, her face melted with tears.

Snow deposited high in the mountains by the wild West Wind Slowly melts under the East Wind's breath,
And as it melts the rivers rise in their channels.

So her lovely cheeks coursed with tears as she wept For her husband, who was sitting before her.
Odysseus pitied her tears in his heart,
But his eyes were as steady between their lids As if they were made of horn or iron
 






205








210








215










220











225
 
As he concealed his own tears through guile. When Penelope had cried herself out,
She spoke to him again, saying:

"Now I feel I must test you, stranger,
To see if you really did entertain my husband And his godlike companions, as you say you did. Tell me what sort of clothes he wore, and tell me What he was like, and what his men were like."
And Odysseus, from his mind's teeming depths: "Lady, it is difficult for me to speak
After we've been apart for so long. It has been Twenty years since he left my country.
But I have an image of him in my mind. Odysseus wore a fleecy purple cloak, Folded over, and it had a brooch
With a double clasp, fashioned of gold, And on the front was an intricate design:
A hound holding in his forepaws a dappled fawn That writhed to get free. Everyone marveled
At how, though it was all made of gold, The hound had his eye fixed on the fawn As he was strangling it, and the fawn Twisted and struggled to get to its feet. And I remember the tunic he wore, Glistening like onionskin, soft and shiny And with a sheen like sunlight. There were Quite a few women who admired it.
 



230










235











240








245








250








255
 
But remember, now, I do not know Whether Odysseus wore this at home,
Or whether one of his men gave it to him When he boarded ship, or someone else, For Odysseus was a man with many friends. He had few equals among the Achaeans.
I, too, gave him gifts—a bronze sword,
A beautiful purple cloak, and a fringed tunic, And I gave him a ceremonious send-off
In his benched ship. And one more thing: He had a herald, a little older than he was, And I will tell you what he looked like. He was slope-shouldered, with dark skin And curly hair. His name was Eurybates, And Odysseus held him in higher esteem
Than his other men, because they thought alike."

These words stirred up Penelope's grief. She recognized the unmistakeable tokens Odysseus was giving her. She wept again, And then composed herself and said to him:

"You may have been pitied before, stranger, But now you will be loved and honored Here in my halls. I gave him those clothes.
I folded them, brought them from the storeroom, And pinned on the gleaming brooch,
To delight him. But I will never welcome him Home again, and so the fates were dark When Odysseus left in his hollow ship
 








260








265








270










275










280
 
For Ilion, that curse of a city."

 
And Odysseus, from his mind's teeming depths:

"Revered wife of Laertes' son, Odysseus,
Do not mar your fair skin with tears any more,
Or melt your heart with weeping for your husband. Not that I blame you. Any woman weeps
When she has lost her husband, a man with whom
She has made love and whose children she has borne— And the husband you've lost is Odysseus,
Who they say is like the immortal gods.
Stop weeping, though, and listen to my words, For what I am about to tell you is true.
I have lately heard of Odysseus' return,
That he is near, in the rich land of Thesprotia, Still alive. And he is bringing home treasures,
Seeking gifts, and getting them, throughout the land. But he lost his trusty crew and his hollow ship
On the wine-dark sea. As he was sailing out From the island of Thrinacia, Zeus and Helios Hit him hard because his companions had killed The cattle of the Sun. His men went under,
But he rode his ship's keel until the waves Washed him ashore in the land of the Phaeacians, Whose race is closely akin to the gods'.
They treated him as if he were a god,
Gave him many gifts, and were more than willing To escort him home. And he would have been here By now, but he thought it more profitable
 

285










290








295








300








305








310
 
To gather wealth by roaming the land. No one is as good as Odysseus
At finding ways to gain an advantage.
I had all this from Pheidon, the Thesprotian king. And he swore to me, as he poured libations
There in his house, that a ship was already launched, And a crew standing by, to take him home.
He sent me off first, since a Thesprotian ship Happened to be leaving for Dulichium,
But before I left, Pheidon showed me All the treasure Odysseus had amassed,
Bronze, gold, and wrought iron, enough to feed His children's children for ten generations,
All stored there for him in the halls of the king. Odysseus, he said, had gone to Dodona
To consult the oak-tree oracle of Zeus And ask how he should return to Ithaca—
Openly or in secret—after being gone so long. So he is safe, and will come soon.
He is very near, and will not be away long From his dear ones and his native land.
I will swear to this. Now Zeus on high Be my witness, and this hospitable table,
And the hearth of flawless Odysseus himself— That everything will happen just as I say: Before this month is out Odysseus will come,
In the dark of the moon, before the new crescent." And Penelope, watching him carefully:
 






315








320








325








330








335
 
"Ah, stranger, may your words come true.
Then you would know my kindness, and my gifts Would make you blessed in all men's eyes.
But I know in my heart that Odysseus
Will never come home, and that you will never Find passage elsewhere, since there is not now Any master in the house like Odysseus—
If he ever existed—to send honored guests Safely on their way, or to welcome them. But still, wash our guest's feet, maidens, And prepare a bed for him. Set up a frame
And cover it with cloaks and lustrous blankets
To keep him cozy and warm. When golden Dawn Shows her first light, bathe him and anoint him, So he can sit side by side with Telemachus
And share in the feast here in the hall. And anyone who causes this man any pain
Will regret it sorely and will accomplish nothing Here in this house, however angry he gets.
For how would you ever find out, stranger, Whether or not I surpass all other women
In presence of mind, if you sit down to dinner Squalid and disheveled here in my hall?
Our lives are short. A hard-hearted man
Is cursed while he lives and reviled in death. But a good-hearted man has his fame spread Far and wide by the guests he has honored, And men speak well of him all over the earth."

And Odysseus, his mind teeming, answered her:
 

340








345








350








355








360








365
 

 
"Revered wife of Odysseus, Laertes' son, I lost all interest in cloaks and blankets
On the day I left the snowy mountains of Crete In my long-oared ship. I will lie down tonight, As I have through many a sleepless night,
On a poor bed, waiting for golden-throned Dawn. Nor do I have any taste for foot-baths,
And none of the serving women here in your hall Will touch my feet, unless there is some old, Trustworthy woman who has suffered as I have. I would not mind if she touched my feet."

And Penelope, watching him carefully:

"Of all the travelers who have come to my house, None, dear guest, have been as thoughtful as you And none as welcome, so wise are your words.
I do have an old and trustworthy woman here, Who nursed and raised my ill-starred husband, Taking him in her arms the day he was born. She will wash your feet, frail as she is.
Eurycleia, rise and wash your master's—that is, Wash the feet of this man who is your master's age. Odysseus' feet and hands are no doubt like his now, For men age quickly when life is hard."

At this, the old woman hid her face in her hands. Shedding warm tears, she spoke through her sobs:
 



370








375










380










385








390
 
"My lost child, I can do nothing for you.
Zeus must have hated you above all other men, Although you were always godfearing. No one Burned more offerings to the Lord of Lightning, So many fat thighbones, bulls by the hundreds, With prayers that you reach a sleek old age
And raise your glorious son. And now the god has Deprived you alone of your day of return.
And I suppose, stranger, women mocked him, too, When he came to some man's gloried house
In a distant land, just as these cheeky bitches All mock you here. It is to avoid their insults That you will not allow them to wash your feet. But Penelope, Icarius' wise daughter,
Has asked me to do it, and I will, For her sake and for yours,
For my heart is throbbing with sorrow. But listen now to what I have to say.
Many road-weary strangers have come here, But I have never seen such a resemblance As that between you and Odysseus,
In looks, voice—even the shape of your feet." And Odysseus, from his mind's teeming depths:
"Oh, everyone who has seen us both says that, Old woman, that we are very much alike,
Just as you yourself have noticed."

And the old woman took the shining basin
 



395








400








405








410








415













420
 
She used for washing feet, poured
Cold water into it, and then added the hot. Odysseus, waiting, suddenly sat down at the hearth And turned away toward the shadows. The scar!
It flashed through his mind that his old nurse Would notice his scar as soon as she touched him, And then everything would be out in the open.
She drew near and started to wash her master, And knew at once the scar from the wound
He had gotten long ago from a boar's white tusk When he had gone to Parnassus to visit Autolycus, His mother's father, who was the best man on earth At thieving and lying, skills he had learned
From Hermes. He had won the god's favor With choice burnt offerings of lambs and kids.

Autolycus had visited Ithaca once
When his grandson was still a newborn baby. After he finished supper, Eurycleia
Put the child in his lap and said to him:

"Autolycus, now name the child
Of your own dear child. He has been much prayed for." Then Autolycus made this response:
"Daughter and son-in-law of mine, Give this child the name I now tell you. I come here as one who is odious, yes,
Hateful to many for the pain I have caused
 








425








430








435











440











445
 
All over the land. Let this child, therefore, Go by the name of Odysseus.
For my part, when he is grown up
And comes to the great house of his mother's kin In Parnassus, where my possessions lie,
I will give him a share and send him home happy."

In due time, Odysseus came to get these gifts From Autolycus. His grandfather
And his uncles all welcomed him warmly, And Amphithea, his mother's mother, Embraced Odysseus and kissed his head And beautiful eyes. Autolycus told his sons To prepare a meal, and they obeyed at once, Leading in a bull, five years old,
Which they flayed, dressed, and butchered. They skewered the meat, roasted it skillfully, And then served out portions to everyone.
All day long until the sun went down They feasted to their hearts' content.
But when the sun set and darkness came on They went to bed and slept through the night. When Dawn brushed the early sky with rose, They went out to hunt—Autolycus' sons Running their hounds—and with them went
Godlike Odysseus. They climbed the steep wooded slopes Of Mount Parnassus and soon reached
The windy hollows. The sun was up now, Rising from the damasked waters of Ocean
And just striking the fields, when the beaters came
 






450










455








460








465








470








475
 
Into a glade. The dogs were out front, Tracking the scent, and behind the dogs Came Autolycus' sons and noble Odysseus, His brandished spear casting a long shadow. Nearby, a great boar was lying in his lair,
A thicket that was proof against the wild wet wind And could not be pierced by the rays of the sun, So dense it was. Dead leaves lay deep
Upon the ground there. The sound of men and dogs Pressing on though the leaves reached the boar's ears, And he charged out from his lair, back bristling
And his eyes spitting fire. He stood at bay Right before them, and Odysseus rushed him, Holding his spear high, eager to thrust.
The boar was too quick. Slashing in,
He got Odysseus in the thigh, right above the knee, His white tusk tearing a long gash in the muscle Just shy of the bone. Even so, Odysseus
Did not miss his mark, angling his spear
Into the boar's right shoulder. The gleaming point Went all the way through, and with a loud grunt The boar went down and gasped out his life.
Autolycus' sons took care of the carcass
And tended the wound of the flawless Odysseus, Skillfully binding it and staunching the blood By chanting a spell. Then they quickly returned To their father's house. When Odysseus
Had regained his strength, Autolycus and his sons Gave him glorious gifts and sent him home happy, Home to Ithaca. His mother and father
 








480








485








490








495








500








505
 
Rejoiced at his return and asked him all about How he got his scar; and he told them the story Of how a boar had gashed him with his white tusk As he hunted on Parnassus with Autolycus' sons.

 
This was the scar the old woman recognized When the palm of her hand ran over it
As she held his leg. She let the leg fall,
And his foot clanged against the bronze basin, Tipping it over and spilling the water
All over the floor. Eurycleia's heart Trembled with mingled joy and grief, Tears filled her eyes, and her voice Was choked as she reached out
And touched Odysseus' chin and said:

"You are Odysseus, dear child. I did not know you Until I laid my hands on my master's body."

She spoke, and turned her eyes toward Penelope, Wanting to show her that her husband was home. But Penelope could not return her gaze
Or understand her meaning, for Athena Had diverted her mind. Odysseus reached
For the old woman's throat, seized it in his right hand And drawing her closer with his other, he said:

"Do you want to destroy me? You yourself Nursed me at your own breast, and now
After twenty hard years I've come back home.
 

510








515










520










525










530
 
Now that some god has let you in on the secret, You keep it to yourself, you hear? If you don't, I'll tell you this, and I swear I'll do it:
If, with heaven's help, I subdue the suitors,
I will not spare you—even if you are my nurse— When I kill the other women in the hall."

And Eurycleia, the wise old woman:

"How can you say that, my child? You know What I'm made of. You know I won't break. I'll be as steady as solid stone or iron.
And I'll tell you this, and you remember it:
If, with heaven's help, you subdue the proud suitors, I'll list for you all the women in the house,
Those who dishonor you and those who are true." And Odysseus, his mind teeming:
"Nurse, you don't have to tell me about them. I'll keep an eye out and get to know each one. Don't say a thing. Just leave it up to the gods."

At this, the old woman went off for more water To wash his feet, since it had all been spilled. When she had washed him and rubbed on oil, Odysseus pulled his chair close to the fire again To keep warm, and hid the scar with his rags.

Penelope now resumed their talk:
 






535











540








545













550










555
 

 
"There's one more thing I want to ask you about, And then it will be time to get some sleep—
At least for those to whom sweet sleep comes Despite their cares. But some god has given me Immeasurable sorrow. By day
I console myself with lamentation
And see to my work and that of my women. But at night, when sleep takes hold of others, I lie in bed, smothered by my own anxiety, Mourning restlessly, my heart racing.
Just as the daughter of Pandareus, The pale nightingale, sings sweetly
In the greening of spring, perched in the leaves, And trills out her song of lament for her son, Her beloved Itylus, whom she killed unwittingly, Itylus, the son of Zethus her lord—
So too my heart is torn with dismay. Should I stay here with my son
And keep everything safe and just as it is, My goods, my slaves, my high-gabled house,
Honoring my husband's bed and public opinion— Or should I go with whoever is best
Of all my suitors, and gives me gifts past counting? And then there's my son. While he was young
And not yet mature, he kept me from leaving My husband's house and marrying another.
But now that he's grown and come into manhood, He begs me to leave, worried because
These Achaean men are devouring his goods.
 








560








565








570








575








580
 
But listen now to a dream I had And tell me what it means. In my dream
I have twenty geese at home. I love to watch them Come out of the water and eat grains of wheat.
But a huge eagle with a hooked beak comes Down from the mountain and breaks their necks, Killing them all. They lie strewn through the hall While he rides the wind up to the bright sky.
I weep and wail, still in my dream, And Achaean ladies gather around me
As I grieve because the eagle killed my geese. Then the eagle comes back and perches upon A jutting roofbeam and speaks to me
In a human voice, telling me not to cry:

'Take heart, daughter of famed Icarius. This is no dream, but a true vision
That you can trust. The geese are the suitors, And I, who was once an eagle, am now
Your husband come back, and I will deal out doom, A grisly death for all of the suitors.'

"So he spoke, and I woke up refreshed. Looking around I saw the geese in the house, Feeding on wheat by the trough, as before."

And Odysseus, his mind teeming:

"Lady, there is no way to give this dream Another slant. Odysseus himself has shown you
 

585








590








595










600










605











610
 
How he will finish this business. The suitors' doom Is clear. Not one will escape death's black birds."

And Penelope, in her circumspect way:

 
"Stranger, you should know that dreams
Are hard to interpret, and don't always come true. There are two gates for dreams to drift through, One made of horn and the other of ivory.
Dreams that pass through the gate of ivory Are deceptive dreams and will not come true,
But when someone has a dream that has passed Through the gate of polished horn, that dream Will come true. My strange dream, though, Did not come from there. If it had,
It would have been welcome to me and my child. One more thing, and, please, take it to heart.
Dawn is coming, the accursed dawn of the day Which will sever me from the house of Odysseus. I will announce a contest. Odysseus
Used to line up axes inside his hall, Twelve of them, like the curved chocks That prop up a ship when it is being built,
And he would stand far off and send an arrow Whizzing through them all. I will propose This contest to my suitors, and whoever
Can bend that bow and slip the string on its notch And shoot an arrow through all twelve axes, With him will I go, leaving behind this house
I was married in, this beautiful, prosperous house,
 



615








620








625








630








635
 
Which I will remember always, even in my dreams."

 
And Odysseus, from the depths of his teeming mind:

"Revered wife of Laertes' son, Odysseus, Do not put off this contest any longer,
For Odysseus will be here, with all his cunning, Handling that polished bow, before these men Could ever string it and shoot through the iron."

Then Penelope, still watching him:

"If you were willing, stranger, to sit here Beside me in my halls and give me joy, Sleep would never settle upon my eyes. But we cannot always be sleepless,
For every thing there is a season, and a time For all we do on the life-giving earth.
I will go now to my room upstairs And lie on my bed, which has become A sorrowful bed, wet with my tears Since the day Odysseus left
For Ilion, that accursed city.
I will lie there, but you can lie here
In the hall. Spread some blankets on the floor, Or have the maids make up a bed for you."

Saying this, Penelope went upstairs To her softly lit room, not alone, For her women went up with her.
 

640










645











650








655








660
 
Once in her room she wept for Odysseus, Her beloved husband, wept until Athena Let sweet sleep settle upon her eyelids.
 



665
 

BOOK 20

Odysseus lay down to sleep
On the outer porch. He spread out
An uncured oxhide, and on top of that He layered fleeces from the many sheep
That were always being slaughtered	5
There in his house. Eurynome
Covered him with a cloak, and there he lay, Sleepless, his mind racing with thoughts Of how to punish the suitors.
And then the women
Came from the house, on their way,	10
As usual, to sleep with the suitors, Laughing with each other and giggling. Odysseus felt his chest tighten. He brooded For a long time over what he should do—
Rush out and kill every last one of them,	15
Or let them sleep with the arrogant bastards This one last time. He growled under his breath

The way a dog standing over her pups growls When she sees a stranger and digs in to fight—

So Odysseus growled at their iniquity,	20
But he slapped his chest hard and scolded his heart:
 
"Endure, my heart. You endured worse than this On that day when the invincible Cyclops
Ate our comrades. You bore it until your cunning
Got you out of the cave where you thought you would die."	25

In this way Odysseus scolded his heart,
And his heart in obedience beat steady and strong. But the great hero himself tossed and turned.

It was like a man roasting a paunch
Stuffed with fat and blood over afire.	30
He can't wait for it to be done
And so keeps turning it over and over—

Odysseus tossing and turning as he pondered how To get his hands on the shameless suitors,
One man against many.	35
And then Athena came Down from the sky, and stood above his head In the form of a woman, and spoke to him:

"Why are you sleepless, most ill-fated of men? This is your house, and in this house are your wife
And child, a son any father would hope for."	40

And Odysseus, his mind teeming:

"Yes, Goddess, all that you say is true, But my heart is brooding over this—
How to get my hands on the shameless suitors,
 
Alone as I am, against the whole pack of them.	45
And worse, even if I were to kill them By your will and the will of Zeus, how Would I get out of it? Think about that."
And Athena, eyes flashing in the dark:
"Let it go, Odysseus. Some people trust	50
Their puny human friends more than you trust me. And here I am, a goddess, protecting you
In all your trials. To put it plainly,
Even if there were fifty squadrons of armed men
All around us, doing their mortal best to kill us,	55
You would still be able to run off their cattle! Now get some sleep. Staying up all night
Will only sap your strength. All your troubles, Odysseus, will soon be over."
Athena spoke
And shed sleep on his eyelids, and then	60
She was off to Olympus, a being of light.

While Odysseus slept, his cares melting away Under the spell of sleep, his wife awoke,
And she wept as she sat upon her soft bed.
When her heart had its fill of weeping,	65
The godlike woman prayed to Artemis:

"Artemis, mighty daughter of Zeus—please, Shoot an arrow into my breast and take my life
 
This very moment. This is my wish,
Or that a storm wind snatch me away	70
And bear me off over the gloomy passes And cast me down at the mouth of Ocean,
As winds once bore off Pandareus' daughters.
The gods had slain their parents, and they were left
Orphans in their halls. Aphrodite fed them	75
Cheese, sweet honey, and mellow wine; Hera made them wise and beautiful
Beyond all women; holy Artemis made them tall; And Athena taught them glorious handiwork.
But while Aphrodite was off to high Olympus	80
To arrange their marriages, on her way to Zeus, The high lord of thunder, who knows all,
All the good and bad fortune of mortal men— The storm spirits snatched the girls away
And gave them as slaves to the hateful Furies.	85
So may the Olympians blot me out,
Or Artemis, in her tall headdress, shoot me, That I may pass beneath the hateful earth With Odysseus in my mind's eye, never
To gratify the heart of a lesser man.	90
Grief is endurable when one weeps by day But can sleep at night. Sleep makes us forget All things, both the good and the bad,
Once it enshrouds our eyelids. But some spirit
Keeps sending me bad dreams. This very night	95
There slept with me again someone who looked Just like Odysseus when he left with the army, And my heart was glad, because I did not think
 
It was a dream, but the waking truth at last."

 
She spoke, and Dawn came, seated on gold. Odysseus heard Penelope's voice as she wept And in that moment between sleep and waking He felt in his heart that she knew him already And was standing beside his head.
He picked up
The cloak and fleeces on which he had slept
And put them on a chair in the hall. Then he took The oxhide outside and set it down, and,
Lifting his palms to the sky, he prayed to Zeus:

"Father Zeus, if it was the gods' will To bring me home over land and sea After afflicting me, show me a sign.
Let someone of those stirring inside the house Speak for me a word of good omen,
And send me a sign also from the open sky."

Zeus in his wisdom heard his prayer
And thundered from snow-capped Olympus High above the clouds. Odysseus was glad. And a woman uttered a word of omen
As she ground at a mill nearby in the house. Twelve women in all worked the mills there, Grinding barley and wheat into flour,
The marrow of men. The other women, Their wheat ground, were sleeping now, But she, the weakest of them, was still at it.
 

100










105










110










115








120
 
Stopping her mill, she spoke these words:

"Father Zeus, lord of gods and men.
That was a loud thunderclap out of a clear sky! You must be showing someone a sign.
Will you answer an old woman's prayer? Let this be the last and final day
The suitors feast in Odysseus' hall.
I've broken my back grinding their grain. Let this meal be their last."

Odysseus smiled at this omen, and at the thunder From Zeus. He would have his vengeance.

The other women were up now, huddled together As they kindled the day's fire on the hearth.
Telemachus rose from bed, a godlike man, And got dressed. He slung his sharp sword Around one shoulder, tied fine leather sandals Onto his supple feet, and, spear in hand, Went to the threshold and spoke to Eurycleia:

"Dear nurse, have you looked after our guest,
Given him a bed and food, or is he lying uncared for? That's my mother's style, wise as she is,
Honoring one man outrageously
And sending a better man away neglected." And Eurycleia, with all her wits about her:
 

125










130










135










140










145
 
"Don't blame her, child, when she is blameless. He sat and drank wine as long as he wanted, But he said he wasn't hungry. She asked him. When he got tired and wanted to sleep,
She told the women to make up a bed,
But he, like many who are down on their luck, Wouldn't sleep on a bed, or under blankets.
He lay on an undressed oxhide and some fleeces Out on the porch, and we threw a cloak over him."

Thus Eurycleia, and Telemachus went out, Spear in hand and two hounds at his heels, To join the other men in the public square. Then Eurycleia, Peisenor's granddaughter, A noble woman, called to her maids:

"Some of you get busy and sweep the hall And sprinkle it, and put the purple coverlets
On the good chairs. And we'll need some others, To sponge down the tables, and wash the bowls And goblets. The rest of you go down
And fetch water from the spring, quickly. The suitors will be here early today.
It's a feast day, a holiday for everyone."

She spoke, and they did as she said. Twenty Went down to the spring with its dark water, And the rest did their house work skillfully.

Then in came the town's serving men. They started
 



150








155










160










165








170
 
Splitting logs, doing a good job of it. The women Came back from the spring, and behind them Came the swineherd, driving three prime boars, The herd's finest. He let them feed in the courtyard
And then turned to Odysseus with a pleasant manner:

"Stranger, are you getting any more respect yet, Or are they still insulting you in the hall?"

And Odysseus, his mind teeming:

"Eumaeus, it is outrageous the way these men Carry on in another man's house. May the gods Punish them! They have no sense of shame."

After this exchange, Melanthius came up, The goatherd, leading the best she-goats From all the herds for the suitors' feast.
Two herdsmen followed him. He tethered the goats In the echoing portico, and then taunted Odysseus:

"Are you still here, pestering everyone? Why don't you get the hell outside?
You and I are going to have to settle this
With our fists. I don't like your way of begging. There are other feasts you can go to, you know."

Odysseus made no response, but sat Shaking his head and brooding darkly.
 

175










180











185










190










195
 
And then a third herdsman came, Philoetius, Driving for the suitors a barren heifer
And fat she-goats. This livestock had been brought over, Along with Philoetius, by ferrymen
Who ply the straits with all sorts of passengers. He tethered the animals in the echoing portico And then went up to the swineherd and asked:

"Who's the new arrival, swineherd? Where does he say he comes from, And who are his parents and kinsmen?
Poor guy! He looks like some kind of king, But the gods can make it tough
For wanderers, even if they're royalty."

He spoke, then came up to Odysseus, Stretched out his right hand, and said:

"Welcome, stranger, and may good luck
Come your way, hard as things are for you now. Father Zeus, no god curses us worse than you! You have no pity for men. You beget them, Then plunge them into misery and pain.
Stranger, I broke into a sweat when I saw you, And my eyes are full of tears. You remind me Of Odysseus. He too is clothed in rags like this, I suppose, and is a wanderer like you,
If he is still alive, that is, and still sees the sunlight. But if he is already dead and has gone to Hades, Then I weep for noble Odysseus.
 




200










205








210











215








220
 
He put me in charge of his cattle when I was a boy In the land of the Cephallenians, and now
Those cattle are past counting. No breed Ever flourished like that for any mortal man. But now other men order me to drive them So they can eat them, with no regard at all For the son in the house, or the gods' wrath. No, they're hot to divide among themselves All the property of our long-absent master.
As for myself, I go around and around in my heart, Trying to decide. It would be very bad of me, While my master's son still lives, to go off
To some other place with my cattle, To a foreign land. But it is worse still
To stay here and suffer, in charge of herds Handed over to others. I would have fled Long ago, believe me, to some powerful lord, Because things here are no longer bearable,
Except that I still imagine, still have some hope That my unfortunate master will someday return And scatter the suitors out of this house."

And Odysseus, his great mind teeming:

"You're a good man, cowherd, and smart, And I see that you understand things,
So I will say something and seal it with an oath. With Zeus and all the gods above as witnesses, And by Odysseus' hearth, and this table
Of hospitality to which I have come,
 

225








230








235








240








245











250
 
I swear that while you are here, Odysseus
Will come home, and you will see, if you wish, The death of the suitors, who lord it over this hall."

To which the cowherd responded:

"May Zeus bring what you say to pass, stranger. Then you would see what these hands can do."

And Eumaeus, too, prayed to all the gods That wise Odysseus might return to his home.
 




255













260
 

So went their talk.
The suitors, meanwhile,
 
Were laying plans for Telemachus' death,
But as they talked a bird appeared on their left, A high-flying eagle with a dove in its talons. This prompted Amphinomus to say to them:

"This plan of ours isn't going to work, friends— Killing Telemachus. We might as well just eat."

The suitors all agreed with Amphinomus. Going into the house of godlike Odysseus, They laid their cloaks on chairs and got busy Slaughtering big sheep and plump goats And fatted swine, and the herd's prize heifer.
They roasted the entrails, served them, and mixed wine In the bowls. The swineherd passed out the cups, Philoetius handed out bread from a beautiful basket,
 






265











270








275
 
And Melanthius poured for them. They reached out To all the tasty dishes spread before them.

 
Telemachus, pressing his advantage, Showed Odysseus to a seat
Inside the great hall by the stone threshold, Giving him a shabby stool beside a little table. He served him a portion of the entrails
And a cup of wine, and he said to him:

"Sit here among these heroes and sip your wine. I myself will protect you from their insults
And keep their hands from you. This house
Is not a public inn, but the palace of Odysseus, Who inherited it to pass on to me.
So, all you suitors, control yourselves.
I don't want any fights breaking out here."

They bit their lips at this and wondered At Telemachus. It had been a bold speech. Then Antinous, Eupeithes' son, said:

"Hard as it is, we'd better listen to him, men. Telemachus really means business now.
If Zeus had allowed it, we'd have shut his mouth By now, here in these halls, fine speaker or not."

But Telemachus paid no attention to Antinous.
 





280










285








290











295
 
Meanwhile, down in the town, heralds
Were leading a sacrifice of one hundred bulls Through the streets, and Achaean men,
Their long hair flowing, were gathering In a shady grove sacred to Apollo,
The god whose arrows strike from afar.

In Odysseus' palace they were now drawing
The roasted meat from the spits and dividing it up For a glorious feast. The servers set out
A portion for Odysseus equal to the others, This at the command of Telemachus, Godlike Odysseus' own true son.

But Athena was not about to let the suitors Abstain from insults. She wanted the pain To sink deeper into Odysseus' bones.
There was a particularly arrogant suitor
From the island of Samê—Ctessipus by name. This man, relying on his enormous wealth, Courted the wife of the long-absent Odysseus. He spoke now among the insolent crowd:

"Hear me, suitors. I have something to say. The stranger here has been served a portion Equal to ours. This is all as it should be.
It would not be right to deprive any guest Telemachus entertains here in these halls. So I'd like to give him a gift myself,
 



300










305








310










315










320
 
A little gratuity he might want to pass on
To the bath woman or one of the other slaves Who live in the house of godlike Odysseus."

So saying, he picked up an ox's hoof From a basket and threw it hard. Odysseus Snapped his head aside and dodged it,
Smiling to himself, a grim and bitter smile. The ox's hoof crashed into the solid wall, And Telemachus tore into Ctessipus:

"You're damned lucky you missed him, Ctessipus—or rather that he dodged your throw— Or I would have rammed my spear into your gut, And your father would have been busy
With your funeral instead of making plans for a wedding. No more of this ugliness in my house—from anyone!
I understand now what's going on around here, The good and the bad. I was a child before.
But we still have to put up with all this, Seeing the sheep slaughtered, the wine drunk, The bread—one man can't stop many.
You don't have to be hostile to me,
But if you are determined to cut me down, Well, I'd rather be killed in cold blood
Than have to watch this disgusting behavior— Guests mistreated and men dragging the women Shamefully through these beautiful halls."

Dead silence reigned in those beautiful halls
 

325










330










335








340








345








350
 
Until Agelaus, son of Damastor, said:

 
"Friends, no one should get angry at a speech Justly spoken, or respond to it harshly.
We should stop mistreating the stranger And all of the servants in Odysseus' house. But I would like to offer to Telemachus, And to his mother, some friendly advice,
And I hope that it gets through to both of them. As long as you still held hope in your hearts That Odysseus would find his way back home, No one could blame you for waiting for him
And restraining the suitors—clearly the better course Had he ever come back and returned to his home.
But now it is clear he will never return.
Sit down with your mother and tell her this. Tell her to marry the best of her suitors, Whoever that is, whoever gives her the most.
Then you can enjoy what your father has left you, And she can keep another man's house."
Telemachus answered in his cool-headed way: "I swear by Zeus and by my poor father,
Who has either perished far from Ithaca
Or is wandering still, that I do not, Agelaus, Delay my mother's marriage. On the contrary,
I encourage her to marry the man of her choice, And I offer her a dowry of gifts past counting.
But it would be shameful for me to order her to leave—
 





355








360








365








370











375
 
May the gods forbid it—against her own will."

 
Thus "Telemachus. And Pallas Athena Touched the suitors' minds with hysteria.
They couldn't stop laughing, and as they laughed It seemed to them that their jaws were not theirs,
And the meat that they ate was dabbled with blood. Tears filled their eyes, and their hearts raced.
Then the seer Theoclymenus spoke among them:

"Wretches, what wicked thing is this that you suffer? You are shrouded in night from top to toe, Lamentation flares, your cheeks melt with tears, And the walls of the house are spattered with blood. The porch and the court are crowded with ghosts Streaming down to the undergloom. The sun is gone
From heaven, and an evil mist spreads over the land."

Thus the seer, and they just giggled at him. Eurymachus was the first to actually speak:

"This newly arrived stranger has lost his mind!
Quick, get him outside, since he thinks it's night in here." To which the seer Theoclymenus replied:
"I don't need any escorts, Eurymachus. I have eyes, ears, and my own two feet, And a mind in good working order.
I'll leave under my own power, for I can see
 

380








385










390










395













400
 
Evil coming upon you, inescapable evil
For every last one of you who in your blind pride Do violence to the house of Odysseus."

And with that he left the great hall
And went to Peiraeus, who took him in gladly. The suitors stood there smirking at each other And tried to provoke Telemachus
By ridiculing his guests with comments like these:

"Hey, Telemachus, you don't have much luck With the kind of guests you keep around.
You've got this filthy vagabond here
Who always wants a handout of bread and wine And can't help out with anything, a useless load. Then this other one posing as a prophet.
If you ask me we ought to throw them on a ship And send them off to the Sicilians.
At least then you would turn a little profit."

So went their talk. But Telemachus ignored them, Watching his father in silence, waiting for the moment When he would lay his hands on the shameless suitors.

By now Penelope, Icarius' wise daughter, Had set her chair across from the suitors And heard the words of each man in the hall. During all their laughter they had been busy Preparing their dinner, a tasty meal
For which they had slaughtered many animals.
 




405










410










415










420










425
 
But no meal could be more graceless than the one A goddess and a hero would serve to them soon. After all, they started the whole ugly business.
 



430
 

BOOK 21

Owl-eyed Athena now prompted Penelope To set before the suitors Odysseus' bow
And the grey iron, implements of the contest And of their death.
Penelope climbed
The steep stairs to her bedroom and picked up	5
A beautiful bronze key with an ivory handle And went with her maids to a remote storeroom
Where her husband's treasures lay—bronze, gold, And wrought iron. And there lay the curved bow
And the quiver, still loaded with arrows,	10
Gifts which a friend of Odysseus had given him When they met in Lacedaemon long ago.
This was Iphitus, Eurytus' son, a godlike man.
They had met in Messene, in the house of Ortilochus.
Odysseus had come to collect a debt	15
The Messenians owed him: three hundred sheep They had taken from Ithaca in a sea raid,
And the shepherds with them. Odysseus Had come to get them back, a long journey
For a young man, sent by his father and elders.	20
Iphitus had come to search for twelve mares
He had lost, along with the mules they were nursing. These mares turned out to be the death of Iphitus When he came to the house of Heracles,
 
Zeus' tough-hearted son, who killed him,	25
Guest though he was, without any regard
For the gods' wrath or the table they had shared— Killed the man and kept the strong-hoofed mares. It was while looking for these mares that Iphitus
Met Odysseus and gave him the bow	30
Which old Eurytus had carried and left to his son. Odysseus gave him a sword and spear
To mark the beginning of their friendship
But before they had a chance to entertain each other
Zeus' son killed Iphitus, son of Eurytus,	35
A man like the gods. Odysseus did not take The bow with him on his black ship to Troy. It lay at home as a memento of his friend, And Odysseus carried it only on Ithaca.

Penelope came to the storeroom	40
And stepped onto the oak threshold
Which a carpenter in the old days had planed, Leveled, and then fitted with doorposts
And polished doors. Lovely in the half-light,
She quickly loosened the thong from the hook,	45
Drove home the key and shot back the bolts. The doors bellowed like a bull in a meadow And flew open before her. Stepping through,
She climbed onto a high platform that held chests
Filled with fragrant clothes. She reached up	50
And took the bow, case and all, from its peg,
Then sat down and laid the gleaming case on her knees Her eyes welling with tears. Then she opened the case
 
And took out her husband's bow. When she had her fill
Of weeping, she went back to the hall	55
And the lordly suitors, bearing in her hands The curved bow and the quiver loaded With whining arrows. Two maidservants Walked beside her, carrying a wicker chest
Filled with the bronze and iron gear her husband	60
Once used for this contest. When the beautiful woman Reached the crowded hall, she stood
In the doorway flanked by her maidservants. Then, covering her face with her shining veil,
Penelope spoke to her suitors:	65
"Hear me, proud suitors. You have used this house For an eternity now—to eat and drink
In its master's absence, nor could you offer Any excuse except your lust to marry me.
Well, your prize is here, and this is the contest.	70
I set before you the great bow of godlike Odysseus. Whoever bends this bow and slips the string on its notch And shoots an arrow through all twelve axes,
With him will I go, leaving behind this house
I was married in, this beautiful, prosperous house,	75
Which I will remember always, even in my dreams."

Penelope said this, and then ordered Eumaeus To set out for the suitors the bow and grey iron.
All in tears, Eumaeus took them and laid them down,
And the cowherd wept, too, when he saw	80
His master's bow. Antinous scoffed at them both:
 

 
"You stupid yokels! You can't see farther than your noses. What a pair! Disturbing the lady with your bawling.
She's sad enough already because she's lost her husband. Either sit here in silence or go outside to weep,
And leave the bow behind for us suitors. This contest Will separate the men from the boys. It won't be easy To string that polished bow. There is no man here Such as Odysseus was. I know. I saw him myself And remember him well, though I was still a child."

So Antinous said, hoping in his heart
That he would string the bow first and shoot an arrow Through the iron. But the only arrow
He would touch first would be the one shot Into his throat from the hands of Odysseus, The man he himself was dishonoring
While inciting his comrades to do the same. And then Telemachus, with a sigh of disgust:
"Look at me! Zeus must have robbed me of my wits. My dear mother declares, for all her good sense, That she will marry another and abandon this house, And all I do is laugh and think it is funny.
Well, come on, you suitors, here's your prize, A woman the likes of whom does not exist In all Achaea, or in sacred Pylos,
Nowhere in Argos or in Mycenae,
Or on Ithaca itself or on the dark mainland.
 







85








90










95











100








105
 
You all know this. Why should I praise my mother? Let's get going. Don't start making excuses
To put off stringing the bow. We'll see what happens. And I might give that bow a try myself.
If I string it and shoot an arrow through the axeheads, It won't bother me so much that my honored mother Is leaving this house and going off with another, Because I would at least be left here as someone Capable of matching his father's prowess."

With that he took off his scarlet cloak, stood up, And unstrapped his sword from his shoulders. Then he went to work setting up the axeheads, First digging a long trench true to the line
To hold them in a row, and then tamping the earth Around each one. Everyone was amazed
That he made such a neat job of it When he had never seen it done before.
Then he went and took his stance on the threshold And began to try the bow. Three times
He made it quiver as he strained to string it,
And three times he eased off, although in his heart He yearned to draw that bow and shoot an arrow Through the iron axeheads. And on his fourth try He would have succeeded in muscling the string Onto its notch, but Odysseus reined him in, Signaling him to stop with an upward nod.
So Telemachus said for all to hear:

"I guess I'm going to be a weakling forever!
 




110








115










120








125








130










135
 
Or else I'm still too young and don't have the strength To defend myself against an enemy.
But come on, all of you who are stronger than me— Give the bow a try and let's settle this contest."
And he set the bow aside, propping it against The polished, jointed door, and leaning the arrow Against the beautiful latch. Then Telemachus
Sat down on the chair from which he had risen. Antinous, Eupeithes' son, then said:
"All right. We go in order from left to right, Starting from where the wine gets poured."

Everyone agreed with Antinous' idea. First up was their soothsayer, Leodes, Oenops' son. He always sat in the corner
By the wine-bowl, and he was the only one Who loathed the way the suitors behaved. He now carried the bow and the arrow Onto the threshold, took his stance,
And tried to bend the bow and string it, But his tender, unworn hands gave out, And he said for all the suitors to hear:

"Friends, I'm not the man to string this bow. Someone else can take it. I foresee it will rob Many a young hero of the breath of life.
And that will be just as well, since it is far better To die than live on and fall short of the goal
 








140











145










150








155










160
 
We gather here for, with high hopes day after day. You might hope in your heart—you might yearn— To marry Penelope, the wife of Odysseus,
But after you've tried this bow and seen what it's like, Go woo some other Achaean woman
And try to win her with your gifts. And Penelope Should just marry the highest bidder,
The man who is fated to be her husband."

And he set the bow aside, propping it against The polished, jointed door, and leaning the arrow Against the beautiful latch. Then
He sat down on the chair from which he had risen. And Antinous heaped contempt upon him:

"What kind of thing is that to say, Leodes? I'm not going to stand here and listen to this.
You think this bow is going rob some young heroes Of life, just because you can't string it?
The truth is your mother didn't bear a son Strong enough to shoot arrows from bows.
But there are others who will string it soon enough." Then Antinous called to Melanthius, the goatherd:
"Get over here and start a fire, Melanthius, And set by it a bench with a fleece over it, And bring out a tub of lard from the pantry, So we can grease the bow, and warm it up. Then maybe we can finish this contest."
 






165










170










175








180











185
 

 
He spoke, and Melanthius quickly rekindled the fire And placed by it a bench covered with a fleece
And brought out from the pantry a tub of lard With which the young men limbered up the bow— But they still didn't have the strength to string it.

Only Antinous and godlike Eurymachus,
The suitors' ringleaders—and their strongest— Were still left in the contest.

Meanwhile,
Two other men had risen and left the hall—
The cowherd and swineherd—and Odysseus himself Went out, too. When the three of them
Were outside the gates, Odysseus said softly:

"Cowherd and swineherd, I've been wondering
If I should tell you what I'm about to tell you now. Let me ask you this. What would you do
If Odysseus suddenly showed up here Out of the blue, just like that?
Would you side with the suitors or Odysseus? Tell me how you stand."
And the cattle herder answered him: "Father Zeus, if only this would come true!
Let him come back. Let some god guide him.
 





190










195














200








205
 
Then you would see what these hands could do."

And Eumaeus prayed likewise to all the gods That Odysseus would return.

When Odysseus
Was sure of both these men, he spoke to them again:

"I am back, right here in front of you.
After twenty hard years I have returned to my home. I know that only you two of all my slaves
Truly want me back. I have heard None of the others pray for my return. So this is my promise to you. If a god
Beats these proud suitors down before me, I will give you each a wife, property,
And a house built near mine. You two shall be Friends to me and brothers to Telemachus.
And look, so you can be sure of who I am, Here's a clear sign, that scar from the wound I got from a boar's tusk when I went long ago To Parnassus with the sons of Autolycus."

And he pulled his rags aside from the scar. When the two men had examined it carefully,
They threw their arms around Odysseus and wept, And kept kissing his head and shoulders in welcome. Odysseus kissed their heads and hands,
And the sun would have gone down on their weeping, Had not Odysseus stopped them, saying:
 

210















215








220








225










230
 

 
"No more weeping and wailing now. Someone might come Out of the hall and see us and tell those inside.
We'll go back in now—not together, one at a time.
I'll go first, and then you. And here's what to watch for. None of the suitors will allow the bow and quiver
To be given to me. It'll be up to you, Eumaeus, To bring the bow over and place it in my hands.
Then tell the women to lock the doors to their hall, And if they hear the sound of men groaning
Or being struck, tell them not to rush out But to sit still and do their work in silence.
Philoetius, I want you to bar the courtyard gate And secure it quickly with a piece of rope."

With this, Odysseus entered his great hall
And sat down on the chair from which he had risen. Then the two herdsmen entered separately.

Eurymachus was turning the bow Over and over in his hands, warming it
On this side and that by the fire, but even so He was unable to string it. His pride hurt, Shoulders sagging, he groaned and then swore:

"Damn it! It's not just myself I'm sorry for,
But for all of us—and not for the marriage either. That hurts, but there are plenty of other women, Some here in Ithaca, some in other cities.
 

235








240








245










250










255
 
No, it's that we fall so short of Odysseus' Godlike strength. We can't even string his bow! We'll be laughed at for generations to come!"
Antinous, son of Eupeithes, answered him: "That'll never happen, Eurymachus,
And you know it. Now look, today is a holiday Throughout the land, a sacred feast
In honor of Apollo, the Archer God. This is no time to be bending bows. So just set it quietly aside for now.
As for the axes, why don't we leave them Just as they are? No one is going to come Into Odysseus' hall and steal those axes. Now let's have the cupbearer start us off So we can forget about the bow
And pour libations. Come morning, We'll have Melanthius bring along The best she-goats in all the herds, So we can lay prime thigh-pieces
On the altar of Apollo, the Archer God, And then finish this business with the bow."

Antinous' proposal carried the day.
The heralds poured water over everyone's hands, And boys filled the mixing bowls up to the brim And served out the wine, first pouring
A few drops into each cup for libation. When they had poured out their libations
 

260











265








270








275








280










285
 
And drunk as much as they wanted, Odysseus Spoke among them, his heart full of cunning:

 
"Hear me, suitors of the glorious queen— And I address Eurymachus most of all, And godlike Antinous, since his speech
Was right on the mark when he said that for now You should stop the contest and leave everything Up to the gods. Tomorrow the Archer God
Will give the victory to whomever he chooses. But come, let me have the polished bow.
I want to see, here in this hall with you,
If my grip is still strong, and if I still have Any power left in these gnarled arms of mine,
Or if my hard traveling has sapped all my strength."

They seethed with anger when they heard this, Afraid that he would string the polished bow, And Antinous addressed him contemptuously:

"You don't have an ounce of sense in you, You miserable tramp. Isn't it enough
That we let you hang around with us, Undisturbed, with a full share of the feast? You even get to listen to what we say,
Which no other stranger, much less beggar, can do. It's wine that's screwing you up, as it does
Anyone who guzzles it down. It was wine That deluded the great centaur, Eurytion, In the hall of Peirithous, the Lapith hero.
 



290








295








300











305








310
 
Eurytion got blind-drunk and in his madness Did a terrible thing in Peirithous' house.
The enraged Lapiths sliced off his nose and ears And dragged him outside, and Eurytion
Went off in a stupor, mutilated and muddled. Men and centaurs have been at odds ever since. Eurytion hurt himself because he got drunk.
And you're going to get hurt, too, I predict, Hurt badly, if you string the bow. No one In all the land will show you any kindness.
We'll send you off in a black ship to Echetus, Who maims them all. You'll never get out alive. So just be quiet and keep on drinking,
And don't challenge men who are younger than you." It was Penelope who answered Antinous:
"It is not good, or just, Antinous, To cheat any of Telemachus' guests
Who come to this house. Do you think That if this stranger proves strong enough To string Odysseus' bow, he will then
Lead me to his home and make me his wife? I can't imagine that he harbors this hope.
So do not ruin your feast on that account. The very idea is preposterous."
Eurymachus responded to this: "Daughter of Icarius, wise Penelope,
 



315








320








325











330








335
 
Of course it's preposterous that this man
Would marry you. That's not what we're worried about.
But we are embarrassed at what men—and women—will say: 'A bunch of weaklings were wooing the wife
Of a man they couldn't touch—they couldn't even string His polished bow. Then along came a vagrant
Who strung it easily and shot through the iron.' That's what they'll say, to our lasting shame."

And Penelope, her eyes narrowing:

"Eurymachus, men who gobble up The house of a prince cannot expect To have a good reputation anywhere.
So there isn't any point in bringing up honor. This stranger is a very well-built man
And says he is the son of a noble father.
So give him the bow and let us see what happens. And here is my promise to all of you.
If Apollo gives this man the glory
And he strings the bow, I will clothe him In a fine cloak and tunic, and give him A javelin to ward off dogs and men,
And a double-edged sword, and sandals For his feet, and I will give him passage To wherever his heart desires."
This time it was Telemachus who answered: "As for the bow, Mother, no man alive
 

340








345











350








355








360











365
 
Has a stronger claim than I do to give it To whomever I want, or to deny it— No, none of the lords on rocky Ithaca Nor on the islands over toward Elis,
None of them could force his will upon me, Not even if I wanted to give this bow Outright, case and arrows and all,
As a gift to the stranger.
 








370
 
Go to your rooms, Mother, and take care of your work,
Spinning and weaving, and have the maids do theirs. This bow is men's business, and my business Especially, since I am the master of this house."

Penelope was stunned and turned to go,
Her son's masterful words pressed to her heart. She went up the stairs to her room with her women And wept for Odysseus, her beloved husband, Until grey-eyed Athena cast sleep on her eyelids.

Downstairs, the noble swineherd was carrying The curved bow across the hall. The suitors Were in an uproar, and one of them called out:

"Where do you think you're going with that bow, You miserable swineherd? You're out of line.
Go back to your pigsties, where your own dogs Will wolf you down—a nice, lonely death—
If Apollo and the other gods smile upon us."
 




375










380










385










390
 
Afraid, the swineherd stopped in his tracks
And set the bow down. Men were yelling at him
All through the hall, and now Telemachus weighed in:

 
"Keep going with the bow. You'll regret it If you try to obey everyone. I may be Younger than you, but I'll chase you back Into the country with a shower of stones.
I am stronger than you. I wish I were as strong When it came to the suitors. I'd throw more than one
Out of here in a sorry state. They're all up to no good."

This got the suitors laughing hilariously
At Telemachus. The tension in the room eased, And the swineherd carried the bow
Across to Odysseus and put it in his hands. Then he called Eurycleia aside and said:

"Telemachus says you should lock the doors to the hall, And if the women hear the sound of men groaning
Or being struck, tell them not to rush out But to sit still and do their work in silence."

Eumaeus' words sank in, and Eurycleia Locked the doors to the crowded hall.

Meanwhile, Philoetius left without a word And barred the gates to the fenced courtyard. Beside the portico there lay a ship's hawser Made of papyrus. Philoetius used this
 



395








400










405











410










415
 
To secure the gates, and then he went back in, Sat down on the chair from which he had risen, And kept his eyes on Odysseus.

 
He was handling the bow, turning it over and over And testing its flex to make sure that worms
Had not eaten the horn in its master's absence. The suitors glanced at each other
And started to make sarcastic remarks:

"Ha! A real connoisseur, an expert in bows!" "He must have one just like it in a case at home."
"Or plans to make one just like it, to judge by the way The masterful tramp keeps turning it in his hands."

"May he have as much success in life
As he'll have in trying to string that bow."

Thus the suitors, while Odysseus, deep in thought, Was looking over his bow. And then, effortlessly,

Like a musician stretching a string Over a new peg on his lyre, and making The twisted sheep-gut fast at either end,

Odysseus strung the great bow. Lifting it up, He plucked the string, and it sang beautifully Under his touch, with a note like a swallow's.
 



420











425













430











435
 
The suitors were aghast. The color drained From their faces, and Zeus thundered loud, Showing his portents and cheering the heart Of the long-enduring, godlike Odysseus.
One arrow lay bare on the table. The rest, Which the suitors were about to taste,
Were still in the quiver. Odysseus picked up The arrow from the table and laid it upon The bridge of the bow, and, still in his chair,
Drew the bowstring and the notched arrow back.
He took aim and let fly, and the bronze-tipped arrow Passed clean through the holes of all twelve axeheads From first to last. And he said to Telemachus:

"Well, Telemachus, the guest in your hall
Has not disgraced you. I did not miss my target, Nor did I take all day in stringing the bow.
I still have my strength, and I'm not as the suitors Make me out to be in their taunts and jeers.
But now it is time to cook these men's supper, While it is still light outside, and after that,
We'll need some entertainment—music and song— The finishing touches for a perfect banquet."

He spoke, and lowered his brows. Telemachus, The true son of godlike Odysseus, slung on
His sharp sword, seized his spear, and gleaming in bronze Took his place by his father's side.
 




440








445








450










455










460
 

BOOK 22

And now Odysseus' cunning was revealed. He stripped off his rags and leapt with his bow To the great threshold. Spreading the arrows Out before his feet, he spoke to the suitors:

"Now that we've separated the men from the boys,	5
I'll see if I can hit a mark that no man Has ever hit. Apollo grant me glory!"
As he spoke he took aim at Antinous, Who at that moment was lifting to his lips
A golden cup—a fine, two-eared golden goblet—	10
And was just about to sip the wine. Bloodshed Was the farthest thing from his mind.
They were at a banquet. Who would think
That one man, however strong, would take them all on
And so ensure his own death? Odysseus	15
Took dead aim at Antinous' throat and shot, And the arrow punched all the way through The soft neck tissue. Antinous fell to one side, The cup dropped from his hands, and a jet
Of dark blood spurted from his nostrils.	20
He kicked the table as he went down, Spilling the food on the floor, and the bread And roast meat were fouled in the dust.
 
The crowd Burst into an uproar when they saw
Antinous go down. They jumped from their seats	25
And ran in a panic through the hall, Scanning the walls for weapons—
A spear, a shield. But there were none to be had. Odysseus listened to their angry jeers:
"You think you can shoot at men, you tramp?"	30
"That's your last contest—you're as good as dead!" "You've killed the best young man in Ithaca!" "Vultures will eat you on this very spot!"
They all assumed he had not shot to kill,
And had no idea how tightly the net	35
Had been drawn around them. Odysseus Scowled at the whole lot of them, and said:

"You dogs! You thought I would never
Come home from Troy. So you wasted my house,
Forced the women to sleep with you,	40
And while I was still alive you courted my wife Without any fear of the gods in high heaven
Or of any retribution from the world of men. Now the net has been drawn tight around you."

At these words the color drained from their faces,	45
 
And they all looked around for a way to escape. Only Eurymachus had anything to say:

"If you are really Odysseus of Ithaca, Then what you say is just. The citizens
Have done many foolish things in this house	50
And many in the fields. But the man to blame Lies here dead, Antinous. He started it all, Not so much because he wanted a marriage Or needed one, but for another purpose,
Which Zeus did not fulfill: he wanted to be king	55
In Ithaca, and to kill your son in ambush. Now he's been killed, and he deserved it. But spare your people. We will pay you back
For all we have eaten and drunk in your house.
We will make a collection; each man will put in	60
The worth of twenty oxen; we will make restitution In bronze and gold until your heart is soothed.
Until then no one could blame you for being angry." Odysseus fixed him with a stare and said:
"Eurymachus, not even if all of you	65
Gave me your entire family fortunes, All that you have and ever will have, Would I stay my hands from killing.
You courted my wife, and you will pay in full.
Your only choice now is to fight like men	70
Or run for it. Who knows, one or two of you Might live to see another day. But I doubt it."
 
Their blood turned milky when they heard this. Eurymachus now turned to them and said:
"Friends, this man is not going to stop at anything.	75
He's got his arrows and bow, and he'll shoot From the threshold until he's killed us all. We've got to fight back. Draw your swords And use the tables as shields. If we charge him
In a mass and push him from the doorway	80
We can get reinforcements from town in no time. Then this man will have shot his last shot."

With that, he drew his honed bronze sword
And charged Odysseus with an ear-splitting cry.
Odysseus in the same instant let loose an arrow	85
That entered his chest just beside the nipple And spiked down to his liver. The sword fell From Eurymachus' hand. He spun around
And fell on a table, knocking off dishes and cups,
And rolled to the ground, his forehead banging	90
Up and down against it and his feet kicking a chair In his death throes, until the world went dark.
Amphinomus went for Odysseus next, Rushing at him with his sword drawn,
Hoping to drive him away from the door.	95
Telemachus got the jump on him, though, Driving a bronze-tipped spear into his back Square between his shoulder blades
And through to his chest. He fell with a thud,
 
His forehead hammering into the ground. Telemachus sprang back, leaving the spear Right where it was, stuck in Amphinomus, Fearing that if he tried to pull it out Someone would rush him and cut him down As he bent over the corpse. So he ran over To his father's side, and his words flew fast:

"I'll bring you a shield, Father, two spears And a bronze helmet—I'll find one that fits. When I come back I'll arm myself
And the cowherd and swineherd. Better armed than not." And Odysseus, the great tactician:
"Bring me what you can while I still have arrows Or these men might drive me away from the door."

And Telemachus was off to the room Where the weapons were stored. He took
Four shields, eight spears, and four bronze helmets With thick horsehair plumes and brought them Quickly to his father. Telemachus armed himself, The two servants did likewise, and the three of them Took their stand alongside the cunning warrior, Odysseus. As long as the arrows held out
He kept picking off the suitors one by one,
And they fell thick as flies. But when the master archer Ran out of arrows, he leaned the bow
Against the doorpost of the entrance hall
 

100








105










110













115








120








125
 
And slung a four-ply shield over his shoulder, Put on his head a well-wrought helmet
With a plume that made his every nod a threat, And took two spears tipped with heavy bronze.

 
Built into the higher wall of the main hall
Was a back door reached by a short flight of stairs And leading to a passage closed by double doors. Odysseus posted the swineherd at this doorway, Which could be attacked by only one man at a time. It was just then that Agelaus called to the suitors:

"Let's one of us get up to the back door And get word to the town. Act quickly And this man will have shot his last."
But the goatherd Melanthius answered him: "That won't work, Agelaus.
The door outside is too near the courtyard— An easy shot from where he is standing— And the passageway is dangerously narrow. One good man could hold it against all of us. Look, let me bring you weapons and armor From the storeroom. That has to be where Odysseus and his son have laid them away."

So saying, Melanthius clambered up
To Odysseus' storerooms. There he picked out Twelve shields and as many spears and helmets
 

130








135













140








145










150
 
And brought them out quickly to give to the suitors. Odysseus' heart sank, and his knees grew weak When he saw the suitors putting on armor
And brandishing spears. This wasn't going to be easy. His words flew out to Telemachus:

"One of the women in the halls must be
Waging war against us—unless it's Melanthius." And Telemachus, cool-headed under fire:
"No, it's my fault, Father, and no one else's. I must have left the storeroom door open, And one of them spotted it.
Eumaeus! Go close the door to the storeroom,
And see whether one of the women is behind this, Or Melanthius, son of Dolius, as I suspect."

As they were speaking, Melanthius the goatherd Was making another trip to the storeroom
For more weapons. The swineherd spotted him And was quick to point him out to Odysseus:

"There he goes, my lord Odysseus—
The sneak—just as we thought, on his way To the storeroom! Tell me what to do.
Kill him if I prove to be the better man, Or bring him to you, so he can pay in full
For all the wrongs he has done here in your house?"
 








155













160











165










170
 

 
Odysseus brought his mind to bear on this:

"Telemachus and I will keep the suitors busy In the hall here. Don't worry about that.
Tie him up. Bend his arms and legs behind him And lash them to a board strapped onto his back. Then hoist him up to the rafters in the storeroom And leave him there to twist in the wind."

This was just what Eumaeus and the cowherd Wanted to hear. Off they went to the storeroom, Unseen by Melanthius, who was inside Rooting around for armor and weapons.
They lay in wait on either side of the door, And when Melanthius crossed the threshold, Carrying a beautiful helmet in one hand And in the other a broad old shield,
Flecked with rust—a shield the hero Laertes Had carried in his youth but that had long since Been laid aside with its straps unstitched— Eumaeus and the cowherd Philoetius
Jumped him and dragged him by the hair Back into the storeroom. They threw him
Hard to the ground, knocking the wind out of him, And tied his hands and feet behind his back, Making it hurt, as Odysseus had ordered.
Then they attached a rope to his body And hoisted him up along the tall pillar Until he was up by the rafters, and you,
 

175










180










185








190








195








200
 
Swineherd Eumaeus, you mocked him:

 
"Now you'll really be on watch, Melanthius,
The whole night through, lying on a feather bed— Just your style—and you're sure to see
The early dawn come up from Ocean's streams, Couched in gold, at the hour when you drive your goats Up to the hall to make a feast for the suitors."

So Melanthius was left there, racked with pain, While Eumaeus and the cowherd put on their armor, Closed the polished door, and rejoined Odysseus, The cunning warrior. So they took their stand
There on the threshold, breathing fury,
Four of them against the many who stood in the hall.

And then Athena was with them, Zeus' daughter Looking just like Mentor and assuming his voice. Odysseus, glad to see her, spoke these words:

"Mentor, old friend, help me out here. Remember all the favors I've done for you. We go back a long way, you and I."

He figured it was Athena, the soldier's goddess. On the other side, the suitors yelled and shouted, Agelaus' voice rising to rebuke Athena:

"You there, Mentor, don't let Odysseus Talk you into helping him and fighting us.
 





205










210










215










220











225
 
This is the way I see it turning out.
When we have killed these men, father and son, We'll kill you next for what you mean to do
In this hall. You'll pay with your life.
And when we've taken care of all five of you, We'll take everything you have, Mentor, Everything in your house and in your fields, And add it to Odysseus' property.
We won't let your sons stay in your house Or let your daughters or even your wife Go about freely in the town of Ithaca."

This made Athena all the more angry,
And she turned on Odysseus and snapped at him:

"I can't believe, Odysseus, that you,
Of all people, have lost the guts you had
When you fought the Trojans for nine long years To get Helen back, killing so many in combat And coming up with the plan that took wide Troy. How is it that now, when you've come home,
You get all teary-eyed about showing your strength To this pack of suitors? Get over here
Next to me and see what I can do. I'll show you What sort of man Mentor, son of Alcimus, is, And how he repays favors in the heat of battle."

Athena spoke these words, but she did not yet Give Odysseus the strength to turn the tide. She was still testing him, and his glorious son,
 








230








235











240








245










250
 
To see what they were made of. As for herself, The goddess flew up to the roofbeam
Of the smoky hall, just like a swallow.

The suitors were now rallied by Agelaus
And by Damastor, Eurynomus, and Amphimedon, As well as by Demoptolemus and Peisander,
Son of Polyctor, and the warrior Polybus. These were the best of the suitors lucky enough To still be fighting for their lives. The rest
Had been laid low by the showers of arrows. Agelaus now made this speech to them:

"He's had it now. Mentor's abandoned him After all that hot air, and the four of them Are left alone at the outer doors.
All right, now. Don't throw your spears all at once. You six go first, and hope that Zeus allows Odysseus to be hit and gives us the glory.
The others won't matter once he goes down."

They took his advice and gave it their best,
But Athena made their shots all come to nothing, One man hitting the doorpost, another the door, Another's bronze-tipped ash spear sticking
Into the wall. Odysseus and his men
Weren't even nicked, and the great hero said to them:

"It's our turn now. I say we throw our spears
Right into the crowd. These bastards mean to kill us
 




255










260










265








270










275
 
On top of everything else they've done to wrong me."

 
He spoke, and they all threw their sharp spears With deadly aim. Odysseus hit Demoptolemus; Telemachus got Euryades; the swineherd, Elatus; And the cattle herder took out Peisander.
They all bit the dirt at the same moment,
And the suitors retreated to the back of the hall, Allowing Odysseus and his men to run out
And pull their spears from the dead men's bodies.

The suitors rallied for another volley, Throwing their sharp spears with all they had. This time Athena made most of them miss, One man hitting the doorpost, another the door, Another's bronze-tipped ash spear sticking
Into the wall. But Amphimedon's spear Grazed Telemachus' wrist, breaking the skin,
And Ctessipus' spear clipped Eumaeus' shoulder As it sailed over his shield and kept on going
Until it hit the ground. Then Odysseus and his men Got off another round into the throng,
Odysseus, sacker of cities, hitting Eurydamas;
Telemachus getting Amphimedon; the swineherd, Polybus; And lastly the cattle herder striking Ctessipus
Square in the chest. And he crowed over him:

"Always picking a fight, just like your father. Well, you can stop all your big talk now.
We'll let the gods have the last word this time.
 

280








285










290








295








300










305
 
Take this spear as your host's gift, fair exchange For the hoof you threw at godlike Odysseus When he made his rounds begging in the hall."

Thus the herder of the spiral-horned cattle.

 
Odysseus, meanwhile, had skewered Damastor's son With a hard spear-thrust in hand-to-hand fighting, And Telemachus killed Leocritus, Evenor's son, Piercing him in the groin and driving his bronze spear All the way through. Leocritus pitched forward,
His forehead slamming onto the ground.

Only then
Did Athena hold up her overpowering aegis From her high perch, and the minds of the suitors
Shriveled with fear, and they fled through the hall

Like a herd of cattle that an iridescent gadfly Goads along on a warm spring afternoon,

With Odysseus and his men after them

Like vultures with crooked talons and hooked beaks Descending from the mountains upon a flock
Of smaller birds, who fly low under the clouds And over the plain. The vultures swoop down
To pick them off; the smaller birds cannot escape, And men thrill to see the chase in the sky.
 

310








315













320











325
 
Odysseus and his cohorts were clubbing the suitors Right and left all through the hall; horrible groans Rose from their lips as their heads were smashed in, And the floor of the great hall smoked with blood.
It was then that Leodes, the soothsayer, rushed forward, Clasped Odysseus' knees, and begged for his life:

"By your knees, Odysseus, respect me
And pity me. I swear I have never said or done Anything wrong to any woman in your house.
I tried to stop the suitors when they did such things,
But they wouldn't listen, wouldn't keep their hands clean, And now they've paid a cruel price for their sins.
And I, their soothsayer, who have done no wrong, Will be laid low with them. That's the gratitude I get."

Odysseus scowled down at the man and said:

"If you are really their soothsayer, as you boast you are, How many times must you have prayed in the halls That my sweet homecoming would never come,
And that you would be the one my wife would go off with And bear children to! You're a dead man."

As he spoke his strong hand reached for a sword That lay nearby—a sword Agelaus had dropped When he was killed. The soothsayer was struck Full in the neck. His lips were still forming words When his lopped head rolled in the dust.
 




330










335








340











345










350
 
All this while the bard, Phemius, was busy Trying not to be killed. This man, Terpes' son, Sang for the suitors under compulsion.
He stood now with his pure-toned lyre Near the high back door, trying to decide Whether he should slip out from the hall
And crouch at the altar of Zeus of the Courtyard— The great altar on which Laertes and Odysseus Had burned many an ox's thigh—
Or whether he should rush forward And supplicate Odysseus by his knees.
Better to fall at the man's knees, he thought. So he laid the hollow lyre on the ground
Between the wine-bowl and silver-studded chair And ran up to Odysseus and clasped his knees. His words flew up to Odysseus like birds:

"By your knees, Odysseus, respect me And pity me. You will regret it someday
If you kill a bard—me—who sings for gods and men. I am self-taught, and a god has planted in my heart All sorts of songs and stories, and I can sing to you As to a god. So don't be too eager
To slit my throat. Telemachus will tell you That I didn't come to your house by choice To entertain the suitors at their feasts.
There were too many of them; they made me come." Telemachus heard him and said to his father:
 




355








360








365










370








375
 
"He's innocent; don't kill him. And let's spare the herald, Medon,
Who used to take care of me when I was a child, If Philoetius hasn't already killed him—
Or the swineherd—or if he didn't run into you As you were charging through the house."

Medon heard what Telemachus said.
He was under a chair, wrapped in an oxhide, Cowering from death. Now he jumped up, Stripped off the oxhide, ran to Telemachus And fell at his knees. His words rose on wings:

"I'm here, Telemachus! Hold back, and ask your father To hold back too, or he might kill me with cold bronze, Strong as he is and as mad as he is at the suitors,
Who ate away his house and paid you no honor." Odysseus smiled at this and said to him:
"Don't worry, he's saved you. Now you know, And you can tell the world, how much better Good deeds are than evil. Go outside, now, You and the singer, and sit in the yard
Away from the slaughter, until I finish Everything I have to do inside the house."

So he spoke, and the two went out of the hall And sat down by the altar of great Zeus,
Wide-eyed and expecting death at any moment.
 

380








385










390











395










400
 
Odysseus, too, had his eyes wide open, Looking all through his house to see if anyone Was still alive and hiding from death.
But everyone he saw lay in the blood and dust, The whole lot of them,

like fish that fishermen Have drawn up in nets from the grey sea Onto the curved shore. They lie all in heaps
On the sand beach, longing for the salt waves, And the blazing sun drains their life away.
So too the suitors, lying in heaps. Then Odysseus called to Telemachus: "Go call the nurse Eurycleia for me.
I want to tell her something."

So Telemachus went To Eurycleia's room, rattled the door, and called:

"Get up and come out here, old woman—you Who are in charge of all our women servants. Come on. My father has something to say to you."

Eurycleia's response died on her lips. She opened the doors to the great hall, Came out, and followed Telemachus
To where Odysseus, spattered with blood and grime
 

405











410











415















420










425
 
Stood among the bodies of the slain.

A lion that has just fed upon an ox in afield Has his chest and cheeks smeared with blood, And his face is terrible to look upon.

 
So too Odysseus, Smeared with gore from head to foot.

When Eurycleia Saw all the corpses and the pools of blood, She lifted her head to cry out in triumph— But Odysseus stopped her cold,
Reining her in with these words:

"Rejoice in your heart, but do not cry aloud. It is unholy to gloat over the slain. These men Have been destroyed by divine destiny
And their own recklessness. They honored no one, Rich or poor, high or low, who came to them.
And so by their folly they have brought upon themselves An ugly fate.
 



430













435








440
 
Now tell me, which of the women Dishonor me and which are innocent?"

And Eurycleia, the loyal nurse:

 
"Yes indeed, child, I will tell you all. There are fifty women in your house, Servants we have taught to do their work,
 



445
 
To card wool and bear all the drudgery. Of these, twelve have shamed this house
And respect neither me nor Penelope herself. Telemachus has only now become a man, And his mother has not allowed him
To direct the women servants.
May I go now To the upstairs room and tell your wife? Some god has wrapped her up in sleep."

Odysseus, his mind teeming, answered her:

"Don't wake her yet. First bring those women Who have acted so disgracefully."

While the old woman went out through the hall
To tell the women the news—and to summon twelve— Odysseus called Telemachus and the two herdsmen And spoke to them words fletched like arrows:

"Start carrying out the bodies, And have the women help you.
Then sponge down All of the beautiful tables and chairs.
When you have set the whole house in order, Take the women outside between the round house
And the courtyard fence. Slash them with your swords Until they have forgotten their secret lovemaking With the suitors. Then finish them off."
 






450











455











460











465
 
Thus Odysseus, and the women came in, Huddled together and shedding salt tears. First they carried out the dead bodies
And set them down under the courtyard's portico, Propping them against each other. Odysseus himself Kept them at it. Then he had them sponge down
All of the beautiful tables and chairs. Telemachus, the swineherd, and the cowherd Scraped the floor with hoes, and the women Carried out the scrapings and threw them away. When they had set the whole house in order,
They took the women out between the round house And the courtyard fence, penning them in
With no way to escape. And Telemachus, In his cool-headed way, said to the others:

"I won't allow a clean death for these women— The suitors' sluts—who have heaped reproaches Upon my own head and upon my mother's."

He spoke, and tied the cable of a dark-prowed ship To a great pillar and pulled it about the round house,
Stretching it high so their feet couldn't touch the ground.

Long-winged thrushes, or doves, making their way To their roosts, fall into a snare set in a thicket,
And the bed that receives them is far from welcome.

So too these women, their heads hanging in a row, The cable looped around each of their necks.
 

470








475








480










485










490











495
 
It was a most piteous death. Their feet fluttered For a little while, but not for long.

 
Then they brought Melanthius outside, And in their fury they sliced off
His nose and ears with cold bronze
And pulled his genitals out by the root— Raw meat for the dogs—and chopped off His hands and feet.

This done, They washed their own hands and feet
And went back into their master's great hall. Then Odysseus said to Eurycleia:
"Bring me sulfur, old woman, and fire, So that I can fumigate the hall.
And go tell Penelope to come down here, And all of the women in the house as well."

And Eurycleia, the faithful nurse:

"As you say, child. But first let me bring you A tunic and a cloak for you to put on.
You should not be standing here like this With rags on your body. It's not right."

Odysseus, his mind teeming, answered her:
 





500











505











510











515
 
"First make a fire for me here in the hall."

 
He spoke, and Eurycleia did as she was told. She brought fire and sulfur, and Odysseus Purified his house, the halls and the courtyard.

Then the old nurse went through Odysseus' Beautiful house, telling the women the news.
They came from their hall with torches in their hands And thronged around Odysseus and embraced him. And as they kissed his head and shoulders and hands He felt a sudden, sweet urge to weep,
For in his heart he knew them all.
 





520










525
 

BOOK 23

The old woman laughed as she went upstairs To tell her mistress that her husband was home. She ran up the steps, lifting her knees high, And, bending over Penelope, she said:

"Wake up, dear child, so you can see for yourself	5
What you have yearned for day in and day out. Odysseus has come home, after all this time, And has killed those men who tried to marry you
And who ravaged your house and bullied your son."
And Penelope, alert now and wary:	10

"Dear nurse, the gods have driven you crazy. The gods can make even the wise mad,
Just as they often make the foolish wise.
Now they have wrecked your usually sound mind.
Why do you mock me and my sorrowful heart,	15
Waking me from sleep to tell me this nonsense— And such a sweet sleep. It sealed my eyelids.
I haven't slept like that since the day Odysseus Left for Ilion—that accursed city.
Now go back down to the hall.	20
If any of the others had told me this
And wakened me from sleep, I would have
 
Sent her back with something to be sorry about! You can thank your old age for this at least."

And Eurycleia, the loyal nurse:	25
"I am not mocking you, child. Odysseus Really is here. He's come home, just as I say.
He's the stranger they all insulted in the great hall. Telemachus has known all along, but had
The self-control to hide his father's plans	30
Until he could pay the arrogant bastards back."

Penelope felt a sudden pang of joy. She leapt
From her bed and flung her arms around the old woman, And with tears in her eyes she said to her:

"Dear nurse, if it is true, if he really has	35
Come back to his house, tell me how
He laid his hands on the shameless suitors, One man alone against all of that mob."

Eurycleia answered her:

"I didn't see and didn't ask. I only heard the groaning	40
Of men being killed. We women sat
In the far corner of our quarters, trembling, With the good solid doors bolted shut
Until your son came from the hall to call me,
Telemachus. His father had sent him to call me.	45
And there he was, Odysseus, standing
 
In a sea of dead bodies, all piled
On top of each other on the hard-packed floor. It would have warmed your heart to see him,
Spattered with blood and filth like a lion.	50
And now the bodies are all gathered together At the gates, and he is purifying the house With sulfur, and has built a great fire,
And has sent me to call you. Come with me now
So that both your hearts can be happy again.	55
You have suffered so much, but now Your long desire has been fulfilled.
He has come himself, alive, to his own hearth, And has found you and his son in the hall.
As for the suitors, who did him wrong,	60
He's taken his revenge on every last man." And Penelope, ever cautious:
"Dear nurse, don't gloat over them yet. You know how welcome the sight of him
Would be to us all, and especially to me	65
And the son he and I bore. But this story Can't be true, not the way you tell it.
One of the immortals must have killed the suitors, Angry at their arrogance and evil deeds.
They respected no man, good or bad,	70
So their blind folly has killed them. But Odysseus Is lost, lost to us here, and gone forever."
And Eurycleia, the faithful nurse:
 
"Child, how can you say this? Your husband
Is here at his own fireside, and yet you are sure	75
He will never come home! Always on guard! But here's something else, clear proof:
The scar he got from the tusk of that boar. I noticed it when I was washing his feet
And wanted to tell you, but he shrewdly clamped	80
His hand on my mouth and wouldn't let me speak. Just come with me, and I will stake my life on it. If I am lying you can torture me to death."
Still wary, Penelope replied:
"Dear nurse, it is hard for you to comprehend	85
The ways of the eternal gods, wise as you are. Still, let us go to my son, so that I may see
The suitors dead and the man who killed them."

And Penelope descended the stairs, her heart
In turmoil. Should she hold back and question	90
Her husband? Or should she go up to him, Embrace him, and kiss his hands and head?
She entered the hall, crossing the stone threshold, And sat opposite Odysseus, in the firelight
Beside the farther wall. He sat by a column,	95
Looking down, waiting to see if his incomparable wife Would say anything to him when she saw him.
She sat a long time in silence, wondering.
She would look at his face and see her husband,
 
But then fail to know him in his dirty rags. Telemachus couldn't take it any more:

"Mother, how can you be so hard, Holding back like that? Why don't you sit
Next to father and talk to him, ask him things? No other woman would have the heart
To stand off from her husband who has come back After twenty hard years to his country and home. But your heart is always colder than stone."

And Penelope, cautious as ever:

"My child, I am lost in wonder
And unable to speak or ask a question Or look him in the eyes. If he really is Odysseus come home, the two of us Will be sure of each other, very sure.
There are secrets between us no one else knows."

Odysseus, who had borne much, smiled, And his words flew to his son on wings:

"Telemachus, let your mother test me
In our hall. She will soon see more clearly. Now, because I am dirty and wearing rags, She is not ready to acknowledge who I am. But you and I have to devise a plan.
When someone kills just one man,
Even a man who has few to avenge him,
 

100










105











110








115











120
 
He goes into exile, leaving country and kin. Well, we have killed a city of young men, The flower of Ithaca. Think about that."

And Telemachus, in his clear-headed way:

"You should think about it, Father. They say No man alive can match you for cunning. We'll follow you for all we are worth,
And I don't think we'll fail for lack of courage." And Odysseus, the master strategist:
"Well, this is what I think we should do.
First, bathe yourselves and put on clean tunics And tell the women to choose their clothes well. Then have the singer pick up his lyre
And lead everyone in a lively dance tune, Loud and clear. Anyone who hears the sound,
A passerby or neighbor, will think it's a wedding, And so word of the suitors' killing won't spread Down through the town before we can reach
Our woodland farm. Once there we'll see What kind of luck the Olympian gives us."

They did as he said. The men bathed
And put on tunics, and the women dressed up. The godlike singer, sweeping his hollow lyre,
Put a song in their hearts and made their feet move, And the great hall resounded under the tread
 

125











130











135








140










145
 
Of men and silken-waisted women dancing. And people outside would hear it and say:

"Well, someone has finally married the queen, Fickle woman. Couldn't bear to keep the house For her true husband until he came back."
But they had no idea how things actually stood. Odysseus, meanwhile, was being bathed
By the housekeeper, Eurynome. She
Rubbed him with olive oil and threw about him A beautiful cloak and tunic. And Athena
Shed beauty upon him, and made him look Taller and more muscled, and made his hair Tumble down his head like hyacinth flowers.

Imagine a craftsman overlaying silver With pure gold. He has learned his art From Pallas Athena and Lord Hephaestus, And creates works of breathtaking beauty.

So Athena herself made his head and shoulders Shimmer with grace. He came from the bath Like a god, and sat down on the chair again Opposite his wife, and spoke to her and said:

"You're a mysterious woman.
The gods Have given to you, more than to any
 

150











155










160










165










170
 
Other woman, an unyielding heart.
No other woman would be able to endure Standing off from her husband, come back
After twenty hard years to his country and home. Nurse, make up a bed for me so I can lie down Alone, since her heart is a cold lump of iron."

And Penelope, cautious and wary:

"You're a mysterious man.
I am not being proud Or scornful, nor am I bewildered—not at all. I know very well what you looked like
When you left Ithaca on your long-oared ship. Nurse, bring the bed out from the master bedroom, The bedstead he made himself, and spread it for him With fleeces and blankets and silky coverlets."

She was testing her husband.
Odysseus
Could bear no more, and he cried out to his wife:

"By God, woman, now you've cut deep. Who moved my bed? It would be hard
For anyone, no matter how skilled, to move it. A god could come down and move it easily,
But not a man alive, however young and strong, Could ever pry it up. There's something telling About how that bed's built, and no one else Built it but me.
 




175











180










185













190








195
 
There was an olive tree Growing on the site, long-leaved and full,
Its trunk thick as a post. I built my bedroom Around that tree, and when I had finished The masonry walls and done the roofing And set in the jointed, close-fitting doors,
I lopped off all of the olive's branches, Trimmed the trunk from the root on up,
And rounded it and trued it with an adze until
I had myself a bedpost. I bored it with an auger, And starting from this I framed up the whole bed, Inlaying it with gold and silver and ivory
And stretching across it oxhide thongs dyed purple. So there's our secret. But I do not know, woman, Whether my bed is still firmly in place, or if
Some other man has cut through the olive's trunk."

At this, Penelope finally let go.
Odysseus had shown he knew their old secret. In tears, she ran straight to him, threw her arms Around him, kissed his face, and said:

"Don't be angry with me, Odysseus. You, Of all men, know how the world goes.
It is the gods who gave us sorrow, the gods Who begrudged us a life together, enjoying Our youth and arriving side by side
To the threshold of old age. Don't hold it against me That when I first saw you I didn't welcome you
As I do now. My heart has been cold with fear
 








200








205








210










215










220
 
That an imposter would come and deceive me. There are many who scheme for ill-gotten gains. Not even Helen, daughter of Zeus,
Would have slept with a foreigner had she known The Greeks would go to war to bring her back home. It was a god who drove her to that dreadful act,
Or she never would have thought of doing what she did, The horror that brought suffering to us as well.
But now, since you have confirmed the secret
Of our marriage bed, which no one has ever seen— Only you and I and a single servant, Actor's daughter, Whom my father gave me before I ever came here And who kept the doors of our bridal chamber—
You have persuaded even my stubborn heart."

This brought tears from deep within him, And as he wept he clung to his beloved wife.

Land is a welcome sight to men swimming
For their lives, after Poseidon has smashed their ship In heavy seas. Only a few of them escape
And make it to shore. They come out
Of the grey water crusted with brine, glad To be alive and set foot on dry land.

So welcome a sight was her husband to her.
She would not loosen her white arms from his neck, And rose-fingered Dawn would have risen
On their weeping, had not Athena stepped in
And held back the long night at the end of its course
 



225








230








235











240








245










250
 
And stopped gold-stitched Dawn at Ocean's shores From yoking the horses that bring light to men, Lampus and Phaethon, the colts of Dawn.

Then Odysseus said to his wife:

 
"We have not yet come to the end of our trials. There is still a long, hard task for me to complete, As the spirit of Tiresias foretold to me
On the day I went down to the house of Hades To ask him about my companions' return
And my own. But come to bed now,
And we'll close our eyes in the pleasure of sleep." And Penelope calmly answered him:
"Your bed is ready for you whenever
You want it, now that the gods have brought you Home to your family and native land.
But since you've brought it up, tell me
About this trial. I'll learn about it soon enough, And it won't be any worse to hear it now."

And Odysseus, his mind teeming:

"You are a mystery to me. Why do you insist I tell you now? Well, here's the whole story. It's not a tale you will enjoy, and I have no joy In telling it.
 

255








260











265











270
 
Tiresias told me that I must go
 
To city after city carrying a broad-bladed oar, Until I come to men who know nothing of the sea, Who eat their food unsalted, and have never seen
Red-prowed ships or the oars that wing them along. And he told me that I would know I had found them When I met another traveler who thought
The oar I was carrying was a winnowing fan. Then I must fix my oar in the earth
And offer sacrifice to Lord Poseidon, A ram, a bull, and a boar in its prime.
Then at last I am to come home and offer Grand sacrifice to the immortal gods Who hold high heaven, to each in turn. And death shall come to me from the sea, As gentle as this touch, and take me off When I am worn out in sleek old age, With my people prosperous around me. All this Tiresias said would come true."

Then Penelope, watching him, answered:

"If the gods are going to grant you a happy old age, There is hope your troubles will someday be over."

While they spoke to one another, Eurynome and the nurse made the bed
By torchlight, spreading it with soft coverlets. Then the old nurse went to her room to he down, And Eurynome, who kept the bedroom,
Led the couple to their bed, lighting the way.
 



275








280








285








290













295








300
 
When she had led them in, she withdrew, And they went with joy to their bed
And to their rituals of old.

 
Telemachus and his men Stopped dancing, stopped the women's dance, And lay down to sleep in the shadowy halls.

After Odysseus and Penelope
Had made sweet love, they took turns Telling stories to each other. She told him All that she had to endure as the fair lady
In the palace, looking upon the loathsome throng Of suitors, who used her as an excuse
To kill many cattle, whole flocks of sheep, And to empty the cellar of much of its wine. Odysseus told her of all the suffering
He had brought upon others, and of all the pain He endured himself. She loved listening to him
And did not fall asleep until he had told the whole tale.

He began with how he overcame the Cicones And then came to the land of the Lotus-Eaters, And all that the Cyclops did, and how he
Paid him back for eating his comrades. Then how he came to Aeolus,
Who welcomed him and sent him on his way,
But since it was not his destiny to return home then, The stormwinds grabbed him and swept him off
 





305










310








315










320








325
 
Groaning deeply over the teeming saltwater. Then how he came to the Laestrygonians, Who destroyed his ships and all their crews, Leaving him with only one black-tarred hull. Then all of Circe's tricks and wiles,
And how he sailed to the dank house of Hades To consult the spirit of Theban Tiresias
And saw his old comrades there
And his aged mother who nursed him as a child. Then how he heard the Sirens' eternal song, And came to the Clashing Rocks,
And dread Charybdis and Scylla, Whom no man had ever escaped before.
Then how his crew killed the cattle of the Sun, And how Zeus, the high lord of thunder, Slivered his ship with lightning, and all his men Went down, and he alone survived.
And he told her how he came to Ogygia, The island of the nymph Calypso,
Who kept him there in her scalloped caves, Yearning for him to be her husband,
And how she took care of him, and promised To make him immortal and ageless all his days But did not persuade the heart in his breast.
Then how he crawled out of the sea in Phaeacia, And how the Phaeacians honored him like a god And sent him on a ship to his own native land With gifts of bronze and clothing and gold.

He told the story all the way through,
 








330








335








340








345








350
 
And then sleep, which slackens our bodies, Fell upon him and released him from care.

The Grey-eyed One knew what to do next. When she felt that Odysseus was satisfied With sleep and with lying next to his wife, She roused the slumbering, golden Dawn,
Who climbed from Ocean with light for the world. Odysseus got up from his rose-shadowed bed
And turned to Penelope with these instructions:

"My wife, we've had our fill of trials now, You here, weeping over all the troubles My absence caused, and I, bound by Zeus To suffer far from the home I yearned for. Now that we have both come to the bed
We have long desired, you must take charge Of all that is mine in the house, while I
See to replenishing the flocks and herds The insolent suitors have depleted.
I'll get some back on raids, some as tribute, Until the pens are full again. But now,
I want you to know I am going to our farm To see my father, who has suffered terribly On my account. You don't need me to tell you That when the sun rises the news will spread That I have killed the suitors in our hall. So, Go upstairs with your women and sit quietly. Don't look outside or speak to anyone."
 

355










360










365








370








375








380
 
Odysseus spoke and put on his beautiful armor. He woke Telemachus, and the cowherd
And swineherd, and had them arm also.
They strapped on their bronze, opened the doors And went out, Odysseus leading the way.
It was light by now, but Athena hid them
In darkness, and spirited them out of the city.
 






385
 

BOOK 24

Hermes, meanwhile, was calling forth
The ghosts of the suitors. He held the wand He uses to charm mortal eyes to sleep
And make sleepers awake; and with this beautiful,
Golden wand he marshaled the ghosts,	5
Who followed along squeaking and gibbering.

Bats deep inside an eerie cave
Flit and gibber when one of them falls
From the cluster clinging to the rock overhead.

So too these ghosts, as Hermes led them	10
Down the cold, dank ways, past
The streams of Ocean, past the White Rock,
Past the Gates of the Sun and the Land of Dreams, Until they came to the Meadow of Asphodel,
Where the spirits of the dead dwell, phantoms	15
Of men outworn.

Here was the ghost of Achilles, And those of Patroclus, of flawless Antilochus,
And of Ajax, the best of the Achaeans After Achilles, Peleus' incomparable son.
These ghosts gathered around Achilles	20
And were joined by the ghost of Agamemnon,
 
Son of Atreus, grieving, he himself surrounded By the ghosts of those who had died with him And met their fate in the house of Aegisthus.
The son of Peleus was the first to greet him:	25
"Son of Atreus, we believed that you of all heroes Were dear to thundering Zeus your whole life through, For you were the lord of the great army at Troy, Where we Greeks endured a bitter campaign.
But you too had an early rendezvous with death,	30
Which no man can escape once he is born. How much better to have died at Troy With all the honor you commanded there!
The entire Greek army would have raised you a tomb,
And you would have won glory for your son as well.	35
As it was, you were doomed to a most pitiable death." And the ghost of Agamemnon answered:
"Godlike Achilles, you did have the good fortune To die in Troy, far from Argos. Around you fell
Some of the best Greeks and Trojans of their time,	40
Fighting for your body, as you lay there
In the howling dust of war, one of the great, Your horsemanship forgotten. We fought all day And would never have stopped, had not Zeus
Halted us with a great storm. Then we bore your body	45
Back to the ships and laid it on a bier, and cleansed Your beautiful flesh with warm water and ointments, And the men shed many hot tears and cut their hair.
 
Then your mother heard, and she came from the sea
With her saltwater women, and an eerie cry	50
Rose over the deep. The troops panicked,
And they would have run for the ships, had not
A man who was wise in the old ways stopped them, Nestor, whose counsel had prevailed before.
Full of concern, he called out to the troops:	55

'Argives and Achaeans, halt! This is no time to flee. It is his mother, with her immortal nymphs,
Come from the sea to mourn her dead son.'

"When he said that the troops settled down.
Then the daughters of the Old Man of the Sea	60
Stood all around you and wailed piteously, And they dressed you in immortal clothing. And the Muses, all nine, chanted the dirge, Singing responsively in beautiful voices.
You couldn't have seen a dry eye in the army,	65
So poignant was the song of the Muses.
For seventeen days we mourned you like that, Men and gods together. On the eighteenth day We gave you to the fire, slaughtering sheep
And horned cattle around you. You were burned	70
In the clothing of the gods, with rich unguents And sweet honey, and many Greek heroes Paraded in arms around your burning pyre, Both infantry and charioteers,
And the sound of their marching rose to heaven.	75
When the fire had consumed you,
 
We gathered your white bones at dawn, Achilles, And laid them in unmixed wine and unguents. Your mother had given us a golden urn,
A gift of Dionysus, she said, made by Hephaestus. In this urn lie your white bones, Achilles,
Mingled with those of the dead Patroclus. Just apart lie the bones of Antilochus
Whom you honored most after Patroclus died. Over them all we spearmen of the great army Heaped an immense and perfect barrow
On a headland beside the broad Hellespont So that it might be seen from far out at sea By men now and men to come.
Your mother, Thetis, Had collected beautiful prizes from the gods
And now set them down in the middle of the field To honor the best of the Achaean athletes.
You have been to many heroes' funeral games Where young men contend for prizes,
But you would have marveled at the sight Of the beautiful prizes silver-footed Thetis
Set out for you. You were very dear to the gods. Not even in death have you lost your name, Achilles, nor your honor among men.
But what did I get for winding up the war? Zeus worked out for me a ghastly death
At the hands of Aegisthus and my murderous wife."

As these two heroes talked with each other, Quicksilver Hermes was leading down
 






80








85










90








95








100
 
The ghosts of the suitors killed by Odysseus. When Hermes and these ghosts drew near,
The two heroes were amazed and went up to see Who they were. The ghost of Agamemnon Recognized one of them, Amphimedon,
Who had been his host in Ithaca, and called out:

"Amphimedon! Why have you come down Beneath the dark earth, you and your company, All men of rank, all the same age? It's as if Someone had hand-picked the city's best men. Did Poseidon sink your ships and drown you In the wind-whipped waves? Was it that, or Did an enemy destroy you on land
As you cut off their cattle and flocks of sheep— Or as they fought for their city and women?
Tell me. Remember who is asking—
An old friend of your house. I came there With godlike Menelaus to urge Odysseus To sail with the fleet to Ilion. A full month That journey to Ithaca took us—hard work Persuading Odysseus, destroyer of cities."

The ghost of Amphimedon responded:

"Son of Atreus, most glorious Agamemnon, I remember all that, just as you tell it,
And I will tell you exactly what happened to us, And how it ended in our bitter death.
We were courting the wife of Odysseus,
 

105








110










115








120








125











130
 
Long gone by then. She loathed the thought
Of remarrying, but she wouldn't give us a yes or no. Her mind was bent on death and darkness for us.
Here is one of the tricks she dreamed up:
She set up a loom in the hall and started weaving—
A huge, fine-threaded piece—and then came out and said:

'Young men—my suitors, since Odysseus is dead— Eager as you are to marry me, you must wait
Until I finish this robe—it would be a shame To waste my spinning—a shroud for the hero Laertes, when death's doom lays him low.
I fear the Achaean women would reproach me If he should lie shroudless for all his wealth.'

"We went along with this appeal to our honor. Every day she would weave at the great loom, And every night she would unweave by torchlight. She fooled us for three years with her craft.
But in the fourth year, as the seasons rolled by, And the moons waned, and the days dragged on, One of her women who knew all about it
Told us, and we caught her unweaving
The gloried shroud. Then we forced her to finish it. When it was done she washed it and showed it to us, And it shone like the sun or the moon.
It was then That some evil spirit brought Odysseus
From who knows where to the border of his land, Where the swineherd lived. Odysseus' son
 






135










140










145








150








155
 
Put in from Pylos in his black ship and joined him. These two, after they had plotted an ugly death
For the suitors, came up to the town, first Telemachus And then later Odysseus, led by the swineherd,
Who brought his master wearing tattered clothes, Looking for all the world like a miserable old beggar, Leaning on a staff, his rags hanging off him.
None of us could know who he was, not even The older men, when he showed up like that.
We threw things at him and gave him a hard time. He just took it, pelted and taunted in his own house, Until, prompted by Zeus, he and Telemachus Removed all the weapons from the hall
And locked them away in a storeroom.
Then he showed all his cunning. He told his wife To set before the suitors his bow and grey iron—
Implements for a contest, and for our ill-fated death. None of us were able to string that bow.
We couldn't even come close. When it came Around to Odysseus, we cried out and objected, 'Don't give the bow to that beggar,
No matter what he says!' Telemachus alone Urged him on and encouraged him to take it. And he did. The great Odysseus
Took the bow, strung it easily, and shot an arrow
Straight through the iron. Then he stood on the threshold, Poured the arrows out, and glaring around him
He shot Lord Antinous. And then he shot others, With perfect aim, and we fell thick and fast.
You could see that some god was helping them,
 



160








165








170








175








180








185
 
The way they raged through the hall, cutting us down Right and left; and you could hear
The hideous groans of men as their heads Were bashed in. The floor smoked with blood.
That's how we died, Agamemnon. Our bodies Still lie uncared for in Odysseus' halls.
Word has not yet reached our friends and family, Who could wash the black blood from our wounds And lay us out with wailing, as is due the dead."

And the ghost of Agamemnon responded:

"Well done, Odysseus, Laertes' wily son! You won a wife of great character
In Icarius' daughter. What a mind she has,
A woman beyond reproach! How well Penelope Kept in her heart her husband, Odysseus.
And so her virtue's fame will never perish, And the gods will make among men on earth A song of praise for steadfast Penelope.
But Tyndareus' daughter was evil to the core, Killing her own husband, and her song will be A song of scorn, bringing ill-repute
To all women, even the virtuous."

That was the drift of their talk as they stood In the Dark Lord's halls deep under the earth.

Odysseus and the others went from the town
 



190








195











200








205








210
 
And made good time getting down to Laertes' Well-kept fields. The old man had worked hard Reclaiming the land from the wilderness.
His farmhouse was there with a row of huts around it Where the field hands ate and rested and slept.
These were his slaves, and they did as he wished. There was an old Sicilian woman, too,
Who took good care of the old man out in the country. Odysseus had a word with the herdsmen and his son:
"Go into the farmhouse and make yourselves busy. Sacrifice the best pig and roast it for dinner.
I am going to test my father. Will he recognize me? Will he know who I am after all these years?"

He disarmed and gave his weapons to the herdsmen. They hurried off indoors, leaving Odysseus
To search through the rows of fruit trees and vines. He did not find Dolius, or any of his sons
Anywhere in the orchard. Old Dolius had taken them To gather fieldstones for a garden wall.
But he found his father, alone, on a well-banked plot, Spading a plant. He had on an old, dirty shirt, Mended and patched, and leather leggings
Pieced together as protection from scratches.
He wore gloves because of the bushes, and on his head He had a goatskin cap, crowning his sorrow.
Odysseus, who had borne much, saw him like this, Worn with age and a grieving heart,
 



215








220











225










230








235








240
 
And wept as he watched from a pear tree's shade. He thought it over. Should he just throw his arms
Around his father, kiss him and tell him all he had done, And how he'd returned to his homeland again—
Or should he question him and feel him out first? Better that way, he thought, to feel him out first With a few pointed remarks. With this in mind, Godlike Odysseus walked up to his father,
Who kept his head down and went on digging. His illustrious son stood close by him and said:

"Well, old-timer, you certainly know how to garden. There's not a plant, a fig tree, a vine or an olive,
Not a pear tree or leek in this whole garden untended. But if I may say so without getting you angry,
You don't take such good care of yourself. Old age
Is hard, yes. But unwashed, scruffy and dressed in rags? It can't be that your lord is too lax to care for you,
And anyway there's nothing in your build or looks To suggest you're a slave. You look more like a king, The sort of man who after he has bathed and eaten Sleeps on a soft bed, as is only right for elders.
Come on now and give me a straight answer. Whose slave are you? Whose orchard is this? And tell me this, too, so that I can be sure:
Is this really Ithaca I've come to, as I was told By that man I ran into on my way over here? He wasn't very polite, couldn't be bothered
To tell me what I wanted, or even to hear me out. I've been trying to find out about an old friend
 








245








250










255








260








265
 
I entertained at my house once, whether he's still alive Or is dead by now and gone down to Hades.
So I'll ask you, if you'll give me your attention.
I was host to a man once back in my own country, A man who means more to me than anyone else Who has ever visited my home from abroad.
He claimed his family was from Ithaca, and he said His father was Laertes, son of Arcesius.
I took him into my home, and entertained him In a style befitting the wealth in my house,
And gave him suitable gifts to seal our friendship: Seven ingots of fine gold, a silver mixing bowl Embossed with flowers, twelve cloaks, as many Carpets, mantles and tunics, and his choice of four Beautiful women superbly trained in handicrafts."

A tear wet his father's cheek as he answered:

"You've come to the land you're looking for, stranger, But it's in the hands of haughty and violent men.
You've given all those generous gifts in vain. If you were to find him alive here in Ithaca He would send you off with the beautiful gifts And fine hospitality you deserve as his friend. But tell me this now, and tell me the truth: How many years has it been since you hosted
Your ill-fated guest, my son—if I ever had a son? Born for sorrow he was, and now far from home, Far from his loved ones, his bones are picked clean By fish undersea; or on some wild shore
 

270








275








280










285










290








295
 
His body is feeding the scavenging birds, Unburied, unmourned by his mother and me,
Who brought him into this world. Nor has his wife, Penelope, patient and wise, who brought him so much, Lamented her husband on a funeral bier
Or closed his eyelids, as is due the dead. And tell me this, too, so that I will know. Who are you?
What city are you from? Who are your parents? And where have you moored the sailing ship That brought you and your crew of heroes here? Or did you come as a passenger on another's ship That put you ashore and went on its way?"
And Odysseus, his great mind teeming: "I'll tell you everything point by point.
I come from Alybas and have my home there.
I'm the son of Apheidas and Polypemon's grandson. My name is Eperitus. Some storm spirit drove me Off course from Sicily and, as luck had it, here.
My ship stands off wild country far from the town. As for Odysseus, it's been five years now
Since he left my land, ill-fated maybe,
But the birds were good when he sailed out— On the right. This cheered me as I sent him off, And he was cheered, too, our hearts full of hope
We would meet again and exchange splendid gifts."

A black mist of pain shrouded Laertes.
 




300








305








310











315








320
 
He scooped up fistfuls of shimmering dust
And groaned as he poured it upon his grey head. This wrung Odysseus' heart, and bitter longing Stung his nostrils as he watched his father.
With a bound he embraced him, kissed him and said:

"I'm the one that you miss, Father, right here, Back in my homeland after twenty years.
But don't cry now. Hold back your tears. I'm telling you, we really have to hurry.
I've killed the suitors in our house and avenged All of the wrongs that have grieved your heart."

But Laertes' voice rang out in answer:

"If you are really Odysseus and my son come back, Give me a sign, a clear sign I can trust."
And Odysseus, the master strategist: "First, here's the scar I got on Parnassus
From that boar's bright tusk. Mother and you Had sent me to my grandfather Autolycus
To collect some presents he had promised me When he had visited us here. And let me count off All of the trees in the orchard rows
You gave me one day when I was still a boy. You gave me thirteen pear trees, ten apple trees, Forty fig trees, and fifty vine rows
That ripened one by one as the season went on
 

325










330








335















340








345
 
With heavy clusters of all sorts of grapes."

He spoke, and the old man's knees went slack
As he recognized the signs Odysseus showed him. He threw his arms around his beloved son
And gasped for breath. And godly Odysseus, Who had borne much, embraced him.
When he had caught his breath and his spirit returned, Laertes' voice rang out to the sky:

"Father Zeus, there are still gods on high Olympus, If the suitors have really paid the price!
But now I have a terrible fear
That all of Ithaca will be upon us soon,
And word will have gone out to Cephallenia, too." And Odysseus, his mind teeming:
"We don't have to worry about that right now. Let's go to the cottage near the orchard.
I sent Telemachus there, and the cowherd And swineherd, to prepare a meal for us."

And they went together to the house With its comfortable rooms and found Telemachus and the two herdsmen there Carving huge roasts and mixing wine. While they were busy with these tasks,
The old Sicilian woman bathed great Laertes In his own house and rubbed him down
 

350










355










360











365










370
 
With olive oil and threw about his shoulders A handsome cloak. And Athena came
And made the shepherd of the people
Taller than before and added muscle to his frame. When he came from the bath, his son marveled At his deathless, godlike appearance,
And his words rose to his father on wings:

"Father, surely one of the gods eternal
Has made you larger, and more handsome, too." And Laertes, feeling the magic, answered him:
"I wish by Zeus and Athena and Apollo
That I could have stood at your side yesterday In our house, armor on my shoulders,
As the man I was when I took Nericus,
The mainland town, commanding the Cephallenians! I would have beaten the daylights out of them
There in our halls, and made your heart proud."

While they were talking, the others Had finished preparing the meal.
They all sat down on benches and chairs And were just serving themselves food When old Dolius came in with his sons, Weary from their work in the fields.
Their mother, the old Sicilian woman, Had gone out to call them. It was she Who made their meals and took care
 

375








380













385








390










395








400
 
Of Dolius, now that old age had set in. When they saw Odysseus, and realized
Who he was, they stood there dumbfounded. Odysseus spoke to them gently and said:

 
"Old man, sit down to dinner, and all of you, You can stop being amazed. Hungry as we are, We've been waiting a long time for you."

He spoke, and Dolius ran up to him With arms outstretched, and clasped
Odysseus' hand and kissed him on the wrist. Trembling with excitement, the old man said:

"My dear Odysseus, you have come back home. We missed you so much but never hoped
To see you again. The gods themselves Have brought you back. Welcome, welcome, And may the gods grant you happiness.
But tell me this—I have to know—
Does Penelope know that you have returned, Or should we send her a messenger?"

And Odysseus, his mind teeming:

"She knows, old man. You don't have to worry."

He spoke, and Dolius sat down in a polished chair. His sons then gathered around glorious Odysseus And greeted him and clasped his hands
 

405










410










415










420
 
And then sat down in order next to their father.

While they were busy with their meal, Rumor, that swift messenger, flew
All through the city, telling everyone About the grim fate the suitors had met. Before long a crowd had gathered Outside Odysseus' palace, and the sound Of their lamentation hung in the air.
They carried their dead out of the hall And buried them. Those from other cities
They put aboard ships to be brought home by sea. Then they all went to the meeting place,
Sad at heart. When they were assembled, Eupeithes rose and spoke among them, Upon his heart an unbearable grief
For his son Antinous, the first man Whom Odysseus killed. Weeping for him He addressed the assembly and said:

"My friends, it is truly monstrous— What this man has done to our city.
First, he sailed off with many of our finest men And lost the ships and every man aboard.
Now he has come back and killed many others, By far the best of the Cephallenians.
We must act now, before he runs off to Pylos Or takes refuge with the Epean lords of Elis. We will be disgraced forever if we don't avenge
 

425










430








435








440










445








450
 
Our sons' and brothers' deaths, and if we don't, I see no point in living. I'd rather be dead.
Let's move now, before they cross the sea!"

 
He wept as he spoke, and they all pitied him. Then up came Medon and the godlike bard From Odysseus' halls. They had just woken up From a long sleep and stood now in the midst Of the wondering crowd. Medon had this to say:

"Hear me, men of Ithaca. It was not without the will Of the deathless gods that Odysseus managed this.
I myself saw one of the immortals
Close to Odysseus. He looked just like Mentor
But was a god, now appearing in front of Odysseus, Urging him on, then raging through the hall Terrifying the suitors, who fell thick and fast."

He spoke, and they all turned pale with fear. Then the old hero Halitherses, son of Mastor,
Rose to speak. He alone looked ahead and behind, And spoke with the best of intentions to them:

"Now hear what I have to say, men of Ithaca. You have only yourselves to blame, my friends, For what has happened. You would not obey me
Nor Mentor, shepherd of the people, when we told you To make your sons stop their foolishness.
It was what your sons did that was truly monstrous, Wasting the wealth and dishonoring the wife
 

455










460








465










470










475
 
Of a great man, who they said would never return. Now listen to me and keep your peace. Some of you Are asking for trouble—and you just might find it."

Less than half of them took his advice And stayed in their seats. Most of them
Jumped up with a whoop and went with Eupeithes. They rushed to get weapons, and when the mob Had armed themselves in glowing bronze,
They put the city behind them, following Eupeithes, Who in his folly thought he would avenge
His son's death, but met his own fate instead. Eupeithes would never return home again.
Athena, meanwhile, was having a word with Zeus: "Father of us all, Son of Cronus most high,
Tell me what is hidden in that mind of yours. Will you let this grim struggle go on?
Or will you establish peace on Ithaca?"

And Zeus in his thunderhead responded:

"Why question me, Daughter? Wasn't this Your plan, to have Odysseus pay them back With a vengeance? Do as you will,
But I will tell you what would be fitting. Now that Odysseus has paid the suitors back, Let all parties swear a solemn oath,
 




480










485










490











495










500
 
That he will be king on Ithaca all of his days. We, for our part, will have them forget
The killing of their sons and brothers. Let them live in friendship as before, And let peace and prosperity abound."

This was all Athena needed to hear,
And she streaked down from Olympus' peaks.

The meal was over. Seeing that his company Had satisfied their hunger, Odysseus said:
"Someone should go out to see if they're coming." One of Dolius' sons went to the doorway,
Looked out, and saw the mob closing in. His words flew fast to Odysseus:
"They're almost here. We'd better arm quickly." They jumped up and put on their gear,
Odysseus and his three men and Dolius' six sons.
Laertes and Dolius armed themselves, too, Warriors in a pinch despite their white hair. When they had strapped on their bronze They opened the doors and headed out Behind Odysseus.

Athena joined them,
 






505












510













515










520
 
Looking for all the world like Mentor,
And Odysseus was glad to see her. He turned To his son Telemachus and said:

"Telemachus, now you will see firsthand What it means to distinguish yourself in war. Don't shame your ancestors. We have been Strong and brave in every generation."

And Telemachus coolly answered him:

"The way I feel now, I don't think you'll see me Shaming my ancestors, as you put it, Father."

Laertes was delighted with this and exclaimed:

"What a day, dear gods! My son and grandson Going head to head to see who is best."
The Grey-eyed One stood next to him and said: "Son of Arcesius, my dearest comrade,
Say a prayer to Zeus and his grey-eyed daughter,
And then cast your long-shadowed spear."

Pallas Athena breathed great strength into him, And with a prayer to Zeus' grey-eyed daughter, Laertes cast his long-shadowed spear
And hit Eupeithes square in the helmet. Bronze bored through bronze, and Eupeithes
 




525











530













535













540
 
Thudded to the ground, his armor clattering. Odysseus and his glorious son
Charged the front lines, thrusting hard
With their swords and spears. They would have killed Every last man—not one would have gone home— Had not Athena, daughter of the Storm Cloud,
Given voice to a cry that stopped them all cold:
 

545








550
 

"ITHACANS!
Lay down your arms now,
And go your ways with no more bloodshed."

 
Thus Athena, and they turned pale with fear.
The weapons dropped from their trembling hands And fell to the ground as the goddess' voice
Sent shock waves through them. They turned Back toward the city and ran for their lives. With a roar, the great, long-suffering Odysseus Gathered himself and swept after them

Like a soaring raptor.

At that moment Zeus, Son of Cronus, hurled down
A flaming thunderbolt that landed at the feet Of his owl-eyed daughter, who said:

"Son of Laertes in the line of Zeus, Cunning Odysseus—restrain yourself. End this quarrel and cease from fighting
 



555








560















565
 
Lest broad-browed Zeus frown upon you."

 
Thus Athena. The man obeyed and was glad,
And the goddess made both sides swear binding oaths— Pallas Athena, daughter of the Storm Cloud,
Who looked like Mentor and spoke with his voice.
 



570